Maybe I made the wrong choice between Sage and Julian Serrano at Aria.
We made reservations on the same day with the chick at the desk in front of the restaurant.
Nice decor, wine bottles and all, deceivingly huge.
Anyways, we walked through the lounge at the front of the restaurant and were seated in the back.
Spacious, very spacious with high ceilings, mirrors and weird murals.
The mural I'm referring to is the one to the left as you first enter that back dining room.
I didn't understand why it was even in this restaurant; it was a painting of farmers and kind of purple-ish.
Our server was ok, maybe trained to promote more food than we needed to order.
Menu items range in prices from $15-$40 per entree.
So, upon ordering our entree, our server asks "how would you like to start?
" I'm like "??
" What she meant was, pick out another dish from another area on the menu, as if it came with our entree.
Nope.
She made it sound like it was included.
So, I ordered the gnocchi (soft and pasty with brussel sprouts and radish) and cobia, which was not all that great.
The fish had a nice seared crust but that was about it.
Kind of bland, medium in tenderness and nothing special about it.
Mashed potato was thinned out and didn't have much good flavor.
The "chowder" sauce they poured in my dish was nothing like chowder unless chowder is that watery.
I felt like I was dining with Top Chefs, so now I understand the harsh critique.
But I am no Padma.
For dessert we ordered the beignets with a caramel sauce with tiny bits of apples.
It was cute because they were like doughnut sticks in fancy applesauce.
I could probably do better using krispy kreme doughnuts and mott's applesauce.
They don't listen.
The sommelier asked if we wanted to keep the wine menu and we replied with yes, yet he took it away?
When given the option to pick a bread from a wood case I requested sourdough; he gave me bacon.
WTF?
What if I was allergic to bacon?
Although, I have to say that the bread and fancy butter was good, at least when it was warm.
Oh and when our meal was over, the waitress handed us our check.
It was wrong...about $300.
wrong.
She apologized profusely but still, c'mon that's a huge difference.
The only good thing she brought us was the complimentary orange infused hot chocolate  shot at the end of our meal.
It's not that I can't appreciate a fine dining experience, but there was nothing fine about it.
Actually, the water boy was great.
He made a point of keeping our glasses full without splashing water all over the place because he shielded the pour with a cloth napkin.
Nice.
Will not dine here again.

2.5 stars.
Now this may not be 100% true, but judging by the previous review and what we saw, if you are asian, you will be escorted to the back of the restaurant.
When we arrived, it was quite empty, but we were kindly taken to the rear room, which is sectioned off behind the cash registers and some decor.
There was an old couple and a chinese family in there, and soon another asian family and another asian couple joined us in the back.
We noticed it was fairly strange, and so when we finished eating, we checked out the other guests and our suspicions were confirmed.
However, I should note there was a non-asian couple that was seated in the back when it got busier.
As for the restaurant, the decor is nice, the pork loin tastes like ham, but for now (perhaps since it's new), the chef gives a complimentary foam and grapefruit amuse appetizer and citrus infused hot cocoa drink to finish your meal, which is nice, along with the bacon bread, which adds a 1/2 star.
Also, the service was very attentive and timed quite well, with a lot of care taken to keeping our table tidy, which adds another star, however we're just left with a bad taste in our mouth after feeling discriminated against.
So if you are asian, prepare to have a party with the others in the back.

I really enjoyed my meal at Sage.
I didn't know much about the restaurant or Shawn McClain, but Sage surprised me.
The entrance to the restaurant doesn't do justice to what is inside.
It wasn't as striking as a high-end restaurant in Vegas would demand.
It is located across from Serrano, and from the outside it doesn't look like anything special.
However, the decor is actually quite hip and elegant with dark rich colors.
I thought service here was exemplary.
Our waiter was great.
So much so that we personally commended him to the manager.
One of the food runners even walked me all the way to the ladies room when I asked where it was located.
As for the food, the emphasis is on local seasonal ingredients.
I enjoyed my gnocchi with winter vegetables, such as winter squash.
For my main, I really liked the barramundi.
The fish was really well cooked and well seasoned.
The sauce was also excellent.
I wanted to lick my plate.
It is rare that I enjoy an entree as much as I do an appetizer.
Desserts were also good and they even brought out a free chocolate rich dessert with a candle for my boyfriend's birthday (without me even telling them to!
), The wine list has something for everyone.
My boyfriend and I ordered a half bottle of a zinfandel cabernet bland from a winery in Napa that he visited.
But, the real end to the evening here is the absinthe.
I was hesitant as absinthe caused my drunkest night ever.
It is more than 12 years later from that night in Salamanca as a 16-year old, but my body still feels it.
My friends say this explains my craziness from the hallucogenic effects.
Note to everyone: it is a very bad idea to have a shot drinking contest  with absinthe against someone twice your size.
Anyway....the absinthe is still strong.
But it was cool to see them light it on fire and bring it the table.
My boyfriend ordered a Swiss rather than Spanish absinthe as to avoid my memories of Salamanca.
Even when it was served with orange juice, it still packed a whopper of a punch.
All in all, the absinthe couldn't save the kind of lame Cirque Elvis show that night, but it did set the tone for one of my wildest nights in Vegas.
Drink up!

For the price I expected better food.
Great service but the food was average at most.
We were seated in the lounge instead the of the dinning room.
Nice looking place but the steak was cold to warm.

Cliffsnotes version: Food was nothing short of spectacular, but service and atmosphere were a little "douchey" for my taste.
I realize the restaurant had only been open a few weeks when we went in January, but honestly cocky slow service is never appreciated.
The attitude on our server was such a turn off, especially in a new restaurant, but luckily the food made up for it!
Bacon baguette : This was the only bread offered to us, but mb vegetarians can make a special request.
Best.bread.EVER.
Somehow there was 0 bacon texture, but maximum bacon taste.
You could see tiny flecks of bacon, but you didn't "feel" them in your mouth.
Very interesting!
The artisan salt and butter provided with the bread only enhanced it's awesomeness.
Appetizers: We tried the shrimp, sweetbreads,beef tartare, foie gras yellowtail, and escargot.
Shrimp was good, yellowtail good, but honestly the yellowtail sashimi I had at En over in Henderson recently was better.
Beef tartare good, but Michael Mina's is better (I sound like a total snob, I know!).
The foie gras custard was disgusting.
No one at my table of foie gras lovers could handle it.
Think creme brulee meets foie gras and try to decide if that works in your head.
Doesn't work in mine!
The sweetbreads on the other hand were the best I've had in my life.
If you don't like sweetbreads, by all means give these a chance!
Perfectly charred, awesome flavor..a must try.
Escargot with the homemade ravioli was our 2nd favorite.
Mains: Tried the pork, the wagyu tenderloin and the veal cheeks.
All were nothing short of perfect.
The pork was so tender and served with a delish pork filled canneloni.
Wagyu tenderloin is on my top 10 steaks I've eaten in my life list!
Perfectly seasoned and prepared.
The veal cheeks were a nice surprise.
If you've ever tried beef shortrib but thought "I wish this was fattier and softer!
", try the veal cheeks by all means !
Dessert: Tried the chocolate something or other with warm banana bread.
Great but not 'special'.
The warm sipping chocolate served after dessert was a great surprise.
Overall, definitely worth a try!
If you can get past the trendy douche atmosphere the food is really worth it.

I loved loved loved the decor and atmosphere of this restaurant, was simple, with a level of elegance and class not found to often in Vegas.
We sat at the bar before dinner for a drink; the bartender was super friendly and went over menu items he enjoyed while he made our drinks.
My date was sold on the fact that they had a secret recipe for the best Manhattan in town.
It was fabulous by the way, they use a lemon twist to garnish instead of a cherry, and I think that is what made the difference!
I had a dirty martini of course, was pretty close to perfect!
When we first sat down and I opened the menu I am not going to lie, I was not very turned on to eat anything really, with menu items like pork belly, nothing really stood out to me at first.
We started off with the seared Ahi, which being from Hawaii, was just OK (hardly any flavor), but then came the main course.
I ordered the beef tenderloin, and I have never enjoyed anything so much in my life.
It literally melted in my mouth!
Was the perfect portion size, not too much, but not so small you walk out hungry.
My date had the Pork Tenderloin and it was very rich and flavorful as well, I'm not a huge pork fan, but it was very good.
I will have to disagree with Blair B. we had a great server and the bartender was really amazing, even the hostesses were really friendly.
We didn't save any room for dessert, so I will have to go back to let you know how their desserts are!

I don't have the time to go into too much detail right now, but just wanted to chime in and say that Sage is undoubtedly the most pleasantly rewarding surprise at City Center, and one of the best all around dining experiences I have had this decade.
Every single item brought to our table was excellent, though for creativity, a few stood out in particular: the steak tartare, one of the best I've ever had; the foie gras creme brulee (see pic), sweet and savory in equally strong dose (F-me good); the ricotta gnocchi with root vegetables, the sweetbreads, the tenderloin,the pork loin and the scallops were all simply perfect.
They have some nice handcrafted cocktails, a cute absinthe cart, and desserts were up to the task of ending a perfect meal with solid punctuation.
The dining room and lounge are comfortable, chic, sexy, cozy and lively all at once.
Nicely designed.
You'd think I had money invested in this restaurant--I wish I did.

I had appetizers and drinks at the bar.
The staff was really wonderful and accommodating.
The food was top notch.
They have a very high quality and inventive cocktail menu.
I would like to return here for dinner sometime.
It was expensive, comparable to other fine on strip restaurants.
I really liked the dining room.
It is pretty big, and the tables are spread very far apart, which really gives it a ultra lux feel.

The room at Sage was the most pleasant of all of the restaurant that we visited on our first venture to the new Aria resort.
Very cool design and a generally cool vibe made for a good start.
We sat at the bar and had great service from the bartenders.
As we sipped on a very good bottle of red wine and enjoyed a trio of appetizers the restaurant did get a bit busy and it was good to see things picking up for them.
Service and ambiance alone would get five stars from me, however the food, all though well conceptualized just simply was not seasoned properly.
This just leads me to believe that they are still working out the kinks and training the staff to properly prepare the items.
A little salt and pepper goes a long way, and unfortunately they didn't seem to have any in the kitchen on this night.
Overall, I think that this restaurant will do well, and I will back to have a full dinner sometime soon.
I'm pretty sure that they will have things ironed out soon.

We had a 9 people in total.
This place is very large but NOT setup to have a party larger than 7 at a single table, -1  The place was empty on a Monday night, which might be expected, which was perfect for the enjoyment of the conversation - not sure what it would be like normally.
The menu options were nice and it was difficult to decide.
I chose the Kobe Flat Iron steak, medium rare.
It was a tad over cooked but very tender - as I would expect.
The flavor was a bit lacking.
The apps are not really made to share.
Though they were good, they need more 'group friendly' apps, -1  The deserts sounded creative and flavorful - on paper.
I guess it is the magic of the English language BUT that magic could not make them taste good.
They were below average, at best.
-1  The entree's do no come with any veggies - only starch sides.
They did provide some nice greens when I asked.
I try to eat healthy so green veggies are a must - no salad is not enough.
Wine selection was good but that is no trick in Vegas, or anywhere else where just the dinner will be min $50 per person.
I would not likely go back here... based on the price/flavor ratio there are FAR BETTER.

New American food.
Dime a dozen.
Do it well, you'll do fine, get a michelin star and hang around on a safe/non-memorable menu.
Do it poorly, you'll be out of business in 6 months.
Thankfully Sage is more of the former than the latter.
The dining room and decor were very nice.
dark, rich colors, tasteful art and great floor plan layout.
I liked the fact that there is lots of room between tables so it doesn't feel like you're shoehorned into a dining room concerned about turning tables or packing it full.
Food was solid.
very good.
spectacular/original?
not quite, but safe, solid and focused on quality ingredients.
Appetizers are sized/plated for individuals, but the portion is big enough to give 2-3 people a bit or two and still have enough leftover for your self.
I had the beef tartare which was super rich and good, but the consensus was the red snapper carpaccio was the star appetizer.
The appetizers were all very good (even better than our entrees).
I had the scallops with red wine reduction, mushrooms and pieces of braised oxtail.
It was a bit over salted and I thought was missing a starch or veggie side.
overall solid.
I also got to try the the braised short ribs which was good in a small portion but almost too overwhelming to eat a plate of it.
The veal cheeks were tender and was probably the most impressive entree.
We didn't have desert here, but they have an absinthe cart and put on a little show by lighting it on fire which was pretty cool.
Staff was attentive and nice.
Overall, it's a solid choice for dinner and they did NOT offer bacon bread.
They changed it to an herb bread or a cheese bread about a week ago...sad times for the lack of swine bread.

With our hotel reservation, we also received $100 dining credit to use at the new Aria Resort and Casino.
Lucky for us, Kevin Eats just wrote his reviews on Bar Masa, Sage, and Julian Serrano.
After reading Kevin's review, we like Sage the best, and decided to use our dining credit there for dinner.
We made an early reservation for dinner because we had a show to go later that evening.
We arrived about 10 minutes before our reservation, but they weren't ready for us.
So we sat outside and did some people-watching.
A lot of people came to look at Sage's menu, but not too many people actually went into the restaurant.
I tried to peek into the restaurant while waiting outside, and took a picture of the very pretty bar area.
We were seated in the bar area.
Our waiter gave us a tour of the restaurant.
I didn't even know they had a big dining area in the back.
So why didn't they seat us in the dining area?
Dr. P ordered me a Desert Shrub.
He said he knew I'd like it, and he was right.
This cocktail tasted like sweet fruity champagne, and it was sooooo good.
Dr. P ordered himself a glass of Zinfandel.
The meal started with bacon roll.
There were bits of bacon in the bread.
Pretty tasty.
They gave us butter and sea salt to go with the roll.
I used some sea salt on mine, and it tasted.... salty.
Dr. P was like "you know why?
Because it is salt!
Duh.
"  Our waiter told us all about the amuse bouche, but I only remember there were artichoke and bacon on that spoon.
It was a one bite amuse bouche.
Honestly, I didn't taste anything.
It was like I was chewing on something, but it didn't have any taste to it.
Sage's appetizers all looked so good on the menu.
We decided to order 3 appetizers and 1 main entree to share.
Pacific Yellowtail Crudo was one dish that our waiter recommended.
Melt in your mouth raw yellowtail sashimi was served with trumpet mushroom and pine nuts.
There was a big piece of black winter truffles in the plate as well.
The yellowtail sashimi was really fresh.
I love the trumpet mushrooms.
A manager came and asked us how the dishes were.
He mentioned that Pacific Yellowtail Crudo was one great dish that they are proud of, but he thinks they need to work on the presentation a little more.
I thought the dish looked fine, and it indeed was a great dish!
I have never had sweetbreads before, but always wanted to try it.
I let Dr. P did the ordering, but this was the one dish that I requested.
From Wikipedia:  Sweetbreads are the thymus (throat sweetbread) and the pancreas (heart or stomach sweetbread), especially of the calf and lamb (although beef and pork sweetbreads are also eaten).
The manager told us the sweetbreads they used were throat sweetbread.
The taste is milder than the pancreas.
He said that sweetbreads generally doesn't really have any flavor, which allows a chef to be creative and does whatever he likes with it.
The sweetbreads tasted creamy and rich.
The texture tasted a bit like firm tofu to me.
It was pretty good.
I think the chef at Sage must love bacon.
He uses bacon in a lot of the dishes.
Wagyu Beef Tartare was a very rich dish.
The flavor of the beef with chives was delicious.
The beef mixing with the egg yolk tasted creamy.
For the main entree, we ordered Belgian Ale-Braised Short Rib.
The waiter told us the short rib was braised for 36 hours.
It was very tender, but a bit salty.
Again, it was a rich dish.
The portion wasn't big, but the rich flavor made us full really quickly.
After the heavy meal, we ordered a French Pressed Coffee to share.
One order gave us 4 cups of coffee.
I couldn't decide on the dessert, and asked for the waiter's recommendation.
He recommended Canelles de Bordeaux.
I was like "what's that?
"  He said it was a very unique kind of dessert with a crunchy outside and soft inside, and it required to be cooked for like 10 hours or something like that.
When I saw the dessert on the plate, I realized it was canele, my favorite pastry!
Duh, why didn't I realized it was canele?
The Canelles de Bordeaux was maybe a little bit too burnt in my opinion.
The outer layer was a bit too hard, and had a burnt taste.
But the chocolate sorbet was super good.
The "raisins" were too yummy!
At the end of the meal, our waiter brought us two shots of citrus infused Chocolate Syrup.
It was a shot of happiness!
Overall, it was a good meal.
The food was rich and heavy.... very manly food.
Service was exceptional.
Our waiter was very knowledgeable about the food, and very polite and friendly, too.
The decoration of the restaurant is beautiful.
But somehow we still feel like there's something missing here.
We were comparing Sage to Rosemary's.
Both Dr. P and I still prefer Rosemary's Restaurant for some reason.
Maybe Sage felt too formal to us?
Anyway, Sage is still a very good restaurant.
We were happy with dinner, and the $100 credit of course.

First thing you notice when walking into Sage, is how beautiful the space is.
It's divided into two sections, with a nice bar/lounge up front.
And the main dining room in the back.
We were seated in the main dining room & it was very nice & relaxing.
As I looked over the beer & wine list it reminded me of Rosemary's.
Then I remembered reading on another food blog that the sommelier Mike Shelter left Rosemary's to work at Sage.
From my experiences at Rosemary's Mike does a great job with the beer/wine pairings.
Even though the beer list looked superb, we ended up with a nice bottle of German Riesling with our dinner.
We placed our orders & were brought an amuse bouche & warm bread.
The bread (olive?
) with house whipped butter & sea salt was very good.
For apps we shared the yellowtail crudo, black & blue tuna and roasted sweetbreads.
The yellowtail was good, not great (Raku is spoiled me!).
We really enjoyed the bluefin tuna and I loved the sweetbreads.
For mains we had the scallops & gnocchi.
Both were very good.
The scallops had a nice salted caramel sauce.
The gnocchi were light & just melted in your mouth.
For dessert we shared Canelles De Bordeaux & nice french press coffee.
The canelles were good, but the crust was a bit too tough.
Overall a very good experience & we will be back.
Maybe we will try the six course tasting menu, that they offered (whole table has to get it).

I was admittedly finicky on the last night of our stay in Las Vegas (Monday).
My friends had a buffet in mind, but I was determined to have some oysters.
Having bid our San Francisco contingent of friends adieu at Aria, we inquired if the Aria dinner buffett had oysters on hand.
They had king crab legs, but no oysters.
We had passed by Sage restaurant and saw they had an oyster appetizer and I was further intrigued by their vegetarian option menu (I am Pescatarian).
My friends being good sports, said they would join me for drinks if I wanted to eat at Sage.
I knew I was complicating dinner plans but what the hell, it was my birthday weekend after all.
Turned out to be a great decision.
We toasted over Desert Shrub, Tea Rose, and Full Sail beer - all top notch libations.
The Kusshi oysters were exactly what I had in mind and I made one friend a complete convert who never thought much of oysters (she's heading to an oyster restaurant this weekend).
The server was friendly, attentive, and didn't mind that only one of us was ordering an entree.
I had the Sunchoke Tortellini entree upon our server's recommendation and found the dish to be utterly delightful.
The tortellini melted in my mouth like clouds and the flavor - what incredible flavor.
My friends tied themselves over by having a goat cheese beet salad and we all agreed to put Sage on our list of dining places for future trips to Vegas.
It was mentioned to us that the owners of Sage also have restaurants in Chicago - Spring and Green Zebra.
I have dined at both but look forward to trying Green Zebra for dinner since I have only been there for brunch.
Overall, a great dining experience, next time we'll have to give Sage our full UNDIVIDED attention!

This was most likely the best meal I've ever had.
From start to finish, myself, and my table of 8 was amazed at what was put down in front of us - I'm so sad that we don't live closer (although, my pocketbook probably isn't).
Started with the amuse bouche -- ours was a vegetarian bite of artichoke, eggplant caviar among other flavors.
perfectly balanced start to the meal.
We had an option between bacon or olive/asiago rolls -- I'm pescatarian and so went for the olive/asiago - delicious.
Next I split the green garlic soup and the lobster angliotti with a friend.
Both featured fresh seafood (crab in the soup) that was incredibly tender - cooked perfectly.
I had the spring gnocci for my entree (w/ fresh peas and mint).
I've never had such delicate gnocci - it literally melted in my mouth.
I sampled almost all of the desserts, but I think the most memorable for me was the toffee pudding with white pepper ice cream -- equally unique and tasty.
On top of all of the great food we had, the service was outstanding.
We laughed a lot, weren't rushed and felt well taken care of.
A must stop for foodies in Vegas!

I'm admitting that the food was a bit salty overall, but my 4-star rating is completely based on the fact that I had the best martini ever at Sage.
It was a tea-infused vodka drink that had a hint of berries and was not sweet at all!
I could have drank them all night, but stuck to just one.
At the end of our meal, we decided to opt for the absinthe.
It was a drink with a show.
The absinthe cart was rolled to out table by our waitress who prepared our order by putting the alcohol on fire and then pouring the hot liquid into a glass of orange juice.
With the remaining fumes of absinthe, she put the glass face down on a napkin and instructed us to inhale the vapors with a straw, which we did a little timidly.
It tasted like licorice, but not as strong as the last time I had absinthe and couldn't stand it at all.
The drink itself was pretty potent, but again, it was much better than the last time I had an absinthe cocktail at Beso.
Definitely worth it to check out.

All I can say it WOW I do not fit in this place.
I came to this restaurants rocking vans and a jacket and I just felt so uncomfortable and out of place.
This was my first "fine dining" experience.
I never really cared for this kind of stuff because food is food to me.
I am not picky.
I came here with some friends, we are all teens but they still provided great service (some restaurants avoid providing good service to teens because they assume they won't tip anyways).
The first question that comes up when you arrive is "What type of water would you guys like?
" Then they name a list.
My friend was a newbie and she told him "Fiji" is fine.
I was like "holy crap do you know what you just did?
" LOL!
anyways they came with our "Fiji" water then when the bottle was empty they asked if we would like more and unfortunately, someone said "yes" and they opened another bottle of Fiji.
I asked my friends how much do they think the Fiji water would cost.
They said "it can't be that much maybe $4, $5 at the most.
" When the check came we were charged $9 per Fiji bottle opened.
So... $18 alone went to ordering water (which I enjoyed by the way).
I am not cheap but $18 dollars for water was kind of pushing it.
*They served us this bread.
It was decent.
There is a man that comes around to offer you more ( I guess it is unlimited) but being at a restaurant like this we rejected more bread because we didn't wanna look like fatasses.
But god knows we wanted more lol!
*For dessert the chef gave us this free sample of chocolate milk.
I cant use words to describe this.
It was beyond good but you can tell it was super fattening even though it was just a shot.
*They gave us this free thing that hey called "Salad" What was it?
One TINY spoonful of mystery white fluid.
*For my main entree I ordered this fish clam chowder thing.
It came with slices of potatoes (maybe 3 pieces).
There were like 4-5 small pieces of fish and a really thin layer of clam chowder sauce.
It was probably the best thing I've tasted in a long time but the proportion was horrible.
I think it was about $38 and trust me, it does not satisfy.
It would have gotten 5 stars but it was way too expensive for the proportion provided.
But I guess this is how fine dining is supposed to be.
Our bill for 4 people came out to be about $220.
Yeah, the Fiji water screwed us hard.

Sean McClain comes to Las Vegas as possibly the best non "celebrity" chef to ever lace up an apron via Chicago.
Our anniversary dictated I move a little bit up the food chain from my usual favorite, casual restaurant haunts and this seemed like just the big ticket.
So obviously we had higher than usual expectations.
All in all we had a good experience.
The room was really cool.
Tables spaced far apart to afford us a little intimacy.
Big, cool murals lit with blacklight.
High ceilings.
Very cool.
Service was fantastic.
Food was just okay.
Very American comfort foody menu.
Root vegetables and jus' all over the place.
The squash soup was not great.
Too thick and underseasoned.
The rest of the food was just okay for the pricetag.
Some came out cold and presentations were more bistro than fine dining.
It was fine, but I won't likely be back when there are so many other 150/person restaurants out there I haven't checked yet.
Plus there's only so many anniversaries when the sky's the limit.

If you're looking for an adventure for your mouth, Sage is a 5+++.
I had two incredibly unique drinks (one involved chocolate stout, raspberry [framboise] lambec, and brandy while the other contained recently legalized absinthe).
That was followed by three extravagant appetizers and then a dessert with blue cheese ice cream and red wine caramel sauce.
Ask for waiter Jason Blanchett (sp?).
He provided service to be raved about... as I am doing here.
Amazing!

We went to Sage after positive reviews on Yelp.
After walking around the casino the first day and not seeing a lot of people we were a little put off that when we arrived on time for our reservation at 7:30 that they asked us to sit in the lounge.
We're going to order drinks so it's not that we're cheap but it always seems a bit like a hard sell when places do that.
But we followed orders and went into the lounge area.
Not packed by any means.
We found a couple of seats and waited.
And waited.
I know at least one bartender made eye contact with me but no one attempted to take a drink order (and they were moving about taking care of folks away from the bar) nor did we move--by now I was getting a nice pout going.
So we were probably there 10-15 mins with nothing happening as we accumulated chips on our shoulders.
The hostess then came up and asked us our names again and said OK our table was ready.
We were seated in a nice dining room with expansive ceilings and interesting art.
When our server (James) appeared he asked how we were doing and I said with a genuine smile that we were trying to get over our "attitudes" and gave him a speed version of waiting, etc.
He apologized and said they were busy.
A couple of minutes later he appeared with two glasses of champagne compliments of the house.
It was a nice gesture and immediately put us at ease.
The rest of the meal was very impressive as well and I was glad to eat it without being ticked off.
Very nice details on the food and the delivery (each course was explained as it was presented).
There was a tasting menu but we ordered from the regular menu--me lobster ravioli app and pork loin entrée and my wife had a salad app and scallops entrée.
Suffice to say the food was great--we eat out a lot at nice places and this one ranked up there with our Vegas experiences.
And yes the bacon rolls are amazing.
And the chocolate "soup" shot at the end of the dinner was wonderful as well.
So a bumpy start turned into one of our better LV dining experiences.
2 apps, 2 entrees, 1 glass of pinot noir (plus our "free" champagne) and our chocolate shooters (on the house) and the bill came to $145 before tip.
We would highly recommend.

Jeff, the bartender at Sage that helped us, is a pretty awesome mixologist.
He isn't afraid to just hear an ingredient and make up a delicious concoction for you to try.
He knows his ins and outs of liquor flavors, mixers, fruits, and all that jazz.
When Misti Y and I stopped by she was able to sample a most refreshing mixture that contained canton, fresh muddled raspberries, and ginger beer among other ingredients.
I myself had the Tea Rose cocktail.
This is made with tea vodka, rose water, St. Germain, and is garnished with roasted pine nuts.
It's as interesting as it sounds and while I don't think the flavor is for everyone I also don't think it was so offensive or strong that you couldn't drink it if you had to.
Misti and I also shared a tuna crudo and cheese plate for snacks, both of which I really enjoyed.
The cheese plate had 4 varieties on it I believe and it wasn't an overwhelmingly large selection so if you're sharing between more than 2 people you may want more than one plate.
Overall though I can see why Sage is such a hit for yelpers.
I'd love to come back and try proper dinner and more cocktails the next time I'm in town.

We celebrated a birthday at Sage recently.
The food was great, but it wasn't worth the $250 we spent on the meal.
For the entree, I had the veal cheeks and my partner had the braised ribs.
They were all right, but for the price, I was expecting it to be fantastic.
I thought both were a little too salty.
The best part of the meal was the dessert...it was a chocolate dome with peanut butter.
It was to die for!
The service was exceptional, and the restaurant is very trendy and comfortable.
It's nice and roomy inside.

Truly FINE Dining!
Exceptional service with a very warm and welcoming staff.
I have eaten here three times already and can't wait for my fourth.
Everyone I have taken here has loved the experience.
Do yourself a favor and get the Sunchoke and Salsify Tortellini.
You will not be sorry!
I ordered it as an appetizer three weeks ago and haven't stopped thinking about it since.
I highly recommend this beautiful restaurant with sensational food and service!

5 stars for value.
Wine list was decent, food was very good.
Ate in the bar.
service was good, not great or pampering but will serve tastings and will notice things like a flat sparkling wine and replace them without asking.
I would go here anytime I was in Vegas and the Aria/City Center is beautiful .
In fact, if I could manage to be ONLY at the city Center and the airport I would as the rest of Vegas feels tacky diseased and old.
I had a braised short rib, great.
Heitz 2004 Cab.
Steak Tartare, Yellowtail Tuna Sashimi, Cheese and some taste of a dessert.
Everything excellent and I felt the pricing was very fair / affordable.

Sage.
Saaage.
I planned a feast for my birthday.
5 restaurants in 1 day.
The restaurant I was most excited to try?
Sage.
I had read many reviews for this beautiful place inside of Aria in City Center, and had my plan already set.
We were the first people in that evening, as our reservations were for 5:00, which is when they open.
I really wish I could remember our servers name, she was SO friendly and helpful with any questions, and she would chat with us, without it being annoying or uncomfortable.
We had the octopus salad, steak salad, oysters, the (amazing) foie gras creme brulee, and the sweetbreads.
Everything was incredible.
Service was top notch, everything came out timely with great food descriptions (which are like lullaby's for me, soo soothing.
)    While speaking to our server, (I WILL find out her name, because she deserves to be in this review) I mentioned that it was my birthday, and also that I was a culinary student.
Later in the night I asked who the chef was that evening, she told me that Shawn McClain was in, and he then came out and spoke with us.
It was such an honor to meet such a wonderful and successful chef!
We ended our meal with the canneles de bordeaux.
It was an incredible night filled with amazing food, quality service, and happiness.
We will be returning again in June, and I can't wait!

This could be the best restaurant in Vegas right now.
In a city where so many "brand restaurants" never quite deliver and so many restaurants seem to struggle with the volume, Sage  really stands out.
Tons of fresh options, pasta that is made fresh and so good,   We were blown away by all 6 dishes that we ordered but I lost my notes so dont have much to say.
Definitely check it out - you shouldnt be disappointed..

My last night in Vegas, I really labored over which restaurant to choose.
I made the right choice with Sage.
The room is sleek, sophisticated, dark and contemporary.
Aria overall is a contemporary marvel and really something to see.
The food was excellent as well.
The Foie Gras Custard Brulee is one of the tastiest and most unique dishes I've had in over a year.
Both the John Dory and Lamb entrees were very, very good.
The desserts were good and I had the Absinthe "just to say I did".
The service was friendly and helpful.
Overall, I really enjoyed it.

Great night at Sage, located in the Aria hotel Very hip, but not with a feel that you've seen it before.
Try a martini at the pink bar just located adjacent to reception before you enjoy dinner.
We enjoyed the Chef's menu, which included the Foie Gras Creme Brulee.
($110 pp).
We added the wine tasting (another $60 pp), which made the night perfect.
The chef treated us to a few other dishes.
The scallop dish was sinful.
I'm giving this 4 starts because the food and service was very good.
I had two points where I had to think about my rating.
The main course, a strip of beef, was slightly undercooked, which left it slightly chewy.
On one occasion I also had to call for my waiter.
With a bill of $450 for the night, having to ever call for your waiter just shouldn't happen.
The waiter was very kind, helpful and attentive.
Late in the evening though he was missed.
If this was any other restaurant I'd rate Sage as 5 stars.
However, this isn't like any other restaurant, so I'm giving them 4 stars because I want to know if I ever missed the mark, even but for a step.

Sage is a testament to how the vegas dining scene has changed over the last decade.
What used to be a sea of steak houses and restaurnats by tv chefs like emeril and bobby flay has slowly been dotted by culinary gems.
While sage posesses a fine wine list, the beer list is the best I have seen in Vegas at a fine dining establishment.
Among my indulgences were Triple Karmeliet , Rochefort 8, Duchess De Bourgnone and Deschutes Black Butte Porter.
The menu was so exciting that we had a hard time deciding.
We ordered three appetizers to start followed by two entrees.
The roasted sweetbreads were served with porkbelly, chanterelles, creamy polenta and greens.The sweetbreads were perfectly roasted and compimented nicely by the earthly chanterelles and creamy polenta.
A hint of bitter from the greens and sweet/salty pork belly was a bonus.
The ricotta gnocchi with squash and resling reduction boasted a great texture and had a subtle (not underwhelming by any means) flavor.
Lastly, for appetizers, we had the slow poached farm egg with truffles.
Nothing out of the ordinary here, but a perfectly poached egg with truffles.
The essence of truffles with the creamy egg yolk yielded something sublime for the toast to soak up.
For entrees, I had the scallops with braised ox tail.
Sweet perfectly seared scallops with very rich braised oxtail.
The whole dish was nicely brought together by the caramel sauce (which I initially thought might be overwhelming, but was not.
) My girlfriend had the short ribs that were braised to perfection and served with pomme fondant.
Eventhough we were stuffed, we had to try something for dessert.
Our choice ended up being a valrohna chocolate dome filled with a mousse.
If  I remember correctly, there was some sea salt on the chocolate that really extracted/heightened the sweetness.
I think it is quite evident that I enjoyed my meal at Sage.
The service was attentive and efficient.
Atmosphere was relatively romantic.
From the quality of food coming out, it is quite evident that the executive chef behind the concept is in the kitchen.
Definitely a restaurant to watch for (i see a michelin star in it's future)  This restaurant is at the top of my list on my next trip to Vegas.

You basically go to Sage because of the atmosphere, ambiance and curiousity.
We had reservations for 7 and we didn't sit until 7:30.
They do make you wait in the bar area to get you to drink, which is ok, because you want to sit and chat but it was unnecessary.
I had a Saison Dupont and some of the others had notable belgian biers and very good imports.
The drinks were not pricey but on par with Vegas prices.
The wait staff was great, very attentive and hung onto our every word and if we needed something, they were there.
I ordered the octopus salad appetizer, which was very good.
I would recommend this dish.
I had the Pork loin entree, which was almost $40 for a small portion of meat.
The meal was great, everything you would expect from a new expensive restaurant.
Some of the other members of my group were not as impressed.
I don't blame them.
It's not the best restaurant in Vegas nor the hotel.
But it was an experience.
One of the members of my party ordered the Yellowtail Crudo.
Now, what is crudo, we still don't know, but we think it's foam.
Yes, foam.
The dish came out and it was a fish foam with pine nuts.
Wow, $20 for foam.
Not impressive.
The attitude, atmosphere and ambiance were great but I wish we had tried the absinthe but we were full and the absinthe was $25 and up and I think everyone had the fill of expensive stuff that day.
I give this place 2 stars because my meal was very tasty and i high recommend them both but the price is high and the crudo put a wierd spin on the whole night.

Hubby and I were staying at The Aria, a hotel so high-end that are no schlocky snack-bar nor fast-food joints to be found ANYWHERE.
Any random restaurant at the Aria is bound to be good, but Sage is a veritable gem.
Hubby and I love food, and frequent many terrific establishments, but Sage presented us with the most exquisite dining experience we've enjoyed in many a year.
The many four and five-star reviews by my fellow Yelp-ers helped "seal the deal" for going to Sage our last night in Vegas.
We thank you!
I wish I could explain what it is that makes Sage so superlatively great.
The best I can is to say that there is a way the food makes you "feel".
The sensual deliciousness of the flavors, the freshness of the ingredients, the skill and care of the preparations, the elegance of the setting, the artistry of the presentation and  the grace of the staff all come together to elevate the meal into something quite marvelous and magical.
This is everything fine dining is supposed to be, but hardly ever is... Hubby and Ioved the Kusshi Oyster appetizer, six tiny gems that made us feel like a million bucks (oysters are supposed to be an aphrodiasiac, but I cant remember the last time an oyster, tasty as they are, made me "feel" anything!
) Hubby had the pork loin, which was succulent, and the second preparation of a pork canneloni was both luscious and surprising.
I had the scallops, which were enormous and perfectly cooked,seared on the outside and creamy-almost custardy-in the center; simply exquisite.
We were too stuffed for dessert, but the complimentary hot chocolate shot was smooth like pudding,and  the perfect end to this amazing meal.
We would return to Sage in a heartbeat, and recommend the place to anyone going to Las Vegas.

I came here for my 21st Birthday and put together a beer pairing menu for my guests ahead of time.
Sage was entirely accommodating and provided absolutely impeccable service.
The entire staff was welcoming and professional- I was exceedingly satisfied.
To begin with we were brought breads paired with supple butter and Australian sea salt- the sea salt was surprisingly a standout addition.
______ Kusshi Oyster - My favorite of the night, don't miss out on these.
Trust ME.
Kusshi oysters are some of the best ones around.. incredible.
Pacific Yellowtail Crudo- A little bit creamy, but melt in your mouth delicious  I also enjoyed a Glass of  Meursault, Joseph Drouhin, Burgundy (this white wine is phenomenal) & La Fin Dumonde - Perfect with the oysters, a light and refreshing pair  __ Charred Baby Octopus Caponata- Phenomenal highlight- if you even like octopus, you will Love this one.
Slow-Poached Organic Farm Egg- rich and thick, slow poached perfection  Beer: Orval Trappist Ale  Schneider Aventinus  __  For our main course we had the Salmon, which was done with classic elegance, a dish involving a type of Manta Ray- which I found to be lacking in flavor and moisture compared to the rest of the meal, and the Lamb Cheeks ( which I recommend ordering Rare -Med.Rare.
My fiance liked it more well done but I really wasn't a fan) I drank their Cotes du Rhone Clos du Caillou and Chimay Grande Reserve.
Both of these were expectedly excellent.
We enjoyed two desserts, but the Canelles de Bordeaux easily stole the show, with its waffle crispness and coconut ice cream.
Tripel Karmeliet was a perfect dessert Pairing & the Glass of P.J.
Vlackenberg Eiswein, "Madonna" for me as a little extra indulgence was slightly thicker and sweeter than I prefer, but wonderful all the same.
Another guest of mine enjoyed the Sauternes from the menu which wasn't as smooth as I was expecting.
Each of the beers had its own special glass in which to pour to bring out each beer's individual notes; as it should be- My guests were especially impressed when a cover for an entree was brought to the table when one of our guests wasn't present as entrees were served.
Everything about this restaurant is phenomenal- from the ambiance down to the luxurious paper our bill was printed on.
I could not have had a better experience.

The recent Vegas trip was all about exploring the restaurants in the new City Center, and Sage was one of our adventure.
The service, decor, ambiance are all first class, the food was good, but not the best we ever had.
Interestingly, I would rate the freebies the highest: the salmon tar-tare was very tasty and refreshing; the bacon roll was flaky, crunchy & even better w/butter & salt.
I blamed myself not to ask for an additional one; :( and the chocolate butterscotch was smooth and creamy...yum!
For Appetizer, kusshi oysters are definitely "Must-Have"!
The best of its kind!
They are small, but fatty and juicy.
The sauce is incredible as well.
A 5-star here!
For entrees, I had the scallops with braised ox tail.
Huge scallops tenderly seared with very rich braised oxtail.
The mushroom and leafy veggie (don't know what it was, but it was good ) were soaked in the rich oxtail gravy and were actually the best part, in my opinion.
I would give the scallops a solid 4-star.
My husband ordered Belgian Ale-Braised Short Rib.
The short ribs were slowly braised, and were very tender.
Honestly, they were good , but not the best  we have had in other places.
Again, it was a rich dish with big portion, it made him so full that I had to help out :( We both agree that's a 3.5 star dish!

Definitely had to pick a new restaurant to try out while visiting Aria for the first time, and Sage made the cut!
We chose Sage mainly because of the other great reviews we found on Yelp, so thank you fellow yelpers!
Anyways, you won't find another restaurant like this in Vegas right now!
It is really different, but in a nice way!
We loved the well-spaced seating throughout the restaurant.
Great ambiance, as well!
They have a very nice beer selection, so the hubby tried a couple different types of beers and I stuck with a glass or two of cab.
For appetizers we shared the oysters (hubby's pick) and the black and blue tuna (my pick).
Let's just say I thoroughly enjoy my pick and hubby enjoyed his as well, but there wasn't a whole lot of sharing going on, haha.
For the entrees, hubby had the veal cheeks and I had the scallops with oxtail.
The veal was very tender, almost like a stew consistency.
And my scallops were like butter......so very good!!!
A great recommendation from our waiter.
By the end of the meal, the waiter brought us our bill, and I noticed it had a few extra items on it that we didn't have.
We brought this to his attention and he fixed it right away.
Normally, I would have been a little upset at this, but it was an honest mistake as I noticed all the additional items were what was ordered by the couple next to us, haha!
Probably the best part of the meal was the complimentary hot chocolate shooter they give to you at the end!
It was really quite delectable...I think I would have taken a few and called it a night ; )

KK and I are in Vegas right now, since Wednesday, for a conference.
It's always a big dilemma for me when in Vegas.
Do I revisit the place I know I love, or do I try the millions of new restaurants that have opened since I was last here?
On this trip, we've been doing both.
One of the new places we simply had to go to was the Aria Hotel; this much, I knew.
KK made a reservation prior to our arrival to dine at Sage, Aria Hotel's posh restaurant.
The decor at Aria is nothing short of beautiful.
It's a great mix of romantic balanced out w/ modern and sharp.
One entire wall of blue light extends an element of fun and lively, but the conservative hardware used to design the place makes it intimate and romantic.
Never before have I seen a restaurant that gave so much space in between tables -- privacy was never an issue.
We arrived early to our meal after a happy hour at Social House at Crystals, and the host sat us immediately at a corner table.
The server was nothing short of perfect as far as attentiveness and friendliness.
We ordered a bottle of a New Zealand Sauvignon Blanc and read over the menu.
Everything read beautifully.
I chose to have the sweetbreads and flatiron steak; KK chose the eggplant soup, Kusshi oysters, and pork loin.
The amuse bouche of the evening was a sterling silver spoonful of smoked salmon -- totally underwhelming and entirely too small to form a real opinion regarding this dish.
But then began a wonderful procession of food.
I tried KK's eggplant soup - and never before have I tasted eggplant so delicious!
My sweetbreads were delicious and perfectly cooked.
The taste was not masked by sauces - and it was accompanied by thick slices of pork belly.
How could one go wrong with that?
KK's pork loin was absolutely delicious.
I usually refrain from ordering pork loin due to it being dry, but however Sage cooked it, it was phenomenal.
The true show stealer, however, was my flaitiron steak.
I can honestly say that never before have these lips of mine come together with flatiron (not a normally impressive cut) cooked and seasoned so beautifully, with shaved truffle atop the beauty of this dish.
I had asked for it was "medium rare, but err on the side of err" to which the server replied, "So, rare plus?
"  I agreed, and this was PERFECT.
I licked the plate clean.
So why four stars?
Well, it's the oysters.
I know and love Kusshi oysters but these were subpar -- I've had better elsewhere.
If you're going to dress them yourself and not offer the typical horseradish and lemon, then you best be sure that you dress them well.
The kitchen, however, didn't make such an impressive creation, and any restaurant that doesn't serve their oysters properly cannot be given 5 stars, in my opinion.
We had originally intended to return to Social House for dessert, per the request of the general manager of Social House.
However, given how great Sage's food was, I was inclined to try at least one dessert.
When our server told us about their french press coffee, well -- he had me at "French".
Strangely enough, neither KK nor I remember the pannacotta we ordered.
I do remember the coffee, which was quite delicious, but not the pannacotta.
Very odd.
We simply shared the dessert, then ran back to Social House to try their new coffee and desserts.
Sage is an outstanding new restaurant.
For such a new place, they had their act together.
The front lounge is phenomenal, and the back restaurant is nothing short of impressive.
The meal is expensive, but well worth every dollar.
On your next trip to Vegas, be sure to check out Sage at the beautiful Aria Hotel.
Running around the Aria Hotel from place to place, bar to bar - and having great company was without a doubt one of my best Vegas memories to date.

In a sea of fine dining Las Vegas has become a mecca where star chefs from all over the planet come and place their names on lavish multimillion dollar build-outs.
Kudos to Alex Strata who actually resides here to oversee his pride and joy.
Sage by Chef Shawn McClaine is another great restaurant in every way shape and form.
The menu and wine list are strong and diverse.
The quality of ingredients is definitely there.
Let's not talk about price because you get what you pay for.
We had a party of eight and tried just about everything on the menu except for maybe 3 entrees and 3 vegetarian dishes.
The beet salad was refreshing and sublime.
The sweet breads and veal cheeks were rich, flavorful and satisfying.
Presentation on all the dishes was perfect, balanced and well thought out.
The few weaknesses in my opinion were the lobster ravioli, hamachi crudo and pork tenderloin which was on the dry side.
Lobster dish was decent but just not great.
The sauce lacked somewhat in depth and the ravioli were okay.
Hamachi was not bad, but maybe going with a Kampachi would be a better choice.
Desserts were good and service was very attentive.
All in all it was a very nice evening and the atmosphere was relaxing.
Will return again to try more dishes.

Very beautiful restaurant.
The ambiance, the service, the food...  all amazing.
Pricey, but hey, when in Vegas...  My husband and I went for the prix frixe.
The highlight, the FOIE GRAS BRULEE = AMAAAAZING!
Seriously, I get foie gras wherever I go (like sea bass and lamb, can't help myself), but I've never had foie gras like this.
Brulee style - creamy, smooth foie gras topped with a crispy flamed crust and solid foie gras shavings.
OMG!!
YUM!
The brioche was also very tasty - the perfect vehicle.
As everyone has mentioned, the SKIRT STEAK was also really really good.
Tender, flavorful, melt in your mouth.
The whole dinner was fabulous.
We were so full, but couldn't help finishing everything that was presented to us.
Definitely a good place for a special, romantic dinner.

I love the decor and ambiance here.
Foie Gras Brulee and eggplant soup were rich.
Overall menu was rich, old world classics revamped.
Interestingly the menu and ambiance were descriptive of the flavors.
All very cohesive.
(like Frances).
I would have given it a better rating but I did not like the raw wasu tartare.

My husband and I were blown away by this place!
We are fairly serious foodies and ate here twice during our week long vacation, canceling our reservation at Alex in favor of dining here a second time.
The very first introduction to the restaurant space is the modern glass and wood wine racks creating three hallways into the beautifully rich bar space.
The deep espresso stained woods and rich vibrant purples flow seamlessly from the front bar area to the nearly hidden  dining room.
It is spacious yet cozy with well placed tables close enough together to keep it warm and cozy but far enough away to allow each table privacy and intimacy.
There are large scenes painted on two walls and illuminated in deep purple.
Somehow they almost appear 3-dimensional.
Very interesting viewing!
The menu has a little something for everyone.
On our first visit my husband had the chilled corn soup with Dungeness crab, braised short ribs, and sweet corn panna cotta.
Everything he had was solidly good, but he chose too much corn based food.
Though tasty, Alan Wong's short ribs are better.
I chose the foie gras brulee with warm (melt-in-your-mouth) salted brioche for my appetizer because other reviews raved-O!M!G!!!!!
Warm and cool, sweet and salty, creamy and crunchy all in one!
THIS IS THE BEST DISH I HAVE EVER HAD!!!
EVER!!!
PERIOD!!!!
There really isn't any way one can describe this dish in words and make it sound appetizing.
You are going to have to trust me and everyone else who gushes about this dish and try it.
I would bathe in it if I could!
This was followed by the halibut, solidly good with subtle flavor and perfectly cooked.
For dessert I chose the s'more-also tasty with a deep rich fudgy brownie topped with a homemade torched marshmallow and a graham cookie tuille.
Though not my favorite ever dessert I would order it again.
the parting taste was a small drink of homemade hot chocolate-mighty tasty!
On our second visit (Thursday, August 5, 2010), my husband (a creature of habit) again opted for the chilled corn soup with Dungeness crab, followed by strip steak that was extremely well cooked and seasoned.
For dessert he uncharacteristically chose the plum financier with vanilla milkshake and really enjoyed it (reminiscent of the root beer float at Michael Mina).
I, obviously, HAD to have the foie gras brulee again.
As good as I remembered.
The only odd thing was they served it with only two pieces of brioche rather than four as they did the first time.
Four is perfect for the dish, two isn't enough.
They quickly brought four more when asked, which allowed my husband to enjoy the brioche which he loved (he isn't a a foie fan in any way, shape, or form).
While the main course and dessert were both solid, the start for me was once again the brulee!
At the conclusion of the meal this time the drink was homemade mint hot chocolate.
While not usually a fan of mint, it was quite pleasant in this preparation.
Overall:  YUM!!

awesome service, fantastic veal cheek entree, great oysters, great martini.
would def.
come back.

Awesome atmosphere, service, and food - especially if you're a vegetarian.
They have the best butter & sourdough rolls.
Then there are cold soups for dinner and dessert, awesome eggs & potatoes, very light gnocchi, full bar with specialty cocktails.
Sage are food and drink experts.
My girlfriend had dreams about this place 2 nights in a row.
It rules!

The entrance to Sage is completely dwarfed by the bright and massive entrance to Bar Masa.
As you walk towards the restaurants the Bar Masa entrance is in the center, Julian Serrano to the right, and Sage is off to the left.
Despite having the least appealing entrance of the three, the food at Sage takes a back seat to no one.
At a glance, the menu has a little something for everyone -- steak, seafood, pasta, vegetarian options -- and a few dishes that might make middle America say, "huh?
" (sweetbreads and foie gras custard).
With so many tantalizing options and my limited stomach capacity (sidenote #1: as I get older I'm getting fatter but eating less... my metabolism is shot.
) I wasn't sure what to choose.
So, thank god for tasting menus.
After hearing which dishes were on the chef's tasting menu ($120 pp) it was a no-brainer for my wife and I to get it.
//Amuse bouche// A single Kusshi oyster that went down smoothly then kicked me in the taste buds, thanks to a tobasco sorbet and a tequila-something or other.
(sidenote #2: I never take notes while eating and have a terrible memory, therefore most of my reviews aren't that detailed)  //First course// Yellowtail Crudo.
Delicate slices of yellowtail with mushrooms, truffles, and pine nuts gave this fabulous dish a light, refreshing, and emphatic earthy flavor.
//Second course// Foie Gras Custard Brulee.
I have no idea how this dish is made and I'm not sure i want to.
But, it was the most unique dish of the night and one that was so deliciously sweet and savory at the same time.
Foie gras with the texture of creme brulee.
With bing cherries and salted brioche.
Amazing!
They give you a fork, spoon and knife to eat it and I used each and every utensil to scrape the foie on the brioche or directly into my salivating mouth.
Despite the dish's awesomeness, it's so rich that I can't imagine eating more than the serving provided (and part of my wife's).
//Third course// Lobster Gnocchi.
I love lobster.
I love gnocchi.
Put them together and I'm in heaven.
So light and delicate!
Although the mint and other herbs in the dish gave it a very strong earthy taste.
//Fourth course// Scallop.
I was on a total food high at this point.
I really can't recall many details about the scallop other than it's served pre-sliced, was laying on a bed of risotto, and was accompanied by a slice of prosciutto.
Make no mistake... it was tasty but not as memorable as the other dishes.
//Fifth course// Ribeye.
Several slices of tender beef cooked to a perfect medium rare with some tempura mushrooms (?).
It was so incredibly delicious that I think it may have been as good, if not better, than the ribeye I had at CUT.
//Ah... the ol' palate cleanser// Raspberry Sorbet.
Smooth and sweet.
A perfect set up for the final course.
//Sixth course// Sweet Corn Panna Cotta.
After such a delicious meal this dessert was a bit of a let down.
Call me old fashioned, but I tend to like traditional desserts with traditional ingredients.
The sweet corn taste was good but just a little odd to me.
I'm glad I tried it but it's not something I would crave again.
While the food was exceptional, the service was just the opposite.
Don't get me wrong, it wasn't awful, but it was off-key most of the night.
Let's rewind and start from the beginning...  What a fabulous choice [sarcasm] for management to hire a hostess that hates people, doesn't like to smile, and acts like she's doing you a huge favor by walking you to your table.
After that great start to the night we sat at our table and waited.
And waited.
It was almost 15 minutes before someone (not our waitress but another employee) acknowledged our presence.
Another 10 minutes pass before we get water.
When our waitress finally shows up we mention the slow service and she gets defensive.
Doesn't apologize or anything.
We order drinks and that doesn't come out until after the amuse bouche.
Then on two separate occasions we see a waitress heading towards our table then veer off to the server's station when she sees that our place settings are correctly set.
We knew it was our food because we saw her standing there as new utensils were set, then she finally walked back to our table to deliver the food.
If it happened one time... no biggie.
But twice?
When we're dropping four bills to eat dinner I expect service to be top notch.
Then of course, there's the glasses of water.
It seems like such a simple concept -- if a glass is empty, fill it up.
Not here.
Maybe each guest is only allowed one refill?
We're in a desert after all, so maybe it's so scarce that they're saving it for the waterfall outside of the Aria registration area?
The service did get better towards the end of the meal and our ice princess waitress even cracked a smile and seemed a little friendlier (although in a fake "I really don't care how you're doing" sort of way).
The food here is 5 stars in my book, but they'll have to settle for 4 because of the crappy service.

This review pertains to the Restaurant Week menu.
The Skinny: solid modern twist to some great classic offerings (4) service is warm and efficient (5) value: it's restaurant week - for the level of cuisine, definitely worth and can't wait to try it again (4).
My hubby and I were super stoked to try this place out after all the accolades by the local food critic.
Between the both of us, we tried all the items on the tasting menu (see pics above): summer peach salad, corn chowder, wagyu beef and halibut.
We started off with an amuse of ahi tuna tartare which was nicely balanced in flavour and texture.
The corn chowder with crab really accentuated the natural characteristics of corn - it's innate sweetness and it's creamy texture.
Wonderful dish.
The salad was a truly harmonious dish.
Everything just worked on the plate.
You had the textural crunch of the nuts, the saltiness of the bacon, the sweet/tart of the peaches and the lightness of the butter lettuce.
All these ingredients sung inside your mouth.
The entrees were slightly less successful than the appetizers.
The wagyu sirloin served with boulangere potatoes, onion tart and pickled tomatoes was good but wasn't perfect.
Beef had a nice texture and was seasoned correctly but wasn't anything special.
The pickled tomatoes were delicious with the onion tart.
The boulangere potatoes were a miss - blanched potatoes sitting in a bland rosemary infused consomme.
The halibut fared better.
It was well seasoned and cooked perfectly.
Loved the accompanying vegetables and use of apricots to sweeten the dish.
Dessert was a modern twist on the s'more.
A caramelized marshmallow topping over a chocolate cake with a ginger graham cracker and a serving of ice cream.
I loved the story the pastry chef was trying to convey with the use of pine nuts in the ice cream to remind diners of the woods and campfires (although it didn't really taste like pine nuts, it was a nice idea).
We were also treated to a hot chocolate mixed with espresso which was a nice end to the meal.
Service was friendly and the atmosphere is tres chic.
The manager recognized us from the Wet Republic event (I'm not sure how because it was packed there) the night before and welcomed us to the restaurant.
Overall, given the quality of the food and menu, this place deserves a solid 4 star rating and a return trip to try their non-Restaurant week offerings.

Dined in for Restaurant Week 2010.
Was initially turned off by the maitre d, he was pompus and insincere, fortunately we stuck it out and we enjoyed a meal that exceeded our expectations.
There were no further snafus.
Between my husband and I we sampled the entire Restaurant Week menu.
An amuse bouche of artichoke and prosciutto got us started, it was tastier than you can imagine.
We were stoked to see what else was in store.
We snacked on breads, bacon and baguette.
The bacon was the better of the two, but it was nowhere near as good as what Stack used to serve.
In fact it only made me miss it more, but I digress.
Appetizers consisted of a peach summer salad and sweet corn chowder.
The salad was a fantastic blend of fresh well balanced flavors.
The chowder, yum!
Sweet corn, crab and ricotta dumplings.
I was in love.
As for the mains, we had halibut and wagyu sirloin.
The crusts on both were brilliantly executed.
They know how to sear their proteins.
Veggies were all nicely prepared, as well.
The potatoes being my least favorite.
Dessert was a whimsy fun play on s'mores.
Delicious and fun to eat.
I have to say Sage delivered and I'm looking forward to a return visit.

Dinner was AMAZING service was FANTASTIC .
TEA ROSE cocktail GLORIOUS .

1 star for beautiful decor - next time, I will try to get one of the cool looking booths for 2.
1 star for attentive service 3 stars for the amazing foie gras brulee!!!
Definitly unique.
sweet and salty and perfect.
I had the Restaruant Week Menu with  corn chowder, halibut, and chocolate smores dessert.
Food was excellent.
My  husband ordered the Foie Gras Brulee appetizer and the Kobe Steak.
I stole the appetizer.
It was so  yummy.

August C and I met for dinner here last night, and we had a thoroughly enjoyable meal.
We each ordered the four course Chef's Signature menu.
Sage is in the Aria Hotel and Casino in City Center at the end of the entrance near the registration area for the hotel.
We started with an amuse-bouche.
I have forgotten the ingredients but it was a good way to get us ready for our fine meal.
For the first course, we got the same thing - Wagyu Beef Tartare prepared with crushed caper aioli, a poached egg, and some crispy chocolate pieces like small potato chip slices with a chocolate flavor.
The texture of the Wagyu was excellent.
The starter came with bread pieces to eat with the Waygu or spread the Wagyu on.
Very interesting and tasty dish.
For the second course, we each got the Lobster ravioli.
It had a lemon and olive puree, some corn pieces, mascarpone, and fresh mint.
This course was very tasty.
The mint gave the dish a good counterpoint to the olive oil and lemon puree.
For the third course, I got the Iberico pork loin done with bacon, braised shoulder cannelloni, and tomato.
August got the Snake River Farms New York steak strip with marrow, potatoes and fried Maitake mushrooms.
We enjoyed our respective main courses.
For the last course, August got the Sweet Corn Panna Cotta and I got the Chocolate S'mores.
The panna cotta had marinated apricot, caramel Ice Cream, and a popcorn tuile.
My S'mores consisted of a milk chocolate brownie, some smoked marshmallow laid out lengthwise over the brownie, a a Greek yogurt sorbet.
There was a piece of graham cracker cookie next to the brownie/marshmallow piece and some chocolate swirls.
It was very tasty, but I thought it could use a little bit more marshmallow.
Dinner ended with a small cup of hot chocolate with a shot of espresso.
A super way to end a good meal.
Service was excellent.
The restaurant is quite beautiful.
This is a place to which I would return.
It was a nice dinner and lots of pleasant conversation.
This will also teach our wives a lesson or two about leaving us in Las Vegas while they're off visiting family.

fancy shmancy!!!
my big brother came into to town and took me  out to dinner at sage, to start out with the service was wonderful!
Our waiter was super friendly and helpful!
We got the signature menu and everything was delicious, beef tartare was amazing!
There was also a dish with scallops in it that just melted in your mouth, we also ordered one of every dessert =D and I loved them all!

My buddy and I stopped in without a reservation on a Saturday night.
We were hungry having just flown in a couple of hour earlier... and wanted a good meal.
We both looked like crap!
we are two guys in our 30's, shorts and mismatched shirts... we probably should have been told no, but were told that we could eat in the bar if "we wanted.
"   Great!
No one knows us in this place... so we sat down at a table for two in an open area in front of the Bar.
My friend started on Beer and I jumped into Appleton Rum.
Our waitress was an all star... she could have taken us as a bad investment, but she did not.
After 4 courses and 4 drinks each our bill and tip was $300.
We sat there and people watched and discussed life for 2 hours and never felt rushed.
I must say, that we were fish out of water, and next time I will dress up a bit more.

Simply the best meal I have had in a while.
And they have a Vegetarian Entree section on the menu.
This makes my wife happy, as her meal isn't an afterthought.
Well done.

Cool bar/restaurant in the new City Center.
Great drink selection...specialized absinthe drinks, Belgian beers.
Food was very artistic...foie gras was the best I've ever had.

Whoa baby!
I have to thank my fellow Yelpers for this one because without your reviews, I probably would have gone right past Sage.
This restaurant was the only part of my experience at the Aria that was without flaw.
The decor of the restaurant is sexy, urban, chic.
Stroll past the imposing wine cases into an environment that closes out the casino completely and focuses on making your taste buds so very happy.
My first thumbs up goes to the bar staff.
Very well executed classic cocktails.
Though I did not sample the wines myself, another couple that were local, explained to me that they come to Sage just for the wine selection.
Try the Sazerac if you're inclined to enjoy something with some whiskey in it.
The bartender really enjoys making them and she made a beauty.
On to the food.
The amuse bouche was a generous spoon of a tuna tartare that was excellent.
It was the starter that let me know all you Yelpers had done me right.
I had the Waygu Beef Tartare.
It's served with little crisps of chocolate.
I would have never imagined that pairing, but it sure worked well.
An exceptional starter.
So how do you top that starter?
A Kobe Flatiron steak did the trick for me.
It was topped with some shaved truffle, baby carrots on top of a neat little potato deal.
The steak was perfectly prepared and carved for me to appreciate all of it's medium rareness.
The quality of the beef was apparent and it was exceptional.
I forgot what the little potato thing was, but it was very thinly sliced and transformed in such a way that it did not resemble a potato product in appearance.
While I was tempted to indulge in dessert, I knew I had a long evening ahead of me, so I enjoyed my Sazerac and promised myself I would be back, oh yes, I will be back :-)

definitely a huge meal splurge.
Came here spontaneously for our first night's dinner in Las Vegas.
It was a friend's 21st birthday so I didn't mind spending this much on a fanciful dinner.
Seeing as though we didn't have any reservations, with some contacts, we started making last minute phone calls to any restaurant names we had.
After having been told that it would be over an hour wait here, we asked a contact to help put our names on their list.
Finally doing so, got our names on the list and were seated immediately (there were enough tables for possibly 5 parties, why they said it'd be over an hour wait?
no clue).
The restaurant is beautiful.
It's dimly lit, hostesses are tall and gorgeous, waiters and servers have great manners, and it just makes you feel rich and proper even when you're not.
We ordered one of the cheapest wines for the table.
Delicious mixture of sweetness and bitterness.
It was evenly distributed amongst the five of us and was worth every drop.
Complimentary bouche of tuna tartare was D-E-licious and the complimentary bacon/sourdough bread with whipped butter and salt??
ahhhh salivating thinking about it.
As for the actual meals...we each ordered separate meals but I don't recall any of us extremely satisfied with it.
I ordered the gnocchi which was prob one of the most decently priced and tasty.
There was one who ordered steak and another who ordered lamb, both of which had quality taste.
My problems, however, is the fact that the restaurant priced everything soooo high when the food isn't THAT exceptional.
Also, the mood is great and everything but honestly, I can make the same lighting with candles at home.
Another flaw...the items recommended by our server (two ordered based on recommendations) were not all tasteful..literally, no taste.
But overall, good experience with the complimentary foods.
drool

Great new American food in a modern, cool setting.
The ambiance provides a strong contrast to the simple, well edited, delicious food.
First the lounge menu; the crab and sweet corn fritters or the fig and blue cheese tart are both so good.
It makes me hungry just thinking about them.
Both pair so well with an extra dry Hendricks martini!
From the ala carte menu, the foie gras custard brulee is incredible.
What's not to like after all; its paired with cherries and cocoa.
Yep chocolate.
The Heirloom beet salad is also excellent.
The Braised veal cheeks also deserve special mention.
The flavor is so delicate and the meat so tender.
I was skeptical about trying the restaurant when I first read the menu online feeling that the combinations of ingredients seemed a bit off.
I was thankfully wrong.

Sage is tucked into a corner nearby the Aria hotel lobby.
While it is not Michelin-rated restaurant, the experiences I've heard of about this restaurant have only been positive.
I was looking forward to trying a meal here after missing a chance in my previous trip.
After approaching the hostess for a table at 7:30pm on a Sunday evening, we were led on a lengthy journey to our table near the back of the room by the wall.
The room was spread out, with alternating dark curtains and mirrors, as well as some murals on the wall.
One of the best things about Sage is that the servers and hostesses were hardly pretentious despite being quite formal.
I felt well taken care of without any hint of attitude or arrogance despite the fact that I was under dressed for the restaurant.
As for the food, the menu is quite varied and will likely appeal to a wide variety of people.
One of the main ideas behind the restaurant is fresh ingredients, and some of the menu items are very appealing with that in mind.
We decided to start with a pumpkin soup, but were allowed to taste a spoonful of some sort of raw tuna appetizer, and it was tasty despite the fact that I don't particularly like any types of raw meats.
The pumpkin soup was split for us and was absolutely delicious.
It was pretty rich with pumpkin flavor and little bacon bits and a dab of sour cream that melted in.
For our main courses, we had a Mushroom Risotto and Braised Short Ribs.
Both were extremely delicious, but we made the mistake of choosing two very rich dishes.
We passed them back and forth.
The short ribs were fork tender with fantastic flavor.
They were served in an interesting silver pan along with greens, a small potato side, and some fennel.
I could only argue that it could have come with some more potato.
The Mushroom Risotto was bursting with a variety of flavors, from the normal buttery rice, to a unique citrus burst, to the pumpkin mushrooms that were perfectly tender.
We were quite full, but I really wanted to try some sort of dessert, so we ordered a lemon-thyme semifreddo with roasted grapes and some sort of cookie on the side.
The first bite was unbelievable - the flavor of the semifreddo was so delicious and its texture was unexpected.
Our server brought us some complimentary shot-glass of hot chocolate that basically was so strongly flavored it tasted as if it was literally milk chocolate melted down.
It was a nice touch, and always appreciated to receive those little surprise treats.
Our experience at Sage was top-notch, and I would recommend it to anyone searching for a reasonably priced meal at a one-star Michelin level restaurant (though it is not rated, it has not technically been reviewed with that possibility since there is no 2010 Michelin review).
Our bill came out to 89 dollars pretaxtip, which was definitely within reason as I actually liked the food more than what I had at Bradley Ogden during my last trip (which was very similarly priced).

We went there on a Monday and it was very slow which is sad.
I'm hoping it was just because it was Monday.
The dining room looked amazing.
It was dark, sleek and had black lights which is always a plus.
We chose the 4 course tasting menu.
Everything was delicious and a good size.
The service was good but not very welcoming.
Our server seemed like he was just going through the motions.
I know it's fine dining, but I feel service should not be stuffy even at high end restaurants.

went to celebrate my 5 year anniversary on Halloween in Vegas.
did some research & found this place @ Aria.
very cool spot,  food was great.
by far one of the coolest establishments in LV.
trust me,  think i've eaten almost everywhere on the strip.
they have dishes for everybody,  vegan,  vegetarian,  seafood,  meat,  it's all amazing.
very fresh,  very refined American cuisine.
dessert was out of this world as well.
corkage $35:(

Let's start with the incredible atmosphere; an elegant and calming oasis in the what can certainly be described as "the circus" that is Las Vegas.
The service is top notch and the food delectable.
I dined on the second night of two nights in Las Vegas.
And had I known how amazing they were, I would have come both nights.
Every morsel of food I put in my mouth was perfection, from the roasted pumpkin soup to the atlantic arctic char, and finishing with a round of desserts, I was in heaven.
Truly this has been one of my most memorable meals of the year.

I went here with no expectations.
The layout and design of this place was top notch.
It is sure to impress whoever you take.
The service was also excellent.
The food?
My experience was probably a 1 or 2.
However, my friends enjoyed their food so much, I couldn't see giving Sage a low rating.
I had one of the tasting course options, and I picked wrong on every single choice while my friends actually did have pretty good food.
My pork tasted like honey baked ham, which I absolutely detest, and I wish I was over exaggerating   The rumor was the foie gras is amazing.
I was not impressed.
It was served like a creme brulee (yes, with sugar on top) with a piece of bread absolutely soaked in butter.
It was barely edible for me.
My friends thought it was heaven, but I couldn't not take but two bites, and I usually enjoy foie gras.
It was just too heavy.
The whole meal is extremely heavy.
That's not necessarily a bad thing, but you should be forewarned.
The prices were very reasonable for the kind of experience you are getting.
I just wish my experience was a bit better.

I had dinner at Sage a couple of months ago with co-workers.
I had the braised veal cheeks and the cheese plate.
The veal cheeks were very good and tender.
Nice atmosphere too.
While I enjoyed my meal I probably would only go back if it was expensed again.

Most people come to Vegas to gamble, to party and to sin.
Truth be told, I don't gamble and I can party much harder and sin far worse in my hometown of Los Angeles than I can in Vegas.
My sin in Vegas is gluttony.
Add to that worshipping at the temple of Michelin, whose bright stars cast a long shadow over Vegas, and idolizing the three French gods of cuisine who have set up outposts here (Robuchon, Savoy and Gagnaire), I'd say I have my fair share of penance to pay.
So it's surprising, then, that the best meal of my recent trip was neither Michelin starred nor devised in France.
It was at Sage, Shawn McClain's contemporary American ode to the farm-to-table/artisanal/sustainable/seasonal ethos.
Now, let me be clear, those terms hold no particular draw for me.
I'm just as happy for my produce to be exotic, my fish to be endangered, and my truffles to be out of season.
And this is Vegas, a neon outpost in the desert, a place where money trumps ideology and possibly the least sustainable city in America.
No, what brought me to Sage was that, after the buzz had quietened and the dust had settled on the new CityCenter's more talked about restaurants -- Gagnaire's first US outpost Twist and Bar Masa/Shaboo's $500 hot pot -- Sage emerged as the most interesting new restaurant in Vegas.
Not that Shawn McClain doesn't come with accolades.
Esquire magazine's "Chef of the Year", James Beard winner for "Best Chef Midwest" but it's safe to say he's not a household name outside of Chicago.
Yet.
The restaurant space itself is everything you'd expect in Vegas from the newest Dubai-funded casino on the Strip.
Opulent, expansive, classy and swathed in plum and gold.
This is not a restaurant you wander into from the casino floor.
This is a destination.
And the service there was impeccable.
Probably the best I've received in ANY restaurant.
Ever.
Friendly without being intrusive, knowledgeable without being pretentious, and generous.
Vancouver Island Kusshi Oysters | Piquillo Pepper and Tobasco Sorbet / Aged-Tequila Mignonette I love kusshis by themselves but the piquillo pepper and tobasco sorbet was stunning.
A perfect cold and hot complement to the briny oyster.
With a nod to Mexico, the mignonette sauce was made with aged tequila rather than vinegar.
Heirloom Beet Salad | Duck Prosciutto / Point Reyes Blue Cheese / Roasted Walnuts / Celery Vinaigrette One of my favorite dishes of the night.
Simple in its preparation, the beets were soft and flavorful, the vinaigrette perfectly balanced, the blue cheese creamy, and all sitting atop slivers of duck prosciutto.
Foie Gras Custard Brulée | Bing Cherries / Toasted Cocoa Nibs / Salted Brioche One of the best mouthfuls of food I've enjoyed in '10.
I love foie gras, I love creme brulée, and I can honestly think of nothing better than combining the two.
Except perhaps shaving a torchon of foie gras onto it and serving it with a sweet and salty salted brioche.
Absolutely craveable and made all the better by the complementary glasses of sauternes paired with it.
Crescenza Cheese Mezzaluna | Grilled Mushrooms / Braised Black Kale / Parsley Emulsion Of the two pasta dishes we tried, this was the stronger although nothing extraordinary.
Still, the pasta was pillowy and well made, the mushrooms adding a nice, meaty texture to the dish.
Roasted Sweetbreads | Glazed Bacon / Creamy White Polenta / Marinated Chanterelles I'm a big fan of sweetbreads.
The breading on the sweetbreads here was less crispy than I would have liked although the polenta it sat on was very good, having soaked up all the juices of the sweetbreads and bacon.
Bacon is one of those things I'm really getting over although, thick cut like this and glazed, it was a welcome addition to the dish.
Maine Lobster Ravioli | Lemon-Olive Oil Puree / Baby Spring Peas / Mascarpone / Fresh Mint This dish was a disappointment.
The sauce overpowered the taste of the delicate lobster to the point that I wouldn't have known I was eating lobster if I hadn't read it on the menu.
Overall, oversalted and rather leaden.
Smores Remarkably beautiful and satisfying at the same time.
Did it remind me of childhood s'mores?
I don't know.
I didn't grow up here.
But the bruléed marshmallow was suitably sweet and sticky and the gingerbread crisp a great savory counterpoint.
To finish the meal, the kitchen sent out cups of hot chocolate infused with citrus.
A fun and whimsical way to end the meal and the citrus finish was a nice touch to the chocolate.
So there you have it.
Yes, there were a couple of missed steps but whether it was the gorgeous space, the opulent and classy ambiance, the wonderful service or the company of great friends, this meal transcended its faults and was definitely greater than the sum of its parts.
Possibly the meal of the year so far and definitely the dish of the year for the foie gras custard brulée.
For me, Sage is the best bet at CityCenter.
And, as I said, I don't like to gamble.

We had an amazing experience here.
There were only a few other guests here while we were dinning so things were very intimate.
The food and service was beyond 5 stars.
The ambiance is amazing.
Dark, intimate, and classically modern.
Being here just felt right.
They have a million people on staff.
One person brings you to your seat, another person pulls the chair back for you, another bring silverware, another does drinks, etc.
you get the point.
Their fresh baked breads were amazing and constant!
They had bacon bread rolls made every 20 minutes, they were amazing.
The Amuse-bouche was a tuna tartar that really set the tone for the evening.
We ordered the Wagyu tartar and sweetbreads for the appetizer, they were insanely good and fairly priced.
The Wagyu was served with a chocolate crisp and mixed with the most delicate of ingredients topped with an egg yolk.
The sweetbreads were lightly battered and confit in bacon lardo, the sweetbreads go down as one of the best dishes I have had.
I had the veal cheeks, I have had veal cheeks before and this is by far the best that I had.
They were cooked to perfection, I cannot say anything bad about my dish.
This place truly deserves its Michelin stars!
The prices are so good considering what you get.
There were 4 of us, we had 2 apps, 4 meals, 2 bottles of wine and dessert all under $400?!
This is insane for 4 people at a Michelin rated restaurant.

Foie gras brulee!!!!!!!!
Why have I never tasted this before?
This officially replaces sticky toffee pudding as "sex on a plate".
I went here before seeing Cirque du Soleil's "ka" At the MGM grand (it is right across the street located in the new and very beautiful city center complex) and I have to say that the meal was even better than the show (because the show was pretty cool--I mean the moving stage is genius and what they do on it while it's vertical is the coolest part of the show).
We arrived early and I had a sublimely subtle sage martini at the bar before sitting down in one of the very mellow eggplant-colored dining rooms.
The amuse bouche was this delicious tuna tartar with pureed sweet potatoes, the orgasmic foie gras I already mentioned, and the skirt steak was cooked right--medium rare--with almonds and thinly sliced new potatoes.
My boyfriend had the veal with mushrooms and it was so buttery and sensual that I was tempted to eat his entree as well.
The cheesecake hit just the right texture and hint of pucker, but the real end of the meal came in a tiny cup from the chef--an orange hot chocolate that was so perfectly blended and balanced with a rich cocoa flavor and not a trace of bitterness, and not overly sweet either, that I couldn't help but do that shuddering sigh that only true happiness can induce.

Charred octopus salad, Duck Confit....  all good what can say.....  except for the killer bacon bread.
A must to go to.

My family and I dined here for Christmas Eve dinner.
We had the option of choosing the Christmas prix fixe menu (3 courses, $75) or Chef McClain's Signature prix fixe menu (4 courses, $85, $50 optional beer or wine pairing).
We all chose to go with the Christmas menu, with each of us ordering different items from it.
After ordering, we were delivered bread.
No bread basket.
Each person was given a bacon bread roll (a round bread roll with bacon in it!
) and a little sour dough baguette.
Both were delicious, especially when topped with the butter and sea salt brought for the table.
Then we were brought an amuse bouche, which was delicious.
It was pumpkin seeds, a piece of oven-dried tomato, some kind of tangy cheese I can't remember, and probably some other things - but so delicious.
Just a very small bite served on a silver spoon.
For the first course, we had the Taylor Gold Pears & Shaved Brussels Sprouts, Foie Gras Custard Brulee, Wagyu Beef Tartare, and Vancouver Island Kusshi Oysters.
All were delicious!
The foie gras and tartare, though, were very rich - almost too rich to finish the entire serving.
For the main course, we had Dayboat Scallops, Braised Veal Cheeks, and Grilled American Skirt Steak.
Again, all were delicious!
Best scallops I've ever tasted.
The braised veal cheeks had such a good flavor.
And the skirt steak was nothing like what I usually think of when I think of skirt steak (which was a good thing).
For dessert, we had the Honeycrisp Apple Tart and Dark Chocolate & Espresso Mousse Cake.
Both were great, but neither were "wow" desserts.
The cocktail, beer, and wine list was great.
I especially appreciated the beer list.
It was filled with the type of beers one would actually have with such a type of meal.
Classy beers with tremendous flavor profiles that pair well with the food.
The service was pretty much outstanding.
Only complaint is that despite the server asking what our plans were after / if we had any time constraints (we were promptly seated at 5:00pm and had tickets for a 7:00pm show), it was 6:25pm before we got our dessert course and 6:45pm before we got our check (after flagging him down).
Ultimately, it all worked out, but we felt a little frazzled as we didn't want to be late for the show.
The decor and atmosphere is perfect.
It's an amazing and enjoyable dining space.
Understated purples and golds, just the right size tables, etc.

Full review in the blog.
Highlight courses below.
I must say that the dining room at Sage is amongst the most dramatic in Vegas.
High ceilings, excellent spacing, minimalist art on the walls, plenty of dark tones and piano finish, plus ample lighting at each seat without being too bright between tables - the word "sexy" comes to mind immediately.
With ambient forgettable music playing overhead the location and setting does not hide the fact that you are in Vegas, but at the same time you feel miles away from a "casino restaurant.
"  Not as secluded as Savoy, Robuchon, Twist, or Alex, but a different experience entirely - Sage feels accessible, a place where a drink and appetizers, a course or two a la carte, or a tasting menu are equally valued and nice jeans and a button down shirt look just as appropriate as the Tom Ford suit you could buy next door.
Beginning the menu proper my first course would be perhaps Sage's most famous dish - the Foie Gras Creme Brulee with Blood Orange, Gran Marnier Glaze, Cocoa Nibs, and Salted Brioche.
Cracking the crisp crust and taking a bite the custard was ethereal - light yet harboring the very essence of liver with notes of egg, orange, and cocoa largely detectable on the palate more so than the tongue.
Eating slowly each bite was as good as the last and pairing the custard with the crunchy and buttery brioche was every bit on par with the best torchon I've ever had - at The French Laundry - and if possible Sage's version was even lighter and more flavorful.
Already abuzz with anticipation of what could follow such an incredible opening act my second course would prove equally competent.
Titled Yukon Gold Potato Gnocchi with Smoked Ricotta Cream Sauce, Truffle Puree, and Parsnips the pasta was absolutely flawless - pillows of potato accented air that dissolved on the tongue.
Utilizing crispy parsnips and fresh spinach for textural variation while liberally topping the plate with fresh shaved truffles and a pleasantly subtle cream sauce with hits of parsley and chive the entirety of the amalgam tasted something akin to a baked potato with the aroma of truffles.
As good as the foie gras and gnocchi were, my favorite savory of the meal would turn out to be the fourth course - Slow-poached Organic Farm Egg, Smoked Potato, Shaved Winter Truffle, Toasted Country Bread.
Always one to favor egg dishes, everything from the presentation to the flavor of this course was immaculate.
Served in a bowl at least 1 foot in diameter with a creamy foam of creme fraiche topped with shaved truffles as the only visual stimulus on arrival, the smell of the dish was that of truffle and smokiness.
Plunging my spoon deep and piercing the creamy egg I mixed slowly while enjoying the aroma before taking a bite - smooth potato gratin, creamy egg, the mild tang of the creme fraiche, and the aroma of truffle rising to the palate.
My sixth plate would prove to be another stunner - and the best duck I've yet to experience in Las Vegas.
Titled Grimaud Farms Duck, Celery Root Puree, Confit Leg, Heirloom Apples and also featuring crispy Fried Kale and Black Mission Figs the duck itself was meaty without being gamey and fatty without being overly so.
With crispy skin the three one ounce slices of duck were perched atop an unctuous and salty confit of leg while the plate was topped with a reduction of fig and balsamic.
Sitting at the base of the plate, a pave of celery root topped with apples and figs - bitter and sweet, multi-textured, and seamlessly melding with the duck forms above.
Warm Brioche Bread Pudding with Roasted Pecans, Myer's Rum Sauce, and Brown Butter Ice Cream was absolutely the best non-chocolate bread pudding I've ever tasted.
Soaked through yet delicately crisp on the exterior the buttery brioche was spongy without being wet or heavy.
Topped with a thick and boozy sauce and then with a quenelle of rich and buttery ice cream the dish found contrast in temperature while crunchy pecans proved a crunchy foil to the otherwise soft and intensely sweet dish.
The first dinner in a truly over-the-top week of eating, I still look back fondly on my experience at Sage.
Call it Midwestern sensibility if you like, but there is simply something to be said for the elegant yet accessible nature of what McClain and team are doing at Sage - the space, service, and prices are nothing like the top tier of Vegas dining - but the experience and food every bit as impressive.

Not much that hasn't already been said ... but, Sage is a beautiful room with knowledgeable wait staff and excellent food.
I really liked how spacious the room was - your not on top of your neighbor, but somehow it still feels intimate.
We were even able to make a dinner reservation the same day!

Second stop on our continuing Aria foodie crawl, part two.
This is the best restaurant of the whole bunch I dare say.
Sage has an excellent selection of beer on tap and our bartender, Brad, let us try a few before settling on a drink.
They have the Dogfish Midas Touch on tap ($12), which is super yummy.
And they serve it in an actual Dogfish beer glass.
Classy!
My husband got a beer cocktail, which is called the European Union ($14).
Youngs Chocolate Stout, Lindermans Framboise Lambic, and Cardenal Mendoza Solera Gran Reserva brandy.
I thought this would be awful, but I tried some and it tastes terrific!
They have Sierra Nevada 30th Anniversary Ale on tap, which is a rare find indeed!
We did not try it because we have a bottle at home but after we try the bottle, we may need to come back and compare it on tap.
Check out my pic of the menu to see what else they have on tap.
For food, we tried the salumi which comes with pickled green beans ($9).
Very yummy.
We also had the poached egg ($7) which comes with bacon (yum!
) and bread to dip.
Very good.
Finally we had the beef tartare ($9) which is topped with an egg perfectly cooked over medium and crispy chocolate flakes.
Sooo good, I could not stay away.
Portion sizes are reasonable.
Not too tiny, but not overwhelmingly big either.
Apparently you can only get the bar menu at the bar - and they have some really special items there so I suggest you check it out.
The bar only has seating at the bar.
There are two round tables in front of the bar but those are only for people waiting for a table.
Also, they serve beer in 64 oz growlers but our bartender did not recommend it.
First, it results in a messy pour and, second, the beer gets warm too fast.
Apparently, when the restaurant first opened they thought it would be a good idea to sell beer to go in the growlers.
But Aria put a kabash on that.
According to our bartender, it's all good to have people running around with big ass margaritas in glasses or plastic yards but not beer in growlers.
They serve the full menu at the bar as well, and we debated trying the famed foie gras creme brulee but we were getting full and had a few more restaurants to try that night.
Next time!
I highly recommend checking out the bar next time you are in Aria.
It's not very expensive as compared to the nearby Todd English PUB but is much nicer with much more interesting beer and food selections.

4.0 Stars  When you first walk into Sage you'll pass by the two tall glass wine cases that make up the entry way into the bar area.
Past that and you'll enter the main dining room that is elegantly lit with purple and yellow lights.
I wonder if the head chef is a Los Angeles Lakers fan?
The restaurant has high ceilings that help round out the posh interior.
As others have mentioned, the interior has sexy and chic written all over it.
Our party dined here on Christmas and were offered two prix-fixe tasting menus to choose from: Christmas Menu consisting of 3 courses for $75 or Chef McClain's Signature Menu consisting of 4 courses for $85.
Our server requested our whole table decide on either the Christmas Menu or Chef McClain's Signature Menu and we all opted for the first choice.
The first items brought to the table was our bread.
We were offered two varieties that included a Country Bacon Roll and a Sourdough Baguette.
On the side we had Sea Salt from Australia and Butter from Las Vegas.
Who would've thought there were cows in Las Vegas?
Our group got a good laugh out of that.
The bread was warm and delicious.
I could really taste the bacon flavor infused into the roll and it was scrumptious.
Next came our Amushe Bouche, which was a Berratta Cheese with Pumpkin Seeds and Roasted Tomatoes.
It was served on a wide silver spoon that made it easy for a single bite.
The cheese had a texture smoother than mozzarella and the pumpkin seeds had a subtle mustard flavor.
I liked it.
My 3 course Christmas Menu consisted of the following:  Wagyu Beef Tartare *Crushed Caper Aïoli/Slow-Poached Egg/Crispy Chocolate *This was a unique interpretation of beef tartare because it tasted like it was mixed together with mayonnaise or cream.
It reminded me of eating the potato salad version of beef tartare.
*The egg had an interesting texture because I was expecting the yolk to burst when punctured.
On the other hand, the yolk had a solid texture that made it easy to spread onto the 4 slices of toast provided.
*The crispy chocolate made the dish stand out because it added a change in texture.
The chocolate pieces were very thin and accentuated the already crunchy toast.
I couldn't taste the chocolate flavor though.
*This wasn't the best beef tartare I've had, but it was an unique interpretation.
Braised Veal Cheeks *King Trumpet Mushrooms/Creamy White Polenta/Black Garlic *The veal cheeks were so tender and divine!
They had a robust meaty and hearty flavor.
It reminded me of stewed beef.
*The polenta had the texture of mashed potatoes, but was actually made from white cornmeal.
*The dish also had a crispy long crouton on top.
I presume this was for presentation.
*The mushrooms and garlic complemented the flavors of the dish really well.
*I really enjoyed it.
Honeycrisp Apple Tart *Apple Butter/Sour Cream Gelato *This was a great way to finish off the meal with something sweet, but not overpowering.
I tried the other dessert: Dark Chocolate & Espresso Mousse Cake and it was too bitter and heavy for me.
*This was very similar to a piece of apple pie with a scoop of ice cream on the side, think Apple Pie ala Mode.
After dessert, our group was presented with one last gift from the chef.
It was a Winter Spiced Chocolate Soup that had strong herbal/ginger flavor to it.
It had the consistency of hot chocolate.
The general consensus wasn't very good within our group because it had a funky taste.
I had a good overall experience from Sage.
There were definite hits and misses amongst my meal, but with such an elegant and chic atmosphere and great service I bumped up my review to 4 stars.
I rate the food 3.5 stars mainly because it wasn't phenomenal given the fact it had a hefty price tag of $75 for 3 courses.
Despite this fact, I'll still recommend trying it at least once.
== A MUST TRY!

The food was really good, however the service was terrible.
This place needs a staff attitude check.
I wanted to ordered more drinks and food at the empty bar, but they were bar staff was too busy planning their own after-hours.
I expect long-term this place won't last if they don't get get a whole new staff.

one of the best, if not THE best, meals ive ever had the pleasure of experiencing  arrived early for our 8:00 reservation and promptly took seats at the bar for a pre-meal cocktail...  asked for bartender's choice on the cocktail and after some poking and prodding on his part - hey, its your choice bartender, hence the phrase - i was delivered the Aviator.
not bad, imaginative, but not necessarily memorable.
however, the Kumomoto Oyster (Piquillo Pepper, Tabasco Sorbet & Aged-Tequlia Mignonette) was absolutely wonderful and a sinful treat before the food deliciousness that was about to unfold.
as others have said, outside of the 4-Course Signature Menu, Sage doesn't offer any other type of degustation or tasting menu.
so to work around this, my sister and devised our own plan of attack.
we each opted for the Signature Menu, but instead of ordering the same item, we ordered different items for each course, which we then shared between us.
in addition, we added 2 more courses from the Dinner Menu to share plus the 8 from the Signature Menu, thus bringing the total to 10.  my sister isn't a huge wine drinker so she stuck to a single beverage throughout the meal, but i added the wine pairings, and because we were essentially having 8 items off the Signature Menu, i was provided with 8 individual wine pairings, plus 2 additional pairings for the added courses at the recommendation of our server and the Sommelier.
long story short...  the meal was epic.
nearly everything was outstanding.
the only item that didnt really impress was the Gnocchi...  not so much because it wasn't good, but because the other courses were just so clearly that much better.
let me fall in line regarding the Foie Gras Custard Brulee...  savory while sweet, words cannot describe it, and paired with a Ch.
Gruriad Sauternes, just...  well...  amazing.
the dining room is a fun, chic place to eat, with more then adequate spacing between diners...  they couldve easily fit more covers into the dining space, but for whatever reason chose not to, perhaps to accentuate the experience.
the service was also spot on and excellent.
our server was fantastic, knowledgeable, and very helpful when my sister and i were working through the menu figuring out how we could go about our own tasting menu.
just for reference, ive listed out the courses (and order) we chose below, a *denoting a course we added to the Signature Menu.
with the wine pairings and my sisters cocktails, total including tax, before tip was about $320...  a bargain in my relative opinion.
all in all, a true dining experience...  and one that i cannot wait to return to in February on the next trip to sin city.
WAGYU BEEF TARTARE  Crushed Caper Aïoli/Slow-Poached Egg/Pickled Mustard Seeds/Crispy Chocolate   FOIE GRAS CUSTARD 'BRÛLÉE'  Blood Orange/Toasted Cocoa Nibs/Salted Brioche   *PACIFIC YELLOWTAIL CRUDO  Shaved Trumpet Mushrooms/Black Winter Truffle/Toasted Pine Nuts   MAINE DAYBOAT SCALLOPS  Braised Oxtail/Wild Mushrooms/Salted Caramel Reduction   MAINE LOBSTER AGNOLOTTI  Roasted Hazelnut/Honeycrisp Apple/Salsify  *YUKON GOLD POTATO GNOCCHI  Smoked Ricotta Cream Sauce/Truffle Puree/Parsnips   IBERICO PORK LOIN  Brussels Sprouts/Crispy Confit Shoulder/Smoked Dates   48 HOUR BEEF BELLY  Chestnut Puree/Fig Glaze/Celery Hearts   BRIOCHE BREAD PUDDING  Roasted Pecans/Meyers Rum Sauce/Brown Butter Ice Cream  CHOCOLATE GANACHE AND CARAMEL TART  Candied Walnut Bombe/Valrhona Chocolate Sauce

My party of five ate here for NYE and sat early for the $90 preset menu.
I had an incredible dining experience here!
We were prompty seated as we came in and the restaurant was pleasantly quiet.
The decor was very nice and elegant and the entryway has all these nice-looking wine bottles.
Our waiter was friendly and I liked how our courses came out at the same time.
With the preset menu, I chose the more exotic French dishes that I've never had before.
I started with a beef tartare, then I had the escargot, then lobster ravioli, then a delicious chocolate mousse.
I thought everything was delicious but I don't have any experience with these French dishes.
Honestly, I don't think I will jump at the chance at having beef tartare or escargot again, but I think that is probably just my personal preference and it has nothing to do with the quality of the food served.

I really liked the atmosphere of the restaurant and the food was delicious.
It's definitely pricey so you'll have to expect to shell out over $50 a person, unless you plan on starving on the way out.
The service was a bit slow and I'm not sure if it was because we had a big party but it seemed they forgot about us at times.
It also could've been because we were being a bit loud and obnoxious.
Hmmm, so maybe they don't deserve the ding of a star?
Hahaha!
Either way, I still think that if you're paying that much money, excellent service can become an expectation.
It's definitely worth checking out and I would say that I'd go back but with all the awesome restaurants in Vegas with such little eating time during a short vacay, I'm not sure if this is one of the "must go" places on my list.
It was good to try and I'd recommend it to others but I probably won't cycle back through it anytime soon.
I have more restaurants to conquer!

Great Decor, Great Seasonal Dishes with Integrity of ingredientes.
Had many good items but one stood out against allmost anything that I've ever had, the Foie Gras Creme Brulee.
The Foie Gras Creme Brulee with little salted Brioche muffins was one of those dishes that you think about in your sleep; it was paired with a Sauternes which worked perfectly.
A Truly phenomenal dish.

Let me start off by saying this place is expensive, but it's worth it!
My fiance and I came here twice in the same week because we loved it so much.
Both times our server was Jason S. (there are 3 or 4 Jasons there, he's the one with the dirty blonde hair and the great smile).
He was an amazing server and so much fun, which made me happy because we aren't really comfortable with the pretentious servers we usually end up with in restaurants of this caliber.
They start you off with a choice between several types of bread which vary depending on the night you go.
The country bacon roll is sooooo good.
They then give you an amuse bouche, which also varies by the night.
The first night we were there it was raw tuna.
I was surprised to find out that it was better than any fish I had ever had from any of my favorite sushi restaurants.
Even though it's not an actual menu item, they were able to accommodate our request to have the day boat scallops in a smaller size as an appetizer.
They were AMAZING, so soft and buttery and just melted in my mouth.
My fiance absolutely fell in love with the braised oxtail that they serve with this dish too.
I was very impressed that they did that for us since I'm usually met with a lot of resistance when asking for something specialized at a high end restaurant.
Our entree was the 30 oz ribeye for two with beef marrow and mashed potatoes.
The meat was delicous, soft and tender with the most amazing spice rub.
That was the first time I had ever tried bone marrow, and when I took a bite, my stomach said "yum!
" and my mind recoiled at the fact that I was eating marrow.
Yummy, but it will take some retraining to get used to, lol.
Their mashed potatoes were ridiculously good and so buttery.
I wished I could have had seconds.
For dessert we had the chocolate mousse, which was heavenly.
Chocolate covered mousse with a cookie - like crust.
The second time we went, we had the slow poached organic farm egg as an appetizer.
I was a little hesitant on this dish until I took a bite.
It was like a frothy egg soup with potatoes on the bottom and truffles floating around that you scooped up with a buttery toasted piece of bread.
Amazing.
This time my fiance chose the braised short ribs and I chose the scallops.
Again, the scallops were melt-in-your-mouth good.
I didn't remember the mushrooms from the first time, not sure they were in the first appetizer, but in my entree they were delicious by themselves and even better when paired with the oxtail.
Halfway through dinner we switched plates so he could have my oxtail and I could try his short ribs.
They were fall-off-the bone-tender and you could honestly cut them with a spoon.
They had a nice rich flavor and I'm so glad I got to try them.
It doesn't look like an enormous cut of meat, but it's so filling that halfway through, you feel full.
For dessert we had the bread pudding.
This was the only thing I really didn't care for.
It reminded me too much of some not so good fruitcake.
We ended up ordering the chocolate mousse to go to make up for the disappointment of the bread pudding.
If you're ever in Vegas, head over to Sage and ask to be seated in Jason S.' section!

I am an experienced high end diner in Las Vegas, I've tried some very top places including Nob Hill, Joel Robuchons, many Bellagio restaurants, etc..  From the moment we walked in we didn't get the "wait for our table experience" many places try (yes we did have reservations and it was Xmas night), we were taken right in and sat down.
The atmosphere was great and even though we were next to other 2 seaters, we were far enough apart we weren't on top of others and weren't bothered by conversations from other tables.
Drink orders were taken right away, dinner orders were taken quickly.
This is what I expect from high end service.
The food was excellent.
We savored every bite of everything we tried.
The chef even sent out a few items complimentary (we are not VIPs by any means, just casual customers).
I can't remember everything we had, but it was all excellent and the best food I have ever had, and that says a lot considering places I have been.
I can say the Wagyu Beef Tartar was incredible.
We had many servers, all of whom attended to our needs.
We never had empty and finished plates in front of us for more than 1 minute.
Everything was kept clean, and they stayed on top of service every step of the way.
This was truly top notch and I will be back again.

Believe the hype, Sage is spectacular.
The Foie Brulee with the blood oranges is one of the best things I've ever eaten.
The duck was cooked perfectly.
Their dessert menu is also very creative.
They have a very interesting cocktail list including unusual beer cocktails.
For beer lovers, they even have a beer accompaniment to the tasting menu!
We would go back to Sage in a heartbeat.
In my opinion, Sage should not be missed on a trip to Vegas.
Next time we'll roll with the chef's tasting.

One of the best meals I've had in Vegas--and I've eaten at MANY of the top restaurants in the city over the years.
For the price, you can't beat it.
Our group of 7 were all extremely pleased with our meals, and appreciated the refined, yet casual service from our watier.
The foie gras mousse brulee was unbelievably good.
The scallops perfectly cooked.
The dessert (chocolate caramel tart) decadent.
Cocktails were also very inventive.
The atmosphere is dark and warm--a wonderful night out on the town.
Highly recommended!

Indeed, it's a bit pricey and TOTALLY worth every penny especially if you have a discerning pallet.
We were too hungry to wait until 630p so we changed it to 5p and the doors opened promptly as the host invited us in.
I requested a romantic table and appreciated the one that was selected on the side in a cozy corner, away from the center of the room.
Lauren from NJ was our server and her gentle technique and style of sharing the menu was perfect.
We choose to have the chef's tasting x 2 with the exquisite wine pairings.
The Beef Tartare was over top to start and the Chocolate Orange Soup at the end was nearly orgasmic.
What an amazing final touch... and there was more than enough to eat!
Food, service and environment all made for a lovely evening.
Sage is located in the Aria hotel.
It's been open for a year and it was a visual treat for anyone who loves style.
Walking from through the property was a nice warm up to a perfect night.

I'm a huge fan of Chef Shawn McClain, so being able to visit his restaurant within the same hotel that we were staying in was a bonus.
Here's the rundown of our choices:  Wagyu Beef tartar....
Melt in your mouth, stomp your feet, kick your partner under the table good!
The Beet Salad:  roasted red and yellow beets in some sort of slightly acidic vinaigrette with a crisp piece of prosciutto.
One word:  FIERCE  I don't remember what my partner had because I had dived into my dinner and barely remember anything other then really wanting to place my face in the stainless steel bowl and shamelessly lick it clean.
BUT, I had the veal cheeks with the most creamy polenta base and a braised leek with some unknown mushroom variety.
With each bite, I melted and slid lower into my seat.
I don't eat mushrooms....
I've hated them since I was a kid....  but I ate those.
That's right mom....
I ate mushrooms!
A chef's fundamental mantra is for the dish to be a feast for the senses...  Not only was the dish a feast for the senses but so was the location itself....  Everything came together to make it THE most amazing dining experience I've ever had.
THANK YOU!
(By the way, as I was writing this review my mouth started watering as I recalled the experience)

When deciding which upscale restaurant we would enjoy, we turned to yelp for advice.
Once again, yelp pulled through with everyones outstanding reviews of Sage.
We had an outstanding dinner and a very attentive, knowledgable, entertaining waiter.
We both opted for Chef McClains signature menu.
At $79.00 a person you are able to experience the wonderful talents of the chef, through four delicious courses.
No need to discuss each one, they were all equally delightful.
If you have one night to do something special, I would recommend a visit to Sage.

Well worth the trip and expense!!
Tucked away from the hustle and bustle of the Aria casino floor, decorated in rich purple tones, plush velvet seating - it's a true oasis in Vegas-town.
I had the 4-course Chef's Signature menu which was fantastic value at $79, however my favourite dishes were two add-'ons.. the Slow Poached Organic Egg and the Foie Brulee.
The Egg was phenomenal - a delicious, delicately poached runny egg hidden under a creme fraiche foam with smokey potato gratin and topped with shavings of black truffle.
Like the best truffle egg soup you can imagine.
I was very close to licking the bowl - thank goodness for the bread.
I don't even really like eggs, yolks make me kinda queasy - but i loved this dish.
The Foie Gras brulee is another winner - sinful, especially on top of the salted brioche.
Light, airy and mousse-like textured underneath a brulee crust, topped with shavings of torchon.
Yum.
Skip the slot machines, spend your money here instead!

We came here back in December and had the tasting.
Overall nothing short of awesome.
Like other reviewers, the Foie Gras brulee is awesome.
Everything else was spectacular as well.
Definitely a must try if you're in Vegas.

This restaurant is worth every penny!
The service was superb, the food was beyond my wildest highest expectations and they have absinthe.
The absinthe was the main reason we chose this restaurant, not knowing that the food would be amazing.
The one dish that you must absolutely order is the FOIE GRAS BRULEE.
Holy crap!!!
I mean where else can you order that dish?
No where else that I know of.
The Maine Lobster Agnolotti and the shortribs were also top notch.
Even the house bread (bacon bread) was to die for.
We ended the night with absinthe for dessert.
Our first experience...
Tasted kind of like licorice and although it's pretty mild going down, it's like over 100 proof alcohol.
Check it out, you won't be disappointed!

After reading several positive reviews on yelp.com, my wife and I looked forward to our dinner at the Sage Restaurant.
As we walked into the restaurant, the first thing that comes to mind is that it is very dark, warm, and inviting.
The low-lighting, dark purple arrangements, high ceilings, and the art work contributes to this romantic effect.
In the main dining area, the tables and seating were laid out spaciously - it gave the illusion of being not too crowded, but not empty.
Seats were comfortable, but the table was not.
For a fine dining establishment, there were no tablecloths.
It was just a bare table.
It looked and felt rather cheap.
In addition, we noted that most of the tables had a LARGE round base bottom.
Problem with this is that it was difficult to put your feet down  ~ one foot was on the base and the other was on the floor.
As a result, when seated, you kind of feel tilted.
As I scanned the room, I noticed every couple had the same issue.
You think the restaurant's management would notice.
Please replace these tables with something else and put some tablecloths on them.
As for dinner, we made our selection based on the yelp.com reviews.
Our first course was the Foie gras custard brulee.
I ordered one dish for my wife and one for myself.
The blend of the blood orange, chocolates, and brioche was exquisite at the first bite.
At $25 a pop, it can be extremely expensive.
This is where our waiter should have stepped in and advised us to limit this to "one" course that should be shared.
Honestly, 1 dish per person was a bit too "much".
Think of it this way, the first bite is inspiring; however, the more you tastes it, it becomes boring and uninspiring (think of Ricarodo's law of diminishing returns).
Our second course was the slow poached organic farm egg.
This was our favorite dish of the night.
At the base of the dish is smoked potato.
It is layered with a half-boiled egg topped with truffles.
My wife and I loved this dish.
Of note, like the brulee, this was a very rich dish as well.
Unlike the brulee, I would recommend ordering 2 of this (one for yourself and one for your significant other).
Our third course was a light salad.
We shared the Taylor shaved pears with brussel sprouts.
Hmm, this was an okay dish.
At $15, I thought this was way overpriced.
It was a slice of pear, some greens, some brussel sprouts, and bacon.
It probably cost less than a dollar worth of ingredients.
It was quite unimaginative and nothing special.
As for our entrée, my wife had the liberty farm duck and I had the Belgian braised ribs.
With the duck, you basically get like 5-6 sliver of duck meat with some greens under the base.
I travelled the world trying various duck and this was "blah".
There was no punch or much spice.
It was bland!
And, it cost $48 a plate.
Honestly, I could have gone to china town and bought TWO WHOLE roasted duck for $36 and it would have tasted so much better.
This was a true disappointment.
As for my ribs, it was one of the few positives of this meal.
It was cooked perfectly.
The meat peeled off the bone and it was very tender.
The only issue was the plating.
The chef decided to plate this in a round cramped cylinder.
It looks good at first, but when you try to cut the meat and use the fork, it was cumbersome.
This may be a bit of an exaggeration but think of it this way, try cutting a piece of meat in a Campbell soup can... who does that?
Note to the chef, think of plating this in a large plate.
Keep it simple.
Finally, we ordered the pineapple passion fruit dessert.
Basically, this was fried passion fruit topped with a sorbet that was sprinkled with pineapple.
It was way too sweet for my taste.
Another disappointment!
As for the service, our waiter John was okay and on par.
He provided some good explanations on some dishes, but I wished he stepped in and recommended the type and quantity of our selection (i.e.
one shared dish of brulee).
At other major establishments, our waiters have been excellent.
Of note, John also waited on the table next to us.
It was two business ladies.
Apparently, during the meal, the waiter failed to follow-up with these patrons (they had to wait over 20 minutes to order their desserts AFTER receiving the menu).
They complained amongst themselves regarding this issue.
At this type of restaurant, this was inexcusable.
Management should have taken note.
For our meal with a tea rose martini, the total price came to $230 for two.
Add in the tip, it topped $270 bucks for two.
Overall, with many fine dining establishments, my wife and I looked forward to our "next" dish.
At Sage, we were looking forward to "finishing" the meal and getting over the evening's disappointments.
For the price and the meal, we cannot justify a quality rating.
There are so many better places to dine within the Las Vegas area.

made the return visit with my parents this last weekend and it was just as good as the first time...  on my short list of must eat places on the Strip.
if you want details read my first review, not much has changed...  what has, i will detail below along with some general impressions and opinions:  -there was a tasting menu beyond the 4 course Chef's Signature menu which consisted of 6 courses, $120pp, and the whole table must participate...  our menu consisted of...    -amuse bouche of Oyster, Tobasco Sorbet, Tequila Mignonette   -Yellowtail Crudo   -Foie Gras Custard Brulee   -Gnocchi   -Grouper   -48hr Beef Belly   -Cranberry Sorbet (palate cleanser)   -Apple Tart   -closer of Chocolate Soup  -the Tea Rose Martini was excellent, skip the Aviator -service was still top notch  my personal opinion, if you are dining with a companion, a better alternative is to do what my sister and i did the first visit and have each of you order the Chef's 4 course Signature Menu, with each person choosing different items for their menu, and sharing the courses between the two of you...  that way, in a sense, you get an 8 course meal rather than a 4 course...  the portions are a little smaller than what you would get with the 6 course (since you are splitting portions designed for a 4 course meal) but you get 8 courses, and at $79pp ($89pp w/ the Foie Gras Brulee), i think presents a better value and you get to try more things.
that said, Sage is the quintessential fine dining experience for me at the current time, and ranks among the top restaurants ive ever had the pleasure of dining at.
do yourself a favor and check it out.

We were in Vegas this past Presidents Day weekend and the choice to eat at Sage was an easy one because we have dined several times at Spring in Chicago, Chef McClain's first restaurant.
There were eight of us and it was really, really delicious.
I had the poached egg, which was so outstanding I wished I could have licked the bowl and ordered 5 more.
I then had the hangar steak which was perfectly cooked and full of flavor.
In addition, everything else on my plate was bursting with flavor as well, including just a plain carrot.
Our dining companions also loved their meals, with the exception of one who ordered the pumpkin soup and scallops.
He said it was good, not great.
Then we got to dessert.
This place would have been 5 stars for me easily, but the desserts were just ok.
I am a huge bread pudding fan and although my serving vessel that the pudding was in was hot, the pudding was luke warm on the outside and cold on the inside making it dense and tough.
The other desserts were better than mine but also not outstanding and it was a disapointing way to end the meal.
Based on other reviews here, it seems Chef McClain should consider changing his pastry chef.
Otherwise I highly recommend this restaurant.

Kobe Flatiron steak YUM!!!
Beet Salad DOUBLE YUM!!!
The service kicked ass.
They were very professional but still knew how to have a good time.

One of the best meals I have had.
Nice selection of wines with the tasting menu.

------------- The Quick: -------------  Good, but not great, contemporary American fare that is served in a setting and demeanor too casual to be called fine-dining.
------------- The Details: -------------  During my latest outing to Las Vegas, I was searching for a new fine-dining restaurant to try.
To my disappointment, I was not encouraged by any of the new offerings and decided that I would go with a repeat visit to the current fine-dine Vegas champ restaurant Alex (see my review for more details).
Unfortunately, I was greatly saddened by the fact that Alex had recently closed!
I could not find a clear answer to why it had closed as it attracted a fair amount of diners and was not lacking in the recognition department (2-star Michelin).
Nonetheless, I was left in the situation where I had to "settle" for one of the new fine-dine establishments I have yet to try over the last year or two.
...which leads me to Sage.
As alluded to in Vegas dining magazines and articles I had read on the web, it appears hotel owners (like Wynn/Encore) believe that most Vegas visitors do not hover toward traditional, intimate, true fine-dining environments.
They believed they could attract the most customers via establishments that had good food, but a more relaxed, hip, and glamorous (showy) experience.
My opinion on this school of though set aside, it basically left me no choice but to pick a restaurant that was not as fine-dine as I originally wanted.
With the exception of Guy Savoy and Joel Robuchon, there are really no more true fine-dine establishments in Las Vegas (at least that i know of).
Anyways, here are the concrete details of my dining experience at Sage:  1) Food - I didn't care for the offered tasting menu and to my surprise, not everyone at the table had to have the tasting menu.
Consequently my gf got the tasting menu as I elected to pick off the a la carte menu.
a) Appetizer #1: Pacific Yellow Tail Crudo w/ shaved trumpet mushrooms, black winter truffle, and toasted pine nuts -I'm always a fan of raw fish and especially yellow tail so this dish was a no-brainer for me.
The tangy citrus marinade worked well with the inherent flavor of the fish.
However, I was not a fan of the shaved (raw) mushroom and felt it did not blend with the other ingredients of the dish.
b) Appetizer #2: Chilled Dungeness Crab Salad with fennel, tangerine, and creme fraiche -Again, another favorite classic ingredient of mine: crab.
Good flavors, probably my favorite dish of the night.
Very delicate, mild tastes in the salad.
Not overpowering but just the right amount of flavor to not mask the sweetness of the crab meat.
c) Entree: Bluenose Grouper with chanterelles, leeks, parsley root -Why did I get this dish?
Why didn't I go for the kobe?
Yeah, I have no idea actually.
In hindsight, I should have gone for the bold flavors of the meat dishes and skipped the fish.
The grouper was okay, but did not stand out at all.
It had some decent flavor and was of course cooked perfectly.
It was strictly ordinary and ordinary was not something one looks for in such a high-end establishment.
2) Service - subpar in the context of true fine-dining establishments.
Our waiter did not do anything especially wrong or was especially rude, but like a lot of the other components of this restaurant, he was merely okay.
I could not differentiate whether the waiter simply had a natural, apathetic demeanor or he did want to serve us.
In either case, however, his bored, casual affect immediately disappointed my dining experience.
Overall, Sage was a forgettable restaurant in a slew of similar, high-end, but ordinary Las Vegas restaurants.
Sure, it was pretty good food overall, but you honestly find good food like that in almost any other 4/5 star hotel in Vegas.
There was nothing that made it stand out from the competition nor did it possess a theme, trait, dish, or element of service that compels me to return.

We've been to Sage twice, in Jun 2010 and in Jan 2011.
Both times were outstanding.
Sage is our current  "special occasion dinner" place.
The first time, my S.O.
had oysters w/ tequila mignonette; braised veal cheeks w / confit peppers "piperade", picholine olive and shaved fennel salad.
I had the organic beets salad w/ duck prosciutto; scallops w/ braised oxtails, wild mushrooms, salted caramel reduction.
Every bite was perfect.
The second time, we had the tasting menu.
The amuse bouche was country pate w/ pickled harricot verte.
The courses were oysters; beef tartar; hamachi w/ roasted cauliflower (unorthodox but wonderful combination); lobster roll;  braised beef shank.
Dessert was apple strudel w/ ice cream; peanut butter brittle.
Another outstanding experience.

A sheik upscale restaurant just off the main lobby at Aria.
The food is top notch, as are the prices... service is professional.
Couple apps & entrees along with two glasses of wine will set you back $160.00 before the tip.
The octopus salad was good, but rather mild tasting (with the several ingredients involved had expected more).
The scallop entree (a signature dish) is outstanding.. was it worth the $44.00 price tag... maybe.
The arctic char (salmon) is also a very good choice, with intricate well defined flavors.
A New Zealand sauvignon blanc by the glass at $11.00 was the best buy of the meal.
Look forward to another visit.

My wife and I had a couple of drinks and appetizers at Sage last week, and the experience was absolutely amazing!
Since we were there without child, we decided to go on a culinary adventure and, instead of dining at one restaurant, we opted to get a couple of dishes at 3 restaurants.
It certainly isn't a good way to go as far as cost since it's a much more expensive endeavor, but seeing as I luckily won $1300 the night before, I didn't really give a damn about the cost.
We started our dining experience at Sage, where we sat at the bar.
Aaron Baca, the bartender or mixologist if you prefer, guided us through the menu and made a couple of spectacular Woodford Reserve Manhattans for my wife.
We opted to go with the oysters first and Mr. Baca highly recommended the Foie Gras Creme Brulee.
Oh.
My.
God.
Both my wife and I were speechless.
The Creme Brulee was simply fucking divine.
Pure ambrosia, there's no other way to say it.
If you're in Vegas and are looking for a good place to eat, you simply must try Sage.
Service and food are both impeccable.

I have been to Vegas 4 times and this was, by far, the best culinary experience yet!
My husband arrived on Tuesday and I was set to arrive on Thursday.
He was there for work and my birthday happened to be during the same week he was there - bonus!
I love to research, so I had looked into a few restaurants for our last night there (Saturday).
We already had plans for Thursday and Friday - Little Buddha in Palms and Sirio in Aria (both were excellent as well)!
Since we were staying at Aria, I researched their restaurants thoroughly.
With it being a fairly new hotel, I knew we couldn't go wrong.
I stumbled upon the reviews for Sage and was completely mesmerized!
There were no bad reviews and the recommendations were repeated over and over again.
I had to try it.
On the final day, my husband cancelled my "surprise reservations" at CraftSteak and we were able to obtain a 9:30p reservation at Sage - perfect.
First of all... if you can... ask for Bond.
He was terrific and made the experience even MORE enjoyable than it would have been with an average server.
My husband and I beamed the entire time we were there and are still talking about it!
First course...
The ever SO popular Foie Gras Custard Brulée and the Slow-Poached Organic Farm Egg.
While we were so-so impressed with the Egg (nothing special in our eyes), the Foie Gras Custard Brulée was OUT OF THIS WORLD.
I have never had foie gras and was never planning on have foie gras, but after reading the reviews, I had to try it "just once".
It was amazing... the crisp brulee topping (just like the dessert) and the creamy texture of the foie gras was worth the trip alone.
The Salted Brioche that came with it was superb.
The brioche was salty and sweet and I would have welcomed an entire basket if possible.
A must try!
The amuse bouche (1-biter) served in between courses was ok.
I like trying new things, so it was fun for me.
I believe it was pate, a green bean and sauce.
Our main courses were delectable!
We asked our waiter for recommendations and he quickly suggested the scallops (Roasted Day Boat Scallops).
My husband got the hanger steak.
My meal can be described in one word - HEAVENLY.
I had eaten scallops the night before, but I didn't want to pass up the recommendation.
And I am so glad I didn't.
The scallops were cooked perfectly, the oxtail/mushroom mixture was extremely savory and the best part was... the salted caramel reduction sauce.
I would bathe in this.
My husband's meal was wonderful too, but we both agreed that the scallops were the star.
Dessert was a big question... so our waiter, as great as he was, suggested a few things.
For me, he suggested his signature drink, the Cappuccini.
A shot of cappuccino, Kahlua, Baileys and vodka.
It came out in a martini glass with a frothy top and 3 coffee beans for decoration.
I consciously had to try and sip it...
I really wanted to pour it all over me so I could savor the flavor throughout the evening.
My husband's dessert was a little more "out there"... his dessert of choice was Absinthe.
Yes, the "recently legalized Absinthe".
My husband had never tried it and like me, wanted to be adventurous.
Our waiter explained that it is usually served over a melted sugar cube, but he had his own way of serving it... if we dared.
We dared.
Given a few choices, my husband chose the flavor "vanilla".
The extravagant cart of different absinthes was eventually rolled over.
There were multiple choices to choose from along with a hi-ball glass filled with ice and a shot of vanilla flavoring.
After choosing the waiter's favorite Absinthe (we couldn't go wrong with his suggestions), he placed a sifter on its side in the hi-ball glass.
In went the healthy shot of absinthe.
Then came the flame.
The shot was lit on fire and twirled around in the glass for a few seconds before he picked up the sifter and poured the shot into the vanilla.
The sifter was pretty far from the hi-ball glass so you were able to see the blue flame tunnel its way down to the glass.
SO COOL.
Once the drink was poured, our waiter covered the sifter and had my husband use a straw to suck the vapors out of the glass.
Then, while holding his breath, take a big sip of the drink.
WHOA!
He was able to do this one more time (while the fumes were still present) and WHOA again.
He said it was biggest rush!
What an experience!!!!
(p.s.
do not try this at home)  We will definitely go back to Sage and we will definitely ask for BOND!
A++++

It's really tough to not give most of the strip restaurants in Las Vegas 5 stars.
They really know what they're doing and it shows.
The food is great, the drinks are great, the service is great.
I went once, returned a week later and they remembered my name and some of my preferences.
That's service.
It's a bit pricey, but if you're dining in nice places at the Aria, you can't expect not to pay through the nose.
Worth every penny.

Sage is a fabulous restaurant, but I think chef Shawn McClain needs to tame his passion for fat.
Two of us had the 4 course menu.
I started with the market oysters, each a perfect mouthful, with delicious piquillo pepper and tequila mignotte.
Next I had day boat scallops, prepared in a very rich oxtail broth with wild mushrooms.
The beef and mushrooms almost overwhelmed the scallops but it was an intriguing contrast.
Third course was the Iberico pork roast.
The crispy confit and surprisingly the brussel sprouts and dates that accompanied it were delicious.
My dessert was warm carrot cake, very light, with a coconut sauce, a lovely ending to the meal.
My husband had the Wagyu beef tartare for his first course and honestly the fat was overwhelming.
We know to expect Wagyu or Kobe beef to be highly marbled, but in raw form it was very unctuous and hard to have more than a couple bites.
His second course was lobster agnolotti, which was more like cannelloni than traditional agnolotti, but quite tasty.
His third course was the 48 hour beef belly (hey, he choose it).
Yes, beef belly is a lot like pork belly only pork belly is a lot tastier in IMHO.
His dessert was the chocolate and caramel tart, which was essentially a very intense version of a Snickers bar.
We had the wine pairings which presented a interesting selection and introduced us to a new varietal, Gruner Veltliner.
I'd definitely recommend Sage, but balance the lighter foods with the richer ones.

The food was outstanding, as were the drinks.
The decor is simple, but cool.
Service was top notch.
Worth the price tag!

Very impressive meal with outstanding service.
Overall, all the food had clean, well-balanced flavors.
We ordered the foie gras custard brulee, duck, and 4 course chef's signature menu, with selections of the wagyu beef tartare, main dayboat scallops, iberico pork loin, and chocolate ganache and caramel tart.
Pretty much, as everyone else has noted, the custard brulee is a must-get.
Surprisingly, it wasn't overly-rich.
The duck was a bit on the salty side, but it was very good still.
The wine helped to cut the saltiness.
the beef tartare came with a perfectly poached egg yolk.
The scallops were cooked perfectly.
And I don't think anyone can go wrong with iberico....
If you're eating before a night out in vegas, I'd also recommend getting the french press coffee.
It helped to keep me up for a night of clubbing.
Regardless, I loved the food.

I've only got this to say...the veal cheeks may be one of the most sinful and heavenly things I've ever eaten.

Sage is an awesome restaurant for a date!
Went here with the gf and was a dope experience.
The setting/surrounding in this place is really psychadelic and classical so its a cool mix and vibe.
Def go for the table and not the bar-the bartenders can make interesting/mean drinks but the perks of eating a meal/appetizers at the tables are wayy better.
For example, at the table, we got a complimentary glass of rose moet each, foie gras free and a shot of cocoa (BOMB!
) at the end of the meal.
Everything on the menu is awesome, loved the wagyu tartare with the gold flakes and venison.
Awesome meal and ambiance for little over 100$ for 2!
Usually pretty dead (customerwise tho) the 3 times I came.

So Sage was booked the night after a tremendous meal at Tao.
After reading the reviews we were both very much looking forward to the meal/experience.
I'll begin by stating the service was "top-notch".
Probably one of the best I have ever had in my 36+ years.
Our dinner reservation was on the early side, 6:30pm as we had a 9pm show and wanted to allow enough time.
We arrived on time and were promptly seated at a very private table for two towards the back of the restaurant.
The restaurant itself is very attractive in a dark, purple sultry type of way.
Now with that out of the way, the reason we went here in the first place... the food.
Unfortunately this is where I truly feel, it was just "ok".
If I'm putting down over two bills for dinner, I want to at some point be blown away by the entire meal, or atleast one of the items experienced.
Once seated and having reviewed the drink menu, we started with our drinks.
I was in a beer mood so went with the Sierra Nevada on draught, and the gf went with a pino grigio.
When the drinks arrived, my beer was only half-full and was issued an apology that the draught system is having problems, and I would need to select a beer off the bottle menu.
Not the way I was looking to start off the meal.
After going with a different selection and review of the dinner menu, I opted for the 4 course chef tasting and the gf went with the halibut.
The choice of bread was good, as we both went with the bacon infused and the amuse that arrived was just "ok".
Some sort of jelly that was pretty much tasteless.
My first course was the beef tartar which was good and a decent enough portion to share a significant amount.
The second course was the scallops.
They were cooked fine, but honestly the portion size was a bit ridiculous.
Two very very tiny scallops.
I mean verrrry tiny.
Third course was the 48 hour beef belly.
LET DOWN.
This was about 98% pure fat.
Pretty much inedible.
As normal the course was brought with a separate meat knife.
Unfortunately the only use was to try and find any meat at all in an entire plate full of fat.
Even writing this review now, i can't believe that was served as one of the courses in an $80 4 course menu.
The fourth course was a warm carrot cake with cream cheese ice-cream.
I'm not the biggest carrot cake fan, but the gf is and I didn't much care for the other dessert option.
The gf had the halibut for her main course.
It was a nice piece of fish, however, when you drop close to $50 for a piece of fish, what you don't want to hear is " it's good, but I can do this just as good at home".
Problem was that she was right.
There was nothing spectacular or anything to set this dish apart from a very fresh piece cooked at home.
Would I eat here again...no.
Would I recommend anyone else to go who has only a brief period of time to experience vegas dining....no.
Was this meal worthy of the number that arrived on the bill... not even close.
Had two very good meals at the same exact price point while out there the last three nights ( Tao, Emeril's ), and unfortunately Sage was quite a let down when it came to the food.

Absolutely delightful.
Foie Gras Custard Brulee, Braised Veal Cheeks, Wagyu Beef Tartare.
Sage is incredible!
Be sure to try the traditional Absinthe as well... beautiful experience.

Yeah, this place really sucks.
Mostly because I've been here for a week and haven't eaten here every night.
Oh, and also because Aaron the bartender is not available to be my personal meal selector on a permanent basis.
By now, you may or may not know that I'm a horrible decision maker.
As in, I do not possess the ability to make one.
So, when everything looks incredible, I enter standby mode.
I thought about ordering several drinks.
One included tobacco leaf infused bourbon and one included smoked grapes.
But Aaron, my decision maker, put the kibosh on that.
Yeah, I'm not a smoker and probably don't want to end up barfing.
If I wanted to do that, I would have gone for bottle service with my coworkers.
The smoked grapes just got that subtle, yet obvious, head shake.
So, I went for the sidecar.
It was tasty but didn't hold a candle to my friend's Moscow Mule.
Served in a copper mug, that puppy didn't lose its frost for 2 hours.
Awesome.
Anyhow, since I clearly couldn't pick a bev, it seemed hopeless for food.
Aaron talked us into the poached egg and we also chose the sweetbreads.
Holy cow, that egg was unbelieveable!
Just enough truffle oil (and I'm SO over truffle oil, btw) and smoked potatoes.
Amazing!
Then there were the sweetbreads.
Perfectly cooked with a big fat piece of bacon on top.
So good.
After blankly staring at the menu and driving everyone nuts, I ultimately let Aaron surprise me with an entree.
He didn't let me down.
Scallops with braised oxtail.
Unreal.
Four huge scallops cooked to perfection with tender oxtail.
Everything I never knew I wanted.
Time for drink two.
I've read about classic daiquiris in Updike novels but now I know why they were always so popular.
Not your typical spring break concoction, this bev was the single best i've had in weeks.
Ridiculous.
To finish things off, Aaron surprised us with the carrot cake.
I'm pretty sure you can guess how that went.
So I LOVE this place.
I'm just sad that I wasted so much time at the Monte Carlo food court.
Time to give up the crack smoking.
Sage, say hello to your next regular.

Amazing food and service!
We had a great waiter and bartender who gave us great recommendations on the menu and drinks.
He was also great company without being intrusive either.
We stumbled in here after a long day out on the Strip in dire need of some good food.
Collectively, we ordered the octopus salad, yellowtail hamachi with trumpet mushrooms, sugar snap pea & garlic risotto, gnocchi, and day boat scallops.
The scallops came highly recommended and were delicious, especially with the salted caramel reduction.
It's pretty hard to go wrong with scallops though.
The octopus salad and yellowtail crudo were both delicious and light, just what I needed.
I coud have definitely eaten another plate of each!
I also got the roasted apple baklava which was just what I needed to top off my meal.
The real hit was the absinthe - it was a pretty involved and interesting process... our bartender was awesome about walking us through the steps and ensuring we had a great experience from beginning to end.
The drink itself was so-so (not a huge fan of licorice) but the overall experience was very memorable!

I was so disappointed by our dining experience here, having high expectations from when I dined there a few months prior during a girls weekend.
Our group of 9 checked in 5 minutes early for an 8PM reservation, we had to wait at the bar for well over 30 minutes.
During that time, no one asked for our drink order so I went to the bar and ordered cocktails for everyone.
Once the bartender was done, he pushed them forward on the bar - yelling to me "they're ready".
Are you kidding me?!
At $13/cocktail there is no way I'm bussing them myself.
Once our table was ready, no one made any effort to help us carry the drinks over, so 3 of us juggled laptop bags, purses and drinks to the table.
Food was overly salted and not very tasty.
The gnocchi which I iloved last time was smothered in a blue cheese-ish sauce which was not good.
The tuna tartare did not taste particularly fresh.
All in all, an expensive disappointment.
We did however have a wonderful lunch at Julian Serrano's tapa place the following day.

Sage is a restaurant where you can be casual in an extremely elegant envrionment....every table is a good table...none are too close together so you feel private even in a large room and service is meant to pamper.
The food is straight forward without being the least bit oridinary...a poached orgainic egg doesn't sound new or anything special or typical fine dining fare...but put it on top of a delicate slightly smokey potato foam accented with shaved black truffle and a pine nut espuma..ART!
To take a humble food and elevate it to a very special place is not easy.
Sage does this.
Expect that you will have a feast for all senses.
And when you are asked to see the Absinthe cart at the end of you meal complete with at least nine international and domestic varieties...ACCEPT...it is presented and prepared traditionally or with a Vegas twist...on fire if you dare.
DARE...it's amazing.
It gives you an energetic buzz and you feel less full...a true digestif!...the whole point right?
The menu is eclectic and yet varied and fanciful...
The chef also offers a 6-course tasting menu that isn't printed but can be available if everyone at the table is the mood to participate and have an extra special dining experience.
It can even be vegetarian or vegan and accommodate taste restrictions...and for the money...have a wine or artisnal beer paring with it.
STUPENDOUS....$120 for the food and $60 for the  beverage pairing!
Great bar and outrageous cocktails.

Beautiful space, wonderful food....but not 5 stars.
I wanted to go somewhere nice and kind of fancy on our trip to Vegas.
I posted to Talk and this was one of the suggestions from my fellow Yelpers.
Thanks for the great suggestion.
We arrived a bit early for our 7:45 reservation so we could have a cocktail in the bar.
I had a tea infused martini and my dining companion had a scotch.
Service in the bar was good.
The hostess came and got us promptly at 7:45 for our table.
I appreciated how she carried our drinks for us to the table.
We were seated at a table with one side chair and one side booth on the end.
It was cozy and the atmosphere very private and welcoming.
We received an amuse bouche from the chef.
It was a tomato and avocado treat.
I loved it!
We also received our choice of bread.
I went with a basic bread, he had the bacon roll thing.
Both were good.
I liked the whipped butter served with sea salt.
Perfect compliment.
For an appetizer, I ordered the poached egg with shaved truffles, dining companion had the yellow-tail sushi roll.
I liked the egg, but I always forget truffles give me heartburn.
The combination of truffle, egg, and potato puree really worked well together.
He enjoyed his sushi.
I had the asparagus soup instead of salad, he had the beet salad.
The soup was probably the best soup I've ever had.
It was by far my favorite part of the meal.
My main dish was gnocchi, he had fish.
The gnocchi was with cauliflower and other veggies.
It was good, but a bit salty.
We typically do not order dessert, but we were on vacation, so I caved for the lime tart with fresh blueberries.
It's been a long winter with not too many good fruits where I'm from, so that was the perfect end to the meal.
Everything was very good, but why not 5 stars?
Here's why -  1.
Although the food runners were good, our server disappeared for long periods of time.
There was a woman walking around trying to take and sell us a picture.
This is a restaurant, not an amusement park.
I found it off putting.
Not many wines by the glass to choose from.
My dining companion and I don't like the same kind of wine, so a bottle is out of the question.
All in all, a good meal with great choices, presented beautifully.
I'm glad we ate at Sage, but I'm not sure I would go back.

Absolutely magnificent.
I convinced our little Vegas posse that we should treat ourselves to dinner here - we went all-in with the tasting menu and the wine pairings and it was magnificent in every way.
The service was flawless, the food was from a chef at the top of his game and the wine was tremendous.
We made the reservations about two months beforehand for a Satruday night, and we had a round-top in the middle of the restaurant.
If you are even considering a blow-out meal on your Vegas trip come here !

I was looking foward to SAGE for a while; as I was really impressed with the menu.
By the time we got to the restaurant at 8, we were feeling the effects of an extremely long travel day....waking up 4 am NY time for our flight in to LV.
So I couldn't enjoy this really excellent restaurant's cuisine as much as I wanted to (NOTE TO SELF-DON'T WASTE GOOD RESTAURANTS ON TRAVEL DAYS- STICK WITH BUFFETS).
The sweetbreads and pork belly appetizer I had was one of the best apps i have ever eaten...sweetbreads and pork belly are awesome by themselves, put them together in one dish and you will instantly be transported to Yummyville where everyone is singing and dancing and houses are made of bacon and happiness is abound.
Unfortunately, my steak entree quickly negated any appetite I had left as it was chewier than the Michelin Man's ass (not that I ever tried to chew on the Michelin man's ass).
The flavor was interesting....salsa verde and black truffle paste...it worked for a few bites then got unpleasant...but that may have more to do with me having to chew each piece 52 times.
We skipped dessert because we were not at 100% as stated before, so i was disappointed that I couldn't indulge in that.
The wine I ordered- by the glass- an awesome Burgundy who's name escapes me but i have it written down I think- went well with both the app and entree.
The service was top notch...really friendly, polite, and effecient.
The setting and ambience is beautiful and we had a great spot..our own cozy booth away from everyone else.
Oh yeah, and they have bacon bread.
I def.
want to come back here..i give it four stars because I am minusing one for the steak, but I think there are many things on that menu that would push it to five stars.

This is in my top 5 dining experiences in Las Vegas.
My friend and I went here for just drinks and appetizers, and it felt like a full 5 course meal.
We started with 2 dirty martinis, and they were made to perfection.
Then we ordered the WARM GOAT CHEESE CROSTINI with Candied Walnuts/Black Pepper Honey.
Oh my.
Heaven.
We then nibblled on SHISHITO PEPPERS with Spiced Lime Salt...very interesting.
My friend liked them better than I did, but they were like edamame on steroids.
A great "filler".
Next we tried the WAGYU BEEF TARTARE with Slow-Poached Egg Yolk and Crispy Chocolate.
This was melt-in-your mouth good.
By this time we were seriously having food euphoria so we ordered another martini (again perfect) and wanted seconds of the Goat Cheese Crostini.
Our waiter - Jason Bond (for real) -  (who was awesome by the way) urged us to try to Oxtail crostini instead.
Neither of us had ever had it, but we were feeling brave.
Oh.
My.
It was like the tenderest pot roast you've ever had, with the flavor of onions and mom's Sunday dinner.
Wow.
So...here's when I bit into a little piece of bone (literally).
It was pretty gross since then I was thinking of tail.
BUT, I didn't really care and I just politely pointed it out to the waiter.
The manager came over, made a big fuss, apologized, etc.
They handled it very well and took it off the bill.
Then the waiter brought us a complimentary dessert.
It was a shot of mint infused chocolate...not too sweet, perfectly warm.
It was seriously one of the best desserts I've ever had.
So, I still give this place 5 stars even though I ate a tailbone.
That's how good it is.
Going back at my first opportunity.

Went here again.
Had a wonderful dinner including several nice wine picks from the wines by the glass list, beet salad, fois gras, the poached egg, the scallops from Maine, the carrot cake, the cheese plate and the absinthe service and some tea.
Everything was satisfying, the service was professional and warm and wonderful, the lighting and ambiance was great, and the whole experience was excellent.

Hands down, Sage is probably my most favorite restaurant in Las Vegas.
From the service to the food, you won't regret it.
I have been here a couple times and I am amazed at what they can with just an egg.
Saturday night we had the signature tasting menu with wine pairing and was excellent.
We had plans to go out after so we asked to share our waiter was nice enough to allow to do so.
Amuse Bouche - Sunchoke soup with tarragon -- great start, chilled and light.
First course - WAGYU BEEF TARTARE -- Crushed Caper Aïoli/Slow Poached Egg/Crispy Chocolate.
My favorite dish of all the courses.
So light and went down way to easy.
(paired with a vouvray.
) perfect match.
Second course - MAINE DAYBOAT SCALLOPS -- Braised Oxtail/Wild Mushrooms/Salted Caramel Reduction.
I never knew that Dayboat scallops have a more sea flavor.
I loved it.
The dish was very asian influenced almost teriyaki flavor.
Third course - IBERICO PORK LOIN -- Brussels Sprouts/Crispy Confit Shoulder/Smoked Dates.
Almost bbq flavored, you could taste the smoke.
Final course - WARM CARROT CAKE --Roasted Coconut Sauce/Candied Ginger/Cream Cheese Ice Cream.
I normally am not a carrot cake lover but this one will change your mind.
Light, moist and rich.
The best part of this restaurant; the Absinthe cart.
Who wouldn't love an entire cart of Absinthe?!!
ha ha!
Our server suggested the Germain-Robin, USA.
This is the lightest out of all the ones listed.
Great for beginners, such as myself.
It food is unforgettable and so the absinthe.
;)  I can't wait to go back.

I would give it 4.5 stars if I could.
I would like to reserve 5 for places that make me lose my mind.
This isn't one of those, but it still was one of the better meals I've had in a very long time.
So, better than 4 stars...
I'll give 'em the benefit of the doubt and inch it up to 5.
(-:   Everything we had was both rich and fresh.
I had the fois grois brulee, which is one of their signatures.
Very unique and super-tasty.
Had the scallops for an entree, which rocked my world.
How they do seafood that fresh in the desert continues to confuse me.
The palette of flavors was hearty and earthy and a bit sweet - a very nice combo.
Service was flawless and attentive.
They need to change out some of their lightbulbs, as the dramatic lighting, despite being cool, was a bit sharp on the eye.
But, that's a very nitpicky complaint.
The fact that I bring that up as my only real complaint shows how good a place this is.
It was pricey (no surprise there) - but worth it for the experience and the tasty bites.
Highly recommended!

Interesting space.
Very open layout, with strange seating/table arrangement.
But the space is so large that you can still have an intimate experience.
Had the 4 course menu starting w/ the foie gras custard brulee, which I thought was interesting, but also not the best use of foie gras.
I'd rather just have a lobe of it plopped down on my plate.
Delicious nonetheless.
Followed that with the Scallops over a bed of braised ox-tail.
I thought the combination was strange as the ox-tail was so strong.
Individually, each were cooked perfectly, but it just didn't work for me as a whole.
And for the main was the Iberico Pork Loin, which was recommended by the waitress.
Pretty disappointed by this one, and I'm Chinese!
We love our pork, but this really didn't hit the spot.
The pork itself was a bit dry and was cooked to medium/medium-well, whereas I usually prefer mine closer to med.
rare.
Aside from that, the dish as a whole was solid, but nothing I'd recommend.
Had a taste of my friend's skirt steak and it was much better.
Finished with the Carrot Cake, which I loved.
It was a bit crispier on the outside and very light on the inside.
When people recommend carrot cake to me, I tend to find what they like is a bit too cakey and moist/oily, and too heavy on the frosting.
The cream cheese ice cream was a much better companion than standard frosting.
I think I had a few more complaints than a standard 4 star review, but I can see the potential here for a very solid meal.

I'm in love with Sage.
I hemmed and hawed for months when I was charged with the duty of finding a really great fancy (and not too expensive) restaurant for me and my 20 closest girl friends.
Seriously.
I settled on Sage.
Two things pushed me towards this restaurant-- the vegetarian friendly menu (we had vegetarians and a vegan) and that they wouldn't force us to get prix fixe if we split the group in two.
Also a bonus-- this place is extremely reasonable for being in Vegas and for the quality of food and service.
The two group split worked perfectly because they sat us in the back room RIGHT next to eachother so we could walk between tables ooh'ing and aah'ing and TASTING.
One table got the chef's tasting and another ordered what they felt like.
The server at my table was fantastic; SO helpful and sweet and never impatient (even though it was all very confusing at some points with all the girls shuffling and shouting).
They allowed some of us to pay cash and others to use their credit cards.
They brought us everything we wanted basically.
Impeccable service, period.
All the cocktails I tasted were incredible.
All the food I tasted was perfectly seasoned and never boring.
Highlights include the foie gras brulee, the hanger steak, New York strip, steak tartare, slow poached farm egg.
Another very awesome thing was that the chef made a special amuse bouche and dish for our lone vegan friend.
She was asked about what she didn't like and she was brought out this totally unique and impressive dish-- she looked SO content.
Honestly, everything was fantastic because my friends all toasted me and gushed all weekend about it.
I am so so happy I went with Sage.

I spent quite a bit of time researching Vegas restaurants for a special birthday celebration.
I wanted something posh that wouldn't completely break the bank.
Luckily, I decided on Sage, which was conveniently located in the lobby of our hotel.
I was soooooooooooo happy with my choice!
We sat at a quiet table for 2 with a great view of the dining room.
The décor is an interesting mix of contemporary (clean lines and dark woods), traditional (pleated shades on the chandeliers and Renoir's "The Luncheon of the Boating Party" on the wall) and 70's glam (gold accents and gold speckled mirrors).
Bonus points because purple is my favorite color.
The ambiance is lively but not loud.
Some kind of chill electronic music was playing in the background, which made for a very comfortable and relaxed vibe.
We noshed on fresh bread (sourdough and some sort of bacon roll) while we enjoyed our cocktails.
I had the delightful tea rose, which is a hoity-toity version of a lemon drop martini.
We were all set to try the tasting menu but we got sucked in to the night's special - a rib eye for two.
I am so bummed that I didn't get to try the foie gras custard brulee but I am hoping there will be a next time.
Our meal began with an amuse bouche of pate topped with fresh greens.
Mine had a slight kick to it.
I had the wild mixed greens salad, which was incredibly fresh and flavorful.
The Hubs raved about his heirloom beet salad.
Our rib eye, with foie gras glaze, mushrooms and leeks, came in a big dish for us to share, which made it fun and a little romantic.
It was tender, juicy and delicious!
I am usually not a fan of glazed meats but this glaze was so light and not at all sweet.
We also had yummy golden mashed potatoes on the side.
For dessert we shared a decadent chocolate and raspberry creameaux and finished everything off with the chocolate soup.
The night's flavor was the amazing chocolate caramel which our waiter likened to liquid gold.
Indeed!
We had wonderful dining experience at Sage and I would be completely remiss if I didn't mention the incredible service.
From the time we were greeted at the door until we walked out again, we were treated to prompt, courteous, attentive, and professional service from everyone we encountered.
If you want a really nice dinner at an upscale restaurant that is not stuffy or pretentious, go to Sage.
Go, just go!

Hands down my favorite restaurant in Las Vegas (and conveniently located in my favorite hotel on the strip).
Chef Shawn McClain did a wonderful job with this restaurant.
Its everything I want in contemporary fine dining.
I first tried Sage last year when Aria first opened and I immediately fell head over heels in love.
I had a memorable dinner here on a double date with my parents and my boyfriend.
We loved everything about the meal--from the tasty amuse bouche to the delectable mignardises.
Our server was very knowledgeable and friendly.
By the end of the night, he was cracking jokes with my parents and having us all laughing.
He was also able to answer all my boyfriend's questions and inquiries regarding the preparation and cooking methods of the food.
And, yes, my boyfriend has lots of question because he is a chef as well.
The sommelier was very helpful as well.
He helped pick out a great bottle of wine for the table to share.
Our wine glasses were never half empty--a staff member was always there to pour more wine.
Even my parents, who are not the biggest wine fans, loved the wine recommended by the sommelier.
Everything on the menu is delicious.
Ingredients are fresh and high in quality.
The food is prepared well and the flavors are well thought out and executed precisely.
We were all beyond satisfied with our meal.
I try to eat dinner here every time I'm in Vegas.

Very good food.
Well worth the price.

Wow!
The food was amazing.
We had the prix fixe which offered an appetizer, two smaller size entrees, and dessert for $89.
To start, I had the Foie Gras Custard Brulee - if you like foie gras, you MUST get this.
I think this definitely was the highlight of the meal.
The foie gras had a light whipped texture and since it was a brulee there was a hint of sweetness.
Next, I had the Ale Braised Short Rib and Maine Lobster Casoncelli.
After the Foie Gras, the rich short rib was a little much, although very good.
The casoncelli was good too.
The dessert was a little of a let down though.
I had the carrot cake and in general it was dry and had a very hard outer layer.
Great fine dining restaurant, date night/girls night, have the Foie Gras Custard Brulee

One of, if not, my FAVORITE restaurant in Vegas.
I'm pretty much addicted to this place because I'm always here, either a casual night at the bar or a celebratory evening in the dining room.
The restaurant is beautiful and removed from the noise of slot machines and smoke clouds.
Friendly staff, talented bar, consistently great food.
Key word is consistent.
Menu constantly changes with what is in season (as it should, who the heck wants Strawberries in October?
ew.
) either in preparation or all together.
There are some signatures of course.
Two of them are the steak tartare with fried chocolate and foie gras brulee with the most heavenly brioche buns.
Must try those two if you come here.
Also get the farm poached egg with truffle, so simple and delicious.
I want that for breakfast every day!
Cocktail list is also great!
Every time I'm here I always try the current Duck dish on the menu, always cooked perfectly!
Desserts are also on point so be sure to try them.

We had the best experience at Sage.
The food was great and the atmosphere was fabulous.
Marcus was our waiter and he was absolutely amazing.
He was extremely attentive and answered all of our questions with out any hesitation.
He really knew his information.
Plus there were two people in our party with allergies and the allergies were re-confirmed before we got our food.
It was my best friends birthday and so we even got complimentary desserts and their chocolate soup (awesome hot cocoa).
We also decided to try the absinthe bar and Marcus told us the history and went over each type thoroughly.
This was not a meal, it was dining experience.
I have already recommended Sage to several friends.

My party and I were pretty hungry after our flight was delayed and we needed to eat ASAP.
Most of us wanted steak and there was Sage to answer our carnivore prayers.
We were quickly seated without reservations in the lounge since we didn't want to wait for the main room.
The atmosphere is lovely with giant panel sections of Manet's "Luncheon on the Grass" (thank you Art History classes).
The evening started off with pressed coffee for everyone but me.
It came with a cute cookie.
The waitress then brought out an amuse-bouche of...I actually didn't hear what she said, but I know it was duck and mustard.
I enjoyed it mucho.
Then the bacon and sourdough bread with salt and butter came out.
You only get one piece so choose wisely!
Either that or they were being stingy with us.
*Shifty eyes*  Our party got skirt steaks, veal cheeks, and NY strip steak.
I agree with the other reviewer who said that the vegetable department was lacking.
Regardless, I loved the smashed fingerling potatoes and garbanzo beans my skirt steak came with.
Plus, the almond vinaigrette was good and not overpowering as some vinaigrettes can be.
The steak itself was really good, but not the best steak I've ever had in my life.
I think that has yet to happen.
All the flavors worked really well together.
I also tried the veal (not my fav, but I've only ever had veal once before) and the strip steak (also very good).
If I go back I would probably get the NY strip or Hanger.
I wish we had enough room for dessert but we were all stuffed.
Next time Sage, next time!

Amuse-bouche: Fig pastry thingermabobber- 3/5  Prix-fixe menu:  Wagyu beef tartare: Honestly, I'd drive back to Vegas for this baby.
THE most delicious dish I've had in a long time.
Perfectly seasoned with a beautiful yolk on top and served with sinfully buttered crisps.
DROOL- 5/5  Maine scallops: I've gone to many $$$$ restaurants who manage to over-cook their scallops.
Sage is NOT one of them!
Well-executed, melt-in-your-mouth, orgasmically good.- 5/5  Beef belly: Eh... too smoky for my taste.
One of the cons of getting prix-fixe is the menu including something you're not too excited about in the first place.
- 2/5  Peanut butter chocolate tart: Is there such thing as too much peanut butter?
Why, yes, yes there is... and sadly, it was in this tart.
-2/5  Service was friendly & attentive, good atmosphere.
Disclaimer- I was quite inebriated by the 3rd course due to previous libations consumed before & during dinner which may have affected the last two ratings... however, I can promise you I vividly remember the tartare and scallops... and those two dishes were enough to bump the rating to a 4. :)

What a great experience - Food and service were wonderful - the steak tartare - YUM and the tasting menu is a real value in my opinion - you'd be hard pressed to eat this well at this price point anywhere.
We can't wait to come back!
And beef belly - what bliss for my belly!

My girlfriends and I were celebrating my best friend's bachelorette party in vegas.
One of the organizers made dinner reservation at Sage and it was incredible.
Prix-fixe menu  PACIFIC YELLOWTAIL CRUDO Shaved Trumpet Mushrooms/Black Summer Truffle/Toasted Pine Nuts was excellent.
little salty for my taste, but the mushrooms were so yummy and the pine nuts was so perfect with it.
IBERICO PORK LOIN Milk-Braised Cannelloni/Green Asparagus/Creminelli Mortadella i could've definitely lived without the creminelli mortadella, but the rest of the plate was excellent.
the pork was so tender and it was juicy.
perfectly prepared.
i don't actually know what kind of desert i had but it was with rasberry and some purple cream with a slice of cake under.
it was delicious as well.
overall, our server Justin was pretty dope.
He was professional, and got ALL of our orders right.
He did get little frustrated when the coffee that he brought out wasn't really "coffee"... Few of the girls ordered french press and i think the coffee ground was finer that it should've been... anyways, they ended up getting a latte, which came out perfect.
the hotel, restaurant and everything is brand new, and i'd prefer to stay at this hotel next time instead of venetian or bellagio.

Came back for a bachelor party and had a better meal than last time because I had a better sense of what to order.
Enjoyed the sweetbreads, octopus salad, the special of Sous Vide Beef Belly, and finished with a rhubarb parfait.
I thoroughly enjoyed everything.
Bumping this down to 3 stars because our waitress, Virginia, charged us 1 extra coffee (we ordered 2, charged for 3), and when I brought it to her attention, she looked up and down the table and counted our cups.
"Well, I guess if there are only 2 pots, then there must only be 2 orders," and she walked away to fix it.
It just seemed like my correction was met with skepticism and was not followed with an apology.
The situation just wasn't handled well, especially considering that our party just blew $1200 there.
Now maybe you're thinking, why would you ask for a $5 coffee to be removed from such a huge bill anyway... and I thought about just ignoring it, but in the end, I couldn't let it slide.
It ended the dinner on an awkward note, but at least the meal was delicious.

[For the full review with pictures, see the link to my blog on my profile.
]  Jet-lagged, hungry and slightly woozy from the putrid fast food odors on the airplane, I arrived at the airport in Las Vegas thirty-five minutes before a 9:15pm (Pacific Time) dinner reservation.
With only a carry-on duffel bag I made my way to the tortuous taxi line and waited a few minutes before a good-humored vulgarian would rush me to Aria.
Arriving at 9:05, I would thank the driver and make the short walk over to Sage.
One's first fine-dining experience is just that, an experience and nonpareil at that.
Every meal thereafter then becomes a matter of grading experiences against themselves.
And fairly or not, I decided to compare Sage to Mesa Grill and Daniel Boulud Brasserie, the first dinners on two previous trips to Vegas.
Through that lens, Sage dwarfs its competitors.
A bit of background.
Sage is helmed by Shawn McClain, a relative nobody in a hotel that hosts Michael Mina, Julian Serrano, Jean-Georges Vongerichten and Masa Takayama.
But don't let the limited name recognition fool you, for McClain is a "Best Chef Midwest" James Beard-award winner.
With our order for the four-course prix fixe placed, a runner dropped off the the evening's amuse, two tiny pieces of apricot with slivered almond and crispy pancetta.
Soon after, another runner approached our table with the bread tray.
Two offerings were available: a country bacon and a sourdough with flecks of sea salt embedded in the crust along with Murray River sea salt and room temperature, house-churned butter studded with lavender.
For our first course, we went with one of McClain's signature dishes: a foie gras brûlée, which was infused with Grand Marnier, a bing cherry, toasted cocoa nibs, shavings of foie gras torchon and brioche.
This is right up there as one of the top-five foie gras dishes it has ever been my privilege to eat!
The wine pairing, a 2006 Tokaj, reminded me of a Mott's apple sauce made with Fiji apples, complementing the sweet custard (bear in mind, dear reader, this is my first wine pairing, so my repository on which to draw is barren).
Can one ever really have enough offal?
The correct answer is no, so I supplemented the first course with a generous-sized appetizer of crispy sweetbreads, a piece of crispy pork belly, roasted trumpet mushrooms, sautéed spinach, and mascarpone-laced polenta.
A polenta described as "creamy" was watery, wholly inferior to Scarpetta's in Beverly Hills; the greens, too, went almost entirely untouched.
It seems after the kitchen expertly handled the sweetbreads and belly, they relegated the accoutrement to an afterthought.
For the second course, my dining companion was served Maine Dayboat Scallops with braised oxtail, broccoli rabe and wild mushrooms, paired with an oak monster of a 2008 Pinot Noir.
Again the greens were underseasoned, but the half of scallop I tried had a lovely caramelized crust--though not quite as nice as the one atop the brûlée--and a healthy helping of salt.
And I had the Maine lobster-stuffed casoncelli with braised Spring peas and lobster knuckle scattered throughout, paired with a 2007 Chardonnay.
I would have been devastated if the kitchen fucked the peas; to their credit, they made love to them.
In fact, everything on the plate was properly cooked and well-seasoned, from the al dente pasta to the tender lobster.
The penultimate courses for the evening were (1) a 48-hour braised beef belly with roasted potatoes, onions and rhubarb and (2) an Iberico pork loin, a milk-braised cannelloni of shredded pork shoulder, all of which rested atop asparagus and creminelli mortadella.
As for the pairings, there was a 2006 Margaux with some barnyard funk to it for the beef and a Côtes du Rhône for the pork.
The balmy 90+ degree temperature outside ought to have swayed me in favor of the leaner pork, yet it was the intensely marbled beef that left me smitten, the reasons for which include its fork tenderness and its ability to tame the aggressively alcoholic wine.
For dessert, we were treated to a terrine (from the bottom layer to the top) of chocolate, blackberry and raspberry cremeux with a blackberry gelée, powdered chocolate and chocolate pudding.
Its tartness proved to be a good foil to the richness from the previous courses.
And to go with it, a glass of Lillypilly Late Harvest that tasted of starfruit with a hint of florality.
For our last taste of the two-and-a-half hour meal, our server brought us Sage's version of a petite four, a shot of hot chocolate infused with mint, which I sipped happily, content that the first act of our Vegas gourmandizing had delivered.

My husband and I went to Sage on the recommendation of a friend.
We were not disappointed.
We ordered the 7 course chef's tasting menu with wine pairing and added the steak tartar as we were told it was not to be missed.
We started at the bar with a wonderful hand crafted beer for my husband and a drink with St. Germain (my favorite liquor).
The bar tender was very knowledgeable and affable.
We started with an Amuse Buche (sp?
)  of an oyster that was really very good.
The bread had bacon in it (my husband loved that), and the butter was creamy with some sea salt on the side.
Yum.
First course was a tuna belly  tartar with some watercress and cracked black pepper.
It was melt in your mouth good.
Buttery with a touch of spice from the watercress.
We had our waygu tartar as a 1.5 course....
It was also buttery and wonderful.
It had truffles and olive oil.
Wonderful.
The next course was foie grois brulee.
I can't even begin to explain this dish.
I hate foie grois and creme brulee, but I couldn't get enough of this stuff.
It was creamy, somewhat sweet and savory with the cruncy top.
It was topped with something fried and crunchy, but I don't remember what it was.
It was served with buttery brioche bits of heaven.
I can't get the stuff out of my head - it was really that good.
We had a duck tourine which was awesome, and and some sort of meat that was absolutely insane.
We also had scallops at some time - honestly after the brulee, I was in such a food coma that I don't remember a lot of it.
The wine pairings were perfect, and I even tried some wines that I had not had before.
We had a raspberry chocolate and a peanut butter chocolate dessert that were heavenly.
We decided to skip the absinthe even though they are known for it becasue we didn't want to lose the taste of the wonderful food.
The cost was high, but absolutely worth it.
We have done chef's tastings at other well known restaurants (i.e.
Bartelato del Mar), and this was leaps and bounds better.
There is just no comparison.

Was in Vegas for the weekend and a group of us went to Sage for dinner to celebrate a friend's birthday.
Why the three stars?
When I go to a restaurant, there a several things that make it a good experience: decor, service, and food.
Here's the breakdown:  Decor: upscale elegance.
Simple, chic and classy.
Service: if it wasn't for the waitress, I would've given Sage 5 stars.
Talk about a total SNOB.
The whole time my friends and I were there she had her nose up in the air as if she was better than us or something.
You know when you could kind of tell if someone is totally two-faced?
Well our waitress was a prime example.
She had FAKE plastered all over her.
One of us in our party wanted to order an appetizer first because we were waiting for two more people to join our group.
We asked if it was ok to do that and she hesitated and was like, oh yes, that's fine.
But then she does some other stuff and completely ignores the request and walks away.
And so we ask again when she comes back and she's like "Is this for the whole table?
Our appetizers are more individual portions and aren't meant to be shared".
We were like wtf?
Does she think we were just gonna order 1 appetizer and split between the 12 of us or something?
What the hell is wrong with her?
I mean I get that maybe it was more proper to have all the food come out at once so not only 1 person is eating while everyone else is waiting but she was acting like a total snob about it.
Makes me irritated just thinking about it.
And I'm the type of person that rarely gets mad at anything.
I took off two stars because of her.
Food:  Now here is where the good stuff is.
The food definitely saved the night.
Bread was ok, nothing smancy.
They gave us this bite sized appetizer - smidgen of cherry tomato w/ some sort of crunchy item and sauce.
Totally delicious and i dont even normally like cherry tomatoes.
For my main entree, I ordered the Maine Day Boat Scallops - braised oxtail, wild mushrooms, and a salted caramel reductions.
I gotta give props to the chef because those scallops were unbelievably delicious.
Cooked to perfection.
The best scallops I've ever had.
I'm just drooling about them as I'm typing this.
haha..
So my friends and I made the best of the night even though the waitress treated us as such.
oh and to top it off, when we paid the tab, a mix of card and cash, she comes back and tells us we're like 15 dollars short and she said that she added it to on the card.
My friend kindly told her that she was wrong and asked her to look at it again.
And of course, she realized she made a mistake.
She didnt even apologize.
She just was like "oh, i'll go fix it"  and when she came back she was like "I was looking at the wrong total" or something along those lines.
But no apology.
Come one.
My friends and I are Asian.
You don't mess with Asians and their math.

One of the best restaurants I've been to.
Period.
And that says a lot since I live in New York.
Everything about this place (food, ambiance, service) is top notch.
I had the tasting menu and particularly enjoyed the foie gras brulee, the scallops, and the pork belly  Great for a special occasion--if you are looking to go high end in vegas, definitely don't miss out on this place

A terrific dining experience in Vegas!
I've been to a number of high end restaurants in this city and Sage ranks among the best.
On the expensive side, but you get what you pay for.
I took my wife there for her birthday and it was a memorabe experience.
I had the chef tasting menu, while my wife ordered an appetizer and an entree.
She said the truffled egg was one of the best things she has ever eaten.
The tasting menu was also exceptional!
The service was outstanding and never missed a beat.
We paid about $260 for both of us.
That included a 1/2 bottle of wine and desserts as well.
I would highly recommend this restaurant for anyone visiting Vegas.

Done and done this is hands down one of the best restaurants in Vegas.
Prime out of my way Sage is bringing it to new heights.
Recently visited the Jean George upstairs and was really disappointed.
Yelpers said to try a different server next time but at that price and in Vegas I decided to give Sage a shot.
From the moment we sat, Virginia our server was awesome and attentive as she provided a world class service.
There was two chef signature menu's.
We tried both with the wine pairings and started off with market oysters that were some of the best I've ever had.
Next came the Wagyu beef tartare that was Amazing but be warned that the slow cooked egg on top of a raw meat with chocolate is not your average dish.
Clearly this was just the start of an amazing evening.
We had the scallops and hen egg, yummy.
The iberico was crazy good but the beef belly was at the top of the list.
No doubt why this was the Chef signature dish.
We finished off with some amazing desserts and couple extra treats from the chef.
This place is not a place you budget at but you have to experience some amazing food in life, sage is just that.

As a Chicagoan, I'm so proud of Chef Shawn McClain and his restaurant Sage!
From a huge of list of celebrated chefs and their restaurants to choose from in Vegas, Sage made it to our list of places to dine.
No, regrets whatsoever.
In fact, we walked out as happy and very satisfied diners.
I tried their 4-course Signature Tasting Menu and my husband went with the ala carte options.
The wonderful thing about it is that the entire table doesn't have to do the tasting menu.
Phew.
However, if you want to do the 10-course menu then the entire table needs to also do it because of the complexity of trying to coordinate everyone's meals.
For the 4-course Signature Tasting Menu, you get to choose between options for each course.
I chose the market oysters for my first course and to my surprise, I was given FIVE oysters!
Woah!
I love raw oysters on the shell so that was a great plus.
Then I had the seared scallops which was also very good.
The beef belly was the star of the tasting menu.
It was so soft it literally melted in my mouth.
Ended the tasting menu with profiteroles for dessert which was so good.
As for the ala carte menu which my husband went with, he had roasted sweetbreads which he was very happy about.
I tried a piece and the soft texture was amazing.
He had the hanger steak and it was prepared to perfection just as he requested: rare.
Service was also professional and attentive.
Our server gave us a reasonable amount of time in between getting seated, ordering drinks, then food and also came to check in on us without overdoing it.
Sage is easily one of the top restaurants in Vegas.
Note to Chicagoans: I asked our server about Chef Shawn McClain and apparently he has plans to gradually close his restaurant businesses in Chicago to focus fulltime in his Las Vegas venture.

Fifteen bucks for a poached egg?
Go there, get that egg, and be amazed.
I'm not sure all what was in it (truffles, some tiny crispy potatoes, some foam, corn -- and the egg), but it was a beautiful three minutes I spent enjoying it.
The artichoke soup was almost as beautiful... it came presented as just garlic flowers on a plate, with the soup then poured over it.
Lovely flavors.
Service at the bar was fast and and entertaining.
We didn't have reservations and the restaurant was full -- though I understand this was because they had some large groups that day and it's often fine to walk up without reservations.
One warning on the cocktail menu: I had the Burley Old-Fashioned, which is based around a tobacco-infused bourbon.
The bartender warned me against it ('Some non-smokers like you get a little nauseated...') but... well, she knew what she was talking about.
I'm definitely a lightweight when it comes to handling my tobacco-infused bourbon.
It took me a few trips to the restroom to clean out my system after that.
Except for the drink (which I find hard to hold against them), this was the best restaurant I've been to in Vegas, and one of the best anywhere.

Let me begin by saying that I love chef Shawn McClain and the food at SAGE did not disappoint.
The reason for the middle rating is the atmosphere and the service.
Our server was fantastic, however we kept getting switched around to different people so I felt like we were asking for things more than once.
I also asked the waiter what my 3rd wine pairing was and he didn't know so he proceeded to go and get the sommelier, who was very rude in his coaching of the appreciation of the pairing.
I thought the pairing was excellent I just could not remember the wine, however I think that he misunderstood.
After interrupting our dinner for 10 minutes while talking down to my husband and I, we explained we just wanted the name of the wine, and he huffed off.
I am still confused over this experience.
Our server apologized for him, this was weird, however somewhat appreciated.
Finally the table.......the attempt to be trendy I understand, but when you do not put a tablecloth on a table then make sure that the table is not chipped through to the wood in places, so that the black table was actually somewhat tattered looking.
The table beside ours was not like this.
Yet again, the entire dining experience did not flow and the service was ....well......weird for lack of a better word.
Food Excellent.

All I can say is that I want to eat here every day...it was that good!
The decor/atmosphere is very nice, the service is truly top notch, and the food was downright amazing!
There were four of us at dinner and we all absolutely enjoyed our food.
I enjoyed the 1/2 portion creamy artichoke soup & 1/2 portion special heirloom tomato/melon salad, the lobster & tarragon pasta with fresh vegetables and the rhubarb parfait...with a little rose champagne as well.
We also tasted the trout and green bean salad, the scallops, the halibut, the cheese sampler and the peach dessert - again, all fantastic!
Truly a fantastic dining experience!

Never in my life did I ever think I would eat anything called Beef Belly.
It had to be one of the most amazing things I've ever had.
Service was top notch.
Atmosphere is great.
Had the chocolate tart for dessert.
It melted in my mouth.
Also tasted the scallops, ribeye, and potatoes.
I highly doubt anything on the menu isn't fantastic.
Definitely a must go if you are in Vegas.

I am giving these guys a 5, relative to other Vegas restaurants, I have had a few better meals in my day, but this is the best I have had in Vegas and I have been there 9 times !
I would also put this place up against other great restaurants in Chicago etc....  Great atmosphere, waiter was super friendly ( and super gay but that usually means good waiter :) The Waygu Beef Tartare was amazing, the egg yoke was slightly poached and just the right amount of seasoning etc.
The foie gras brulee was also amazing, melt in your mouth delicious.
Veal cheeks to top it off, overall a great meal !
Will be back !

I decided to pretend that I was a well-to-do person with no cares in the world, and I took a sudden, two-day trip to Vegas on a complete whim.
Decided at 10:00 am, bought my ticket at 11:00, flew out at 3:00 and by late afternoon I was in Vegas.
I met my parents, and made the executive decision to not go see Viva Elvis.
Instead, I took the time to look around Aria, Cosmopolitan, etc.
and wondered if I could find a good cocktail.
I decided on Sage, and after telling myself I wasn't under-dressed, I wandered in and sat at the bar.
Now, I personally do not think I am the most beautiful person on the planet, but I have come to the conclusion that I am not bad to look at, at least on my good days.
And I was wearing a cute dress, and I put my confident face on.
I ordered the "tea rose" (tea infused Hangar One, rose water, st. germain, lemon, and a pine nut garnish) and settled in to wait for Elvis to let out.
And then, out of nowhere, lovely businessmen started talking me up and invited me to dinner.
Being a tasteful, respectfully married woman, I had to decline, but honestly the vibe, the menu, and the drinks here had me trying to find any available way to get into said dinner while remaining a respectfully married woman.
Sadly, I couldn't come up with any inventive way to do that, so I missed out on dinner.
I did, though, get to take in the stylish/romantic/scene-y vibe, and apparently the extremely flattering lighting.
Next time I have more time, or my husband in tow, or a relaxed set of morals, I'm taking myself back here and landing myself a dinner to go with my drink.

The food here is great, i would go back in an instant.
I was a lot happier with my meal than the other 2 peeps i was with, but i bet they would go back and order different things.
I had the sweet breads (rich as a mofo) and tasty, the maine day boat scallops (fucking unreal), and i loved it all.
The peach praline profiteroles were off the charts good.
I want to taste those again.
The service here is amazing.
We were brought out complimentary tastings throughout the meal which were just badass and perfectly timed.

I had the tasting menu at Sage and I thought it was incredibly okay.
The service was very good and the ambience is quite nice, but the food was just okay for the price.
The beef tartar appetizer was very tasty and a nice start to the meal.
The fois gras creme brulee was good, but a little too heavy and the cherries over powered the custard.
I will admit that my expectations were a little too high on this dish based on reviews from others, I had much better fois gras creme brulee in Quebec on my last vacation.
The second and third course were fine, nothing blew my mind.
I wasn't a huge fan of the beef belly.
It was offensive, it just didn't feel very seasonal and was very heavy.
The peach profiteroles were very good and exceeded my expectations based on the description, the chocolate PB dessert option was good but wasn't at all impressive.
Overally I had a nice meal at Sage - it was 3 stars A-OK for sure.
I'd probably give them a second chance in my home town, but there are way too many good great restaurants in Vegas for me to give this one a second chance.

The food, the service, oh my gawd it was THE BEST.
I came here with my friends after Jean Georges lost my dinner reservation and thank god for this place.
I got their $79 Signature Tasting Menu and it was very satisfying, not to mention filling.
What I got on the tasting menu was: First Course: Wagyu Beef Tartare Second Course: Glazed Pork Belly Third Course: Iberico Pork Loin Fourth Course (Dessert): Peach Praline   I would most definitely come back here the next time I'm in Vegas.

I was so excited to eat at Sage but I was disappointed.
The service was okay but we were a little put off when they made us move to a different table in the lounge so that we could order appetizers while waiting for our party to arrive.
The warm goat cheese crostini was not anything special and the soup was very bland.
The chicken was very tender but was not high in flavor.
There are much better restaurants in and around the Aria.

I chose to eat at Sage simply because of its location in the Aria resort where I was seeing a show.
I knew nothing of Shawn McClain or the restaurant.
After eating at Sage, I am a fan of both!
I believe the menu varies according to what is seasonal and fresh.
The menu I saw was pretty extensive for fine dining.
I chose the $79 Chef's Signature menu which is a four course meal, amuse bouche and additional dessert "compliments of the chef.
"  Starter: Bacon bread with whipped butter and sea salt Amouse Bouche: duck pate with fig First course: Heirloom tomato salad Second course: Maine scallops with braised oxtail in salted caramel reduction Third course: Pork loin Fourth course: Peach profiterolls Chef's dessert: mint infused chocolate soup  Cocktail: Desert Blush  I am not exaggerating when I say that each course was truly wonderful.
I felt like I was eating a meal prepared by someone who actually cared about every bite.
The portions are perfect for this type of menu.
The service was spot-on.
It seemed that we had four people making sure we were well cared for -- all very friendly.
The restaurant itself is beautiful and comfortable.
Sage turned out to be a very happy surprise for me.
It was a meal I'll remember.

Service: 4 stars - Professional, but most staff were not particularly warm and friendly.
Bonus for replacing the cocktail I ordered and could not stand with a different option with charge or hassle.
But the service was generally slow.
We sat with our empty dessert dish for 10 minutes and then after someone took that way, with our empty table for another 10 minutes before our waiter checked in with us and we could ask for the check.
Ambiance: 4 stars - Generally aesthetically pleasing but a few small issues.
One - while the place was not very noisy, the acoustics were such that I had a hard time hearing the person across the table from me.
Two - The couches might be a nice look, but I don't want my seat to move when someone else seated at another table has to adjust  their seat unaware that the couch is not stationary.
Food: 4.5 stars - Bread and drinks - My husband asked for a good beer pairing with his duck entree was pleased with the result.
I tried the Smoking Bulleit and could not stand it, but quite liked the flavor combinations in the Jack Snap.
A gentlemen came by occasionally offering us fresh country bacon rolls or sourdough rolls served with a butter with a mild lavender flavor and Australian sea salt.
Pretentious.
But at least the lavender was very mild and the sea salt was delicious - we also used it to enhance the tartare dish (see below).
1st course - We had the wylie beef tartare and the sweet onion and truffle soup.
The soup was creamy with good flavors and wonderful presentation.
The tartare was AMAZING and the best thing we ate.
Main course - My husband had the duck which was perfectly executed, but did not blow him away.
I had the chicken with a truffle ravioli and artichoke.
The artichokes were overly citrusy and the ravioli just wasn't very flavorful.
However, the chicken was perfectly cooked and the sauce had a good flavor.
Dessert - We had something involving a blackberry mouse and dark chocolate.
The portion was...miniscule - 4 bites.
The presentation was nice, and the flavors were alright but nothing divine.
Price: 3 stars - Overly pricey.
The food was well perfectly prepared and the service was professional, but slow.
However, for that price, I expect unique dishes, amazing flavor combinations, and superb service.
The place is pricier and inferior to Mesa Grill at Ceasar's Palace.
However, if you get the early dinner prix fix or the signature prix fix then it would be more reasonable.

An excellent dining experience, without a doubt.
Sage is one of those no-brainer restaurants where you know you're going to have a great meal and not have to stress about it.
My folks were in Vegas and they like to go to fancy restaurants from time-to-time and Sage was on their radar.
All I had to do was get ready and show up, which is how I like it :)  We arrived about 15 minutes before the reservation and decided to have a drink at the bar.
Sparkling rose, please.
I ended up guzzling down about 4 glasses of this stuff over the span of our meal.
Can't get enough of the bubbly.
Our server was quite jovial.
He even tolerated my Dad's cheesy jokes, which automatically promotes him to Sainthood.
More good news?
It was Restaurant Week, which means there were even more delicious dishes to choose from beyond the regular menu.
I ended up splitting the ribeye + bone marrow + foie gras special.
Not my *favorite*, by my favorite +1's eyes lit up when they rattled off some of his favorite foods together on one plate.
How could I say no?
Food was excellent.
Rich, decadent - everything one could expect from a meal of duck liver, red meat and the marrow.
It even came with a side of creamy pureed potatoes.
Dessert?
It was OK. Actually, I don't even remember what we ate.
I was more into my glass of sparkling wine than anything else.
And after two hours at the table, I was itching to go somewhere else.
Why 4 stars instead of 5?
As much as I enjoyed the experience, it's not going on the "Best Meals Evar" list.
There's absolutely nothing wrong with Sage, it's just not a restaurant that I would pick again.
Perhaps I'm not classy enough or my palate is not as refined?
My parents loved it, though, and that's all that really matters, since they were the ones picking up the check ;)

4.9 stars!
Decided to come here for dinner before seeing Sade and John Legend at the MGM Grand.
My cousin was also in town, so we met here a couple hours before the show.
Ambiance was tones of gold and lavender lighting with dark accents.
The entrance was through glass wine displays that opened up into their bar lounge then main dinning area.
Ambiance:  5 stars!
I arrived first and sat at the bar and ordered a fancy cocktail, whose name escapes me, but contained a smoked peach whiskey.
It was fabulous!
The bartender shares that they smoke their peaches, infusing that flavor into the whiskey.
Pretty amazing.
Knowing we had an 8 pm concert, the staff asked twice throughout dinner how they were doing on time.
Nice to know they know, you know?
Service:  5 stars!
My cousin arrives and we delve into the menu and opt for the $79 Signature Tasting Menu with wine pairings (that went perfectly, btw).
Although it wasn't the prix fixe Restaurant Week menu we were intending, we couldn't resist the urge to splurge.
We started with an amuse-bouche of some fish inspired concoction that was a nice start.
The prix fixe allowed us some room to decide among 2-3 choices in each of the four courses.
First course:   1)  Wagyu Beef Tartare of crushed caper aïoli, slow-poached egg and crispy chocolate.
I don't like raw meat, but this was fresh and extremely flavorful.
An intriguing pleaser despite our aversion for raw meat:  4 stars.
2)  Foie Gras 'Brûlée' that was more like a tartlet rich with creamy goose liver:  5 stars!
Second course: 1)  Glazed Pork Belly with sweet corn tortellini, Porcini mushrooms & crispy pancetta:  5 star brilliance!
Probably the best dish of the night.
2)  Maine Dayboat Scallops with braised Oxtail, Wild Mushrooms in a salted caramel reduction:  5 stars!
Succulent medallions of scallops adorned in a beautiful sauce that turned out to be my cousin's favorite dish.
Third course: 1)  Iberico Pork Loin with milk-braised cannelloni with baby eggplant and Creminelli Mortadella.
The fact that my cousin offered me none is testament of its superiority:  5 stars!
2)  48 Hour Beef Belly with golden chanterelles, Padrón peppers and California plums:  5 stars!
I'm a big sucker for belly meat, so this outrageous dish won big time in my book.
Dessert course: 1)  Peach Praline Profiteroles or roasted peaches with praline gelato and peach jus:  4.5 stars.
2)  Crunchy Chocolate & Peanut Butter Tart with cassis sphere & in a toasted marshmallow sauce:  5 stars!
Give me chocolate or give me death!
A high brow example of a low brow standby.
A great experience, exactly what I wanted to mark my ten year return to Vegas (no joke!
)  Tally: Ambiance:  5 stars!
Service:  5 stars!
First Course:  4+5= 9/2= 4.5 Second Course:  5 stars!
Third Course:  5 stars!
Dessert Course:  4.5+5= 9.5/2= 4.8 Wine Pairings:  5 stars!
5+5+4.5+5+5+4.8=5= 34.3/7= 4.9 stars  #Yelp 365:  050/365

Absolutely loved it!!!
Atmosphere, service, food, just about everything was perfect in this place.
Me and my wife had Chef's Signature tasting menu and everything was just cooked to perfection.
My only complain was we got there 5 minutes before our reservaton time and it took them another 15~20mins until we got seated.
Other than that, I highly recommend.
If you are not sure what to eat, just go with Chef's Tasting menu.
You will enjoy it and leave full and happy!

Food was superb.
best in las vegas thus far.
had heirloom tomato salad as app.
really good.
and for the entree the skate wing dish.
really flavorful.
wife had the 4 course chef's menu -outstanding.
1. beef tartare  2. scallop dish 3. braised beef and 4. dessert was chocolate/peanut concoction.
this prix fixe menu you have two choices for each course.
ask the server what they recommend.
also the drinks were really good- mojito, cranberry and vodka and nice wine selection.
btw the place has a cool, dark vibe with upscale crowd.
it's the IT  restaurant  in LV right now..

One of the best dinners I have ever had ..... and I eat a lot (too many) nice dinners.
Great service and ambiance which only makes the food taste even better.
I dare you to try but dont clog up my reservation time ;)

I felt a little bit like a country bumpkin when my boyfriend walked me through doors of Sage.
I mean, I have been to a few nice restaurants in my day, however, I have never been the youngest person in the room at any of those places.
In Sage's case, that's probably because when people my age visit Vegas they partake in the $19.95 buffet at the Imperial Place and drink margaritas out of large plastic cups.
I am extremely happy that my boyfriend and I have either better taste or deeper pockets than most of the 21-25 year old crowd because this restaurant is delicious!
We started with drinks at the bar towards the front of the restaurant.
Sean said that his Martini was one of the best he ever tasted, and my peach bullet was just unreal.
The bartender was awesome.
I couldn't decide on my pre dinner drink, and he helped me choose based on other drinks that I do like.
He also spent a good twenty minutes giving Sean and I a lesson in different absinthes.
He let us smell all of the different kinds that Sage offers and taught us about both the French and Russian methods of serving it.
Fun fact: Sage sells the most absinthe of anywhere in the world.
We were walked into the main dinning room which is decorated with deep purples, dim lighting, and dark wooden tables.
After being seated, we were given bread and creamy butter with an array of spices mixed in.
After that the chef treated us to a sample of the soup of the night.
I can't remember what it was called, but it was fantastic.
We ordered beef tartare for our appetizer.
I was a little hesitant to try it, but I am so glad I did.
It was probably one of the best tasting foods I have ever had.
I can't really compare it to other tartares because this was my first time having it, but as a N00b I really enjoyed it.
I ordered the spagetti with scallops, lobster, and octopus as m main course.
I also really enjoyed that, but it was a little too much after the starters.
We ended with a hot chocolate and orange soup.
It really put the final touches on the meal.
Everything was perfect.
Our main server and the other staff that waited on us through out the night really made it a wonderful evening!

Very delicious.
Had the Pork Tenderloin Medallions.
Was excellent!
Moist, succulent, and paired with eggplant and shredded pork wrapped in an egg noodle sheet.
The friendboy ordered the Braised short ribs.
Also, very tender and juicy.
Decor was nice, ambiance was just right for a nice romantic mood, and was also cozy.
Do not order drip coffee/french press.
It looked like tea with fershly ground black pepper.

My husband said it was the best meal of his life.
For me it was in the top 5.
We both had the 4 course tasting menu.
With the Amuse and the petifore, it was actually 6 courses.
Highlights: Service was top notch.
Food-  The beef tartar made all other beef tartars inadequate by comparison.
Luxurious, decadent and so delicious.
The pork belly was the best I've ever tasted and divine with the corn that accompanied it.
Loved the beef belly in all its fatty richness.
Everything we had was well seasoned and beautifully presented.
Lowlight: for $10 extra, I got the foie gras creme brulee.
It was OK, but the flavor was a little too delicate for my tastes.
Sage deserves to in the top tier of Las Vegas restaurants.
I would recommend this restaurant to almost anyone.
It's romantic, service is incredible and everything we tried was good to excellent.
Our bill was around $230 without tip- and totally worth it.

Very delicious, very refined, very service oriented.
This restaurant should be on everyone's list.
The food is local, fresh and natural.
The chef is innovative and the wine list is exciting.
I will definitely return here every time I am in Vegas.
A complete hit!

Came here for the bachelorette party and the MOH so graciously paid for our ridiculously expensive meal.
Ordered the braised veal cheeks, tried the farms chicken and kobe skirt steak.
The beef tartare with a bit of crispy chocolate was interesting - you didn't really taste the chocolate but who knew this could taste good.
AMAZING bacon bread - could not get enough.
Any restaurant to put bacon on anything and chocolate in meat and pull it off deserves 5 stars.
My review isn't doing it justice.

So disappointing!
We had the signature menu $79, and between the two of us tried all the items.
The scallops were the only item that I can report as tasty.
The beef and pork loin were over salted, and garnished with a slice of deli meat.
I felt like I was on a bad episode of chopped.
What a waste!
The search of the Rosemary's replacement is still ongoing.

I love this restaurant - elegant decor, great service and the food is delicious!
Instead of ordering an appetizer and a main course, I decided to order three appetizers.
I started with the Yellowtail dish.
It was basically yellowtail sashimi with truffles.
It was an ok dish.
I felt the truffles were a little overpowering.
I couldn't really taste the fish.
My second dish was the Beef Tartar.
OMG, it was sooo good.
The beef was fresh and seasoned perfectly.
Paired with crunchy bread, I almost licked the plate.
I ended my dinner with the Foie Gras Custard 'Brûlèe'.
It was one of the most creative and delicious foie gras dishes ever.
Loved every single bite of it.
I am giving it a four star rating because the Yellowtail dish was just alright and I just couldn't believe that after spending $100, I was still hungry.

I am quite undecided about how to rate the whole experience at Sage.
Food was really good but very one note...
There was no progression in the Signature menu - every dish was rich and heavy and one was similar to the other in more ways than one.
The wine pairing was OK.
I am not a big wine person so I wouldn't know the quality but i liked 3 out of 4 of them.
Foodwise, Tried every options except the brussel sprouts on the menu.
It would be a little lengthy to go through all the 8 dishes plus Amuse but these are the hits:  Wagyu Beef Tartare - really good and seasoned very well.
I liked the poached egg touch rather than raw.
Not the least bit slimy.
Foie Gras Brulee - Rich and quite strange.
I can't stop eating it but the iron-y aftertaste can be off putting to some.
The brioche that came with was amazing!
Maine Dayboat Scallops - The scallops were quite good and it came w delicious braised oxtail.
48 Hour Beef Belly - Great dish.
Very rich and tender...Flavours are reminiscent of BBQ Ribs.
The other dishes were OK, nothing great but well prepared.
But I didn't like either desserts, they were a little blah...   Service was horrendous that night.
Our 4 course meal took us over 2.5 hours.
We waited for over 30 minutes before our orders were taken... Our waiter was never around and it was just overall frustrating to spend so much time trying to find him to order, to get the bill and even to order a coffee with my dessert!

There is no other way to describe my experience at Sage other then amazing!
My husband treated me to Sage after raving about it over and over again, so I definitely went in with high expectations.
We made reservations for 8pm, so I was slightly annoyed when we weren't seated for 20 mins post our reservation time.
However, our waiter Jason made up for things service-wide.
He was extremely attentive, to the point where my husband could not leave the table without coming back to a folded napkin (it became a challenge after a while)  We decided to order the Chef's tasting menu, and WOW, absolutely NO disappointment there!
The food is inventive, creative, extremely tasty, I raved about it to friends for three days afterwards.
Chef McClain takes things you would never think go together, and turns them into an absolute masterpiece in your mouth.
The Foie Gras Brûlèe left us requesting more brioche so we could literally clean the plates.
The 48 hour beef belly just melts in your mouth, my mouth is watering just thinking about it!
The best restaurant in Vegas!

We decided to go for the four course menu, and since there was two of us, we pretty much just ordered everything so that we could sample everything.
My favorite course was the first (the oysters and the beef tartare were AMAZING!
) but so was everything else.
I love the decor of this place... simple yet so elegant.
Not too much going on.
It's wide open yet intimate.
Beautiful!!
Our server was fantastic, and I couldn't have asked for a better evening.
I had some cocktails, but can't seem to remember the name...I believe it was some tea cocktail, but it was yummy!
I highly recommend you try this place out.
I want to go back.... =]

We had the signature tasting menu which was a perfect way to try a lot of their menu.
Hands down the first course was by far and away the best:  the market oysters and wagyu beef tartare were heaven.
The decor is quite subdued.
You know you are here for a fine dining experience, no loud gimmicks or distractions.
Service was top notch and the price will not break the bank.

Sorry, but Sage just doesn't do it for us.
I know that I would be the odd one out in the sea of 4-star and 5-star reviews, but hey, I tell it like it is.
Our dinner was at 7.30 and we thought we had ample time to get ready before heading to our table at XS (I told our host we would get there at 11.30).
But we were late - a large part of it was due to our server.
He was nice and all, but boy was he slow.
He gave us our menu, left, came back 15 minutes later to go through the specials, and left again, during which time we decided to go with the four-course signature menu.
At that time, it was already 8 and we were ready to kick off the dinner, but our server was busy chatting with other patrons despite the fact that he acknowledged that we were ready to order.
Another 10 minutes passed before he finally wrapped up his earnest discussion and finally took our order.
$79 for the four-course dinner plus $39 for wine pairing seemed like a great deal, until the courses were served.
The dishes ranged from underwhelming to pure nasty.
My beef tartare was the latter and the beef belly was the former (maybe I'm uneducated and unsophisticated but, I don't come across beef belly too often.
I'd like to think it's for a good reason because well, it just doesn't taste good and I could think of a bunch of other parts of the cow that are infinitely better).
The best dish was dayboat scallops, which were plump and fresh.
But the entire experience, plus the price tag, just made for a bad meal overall.

When my brother and I go to Vegas, we've made a tradition of going out for one high-end meal.
Sage was our choice on this latest trip.
We had an early reservation, and sat back for our evening's feast.
We did the four course "Signature Tasting Menu" with beer pairings.
(nothing wrong with wine, but I'm a beer guy)  Bread was brought out to start.
Sourdough and country bacon rolls were the choices, served with homemade butter and a little sea salt.
My first course was the wagyu beef tartare paired with Chimay grande reserve belgian ale, the second course was maine dayboat scallops and Sierra Nevada Ovila dubbel ale, the third course was iberico pork loin matched with Sam Smith's nut brown ale, and the final course was apple and fennel strudel paired with Aventus german weisbock.
This was followed with a shot of chocolate hazelnut soup.
My brother basically did the other half of the tasting menu (with the optional foie gras brulee), but I'm not going to type that out, too!
The only decision I would change would have been dessert.
I would have chosen the crunchy chocolate peanut butter tart with the Young's double chocolate stout, if for no other reason than my preference for the stout over the bock.
Service was professional, knowledgable, and efficient, and the surroundings elegant.
It was a fine choice for a couple suave brothers out on the town.

Pretty darn good.
We did a surprise 6 course tasting, and that was pretty good.
I didn't get a chance to taste the menu.

I cannot recommend Sage enough.
It has an incredibly attractive atmosphere and the food exceeded my expectations.
Sage specializes in absinthe and I would highly recommend getting it Russian style.
I ordered the veal cheeks and my friend had the kobe steak, both were incredibly tasty.
We ended up spending quite a bit but we agreed it was worth it.

I can't believe all the great reviews, because I was so disappointed with this place.
My boyfriend and I went there for our anniversary, thinking the tasting menu would be worth saving up for.
We're fine dining lovers but also students, and while I certainly realize there are much more expensive places in Vegas, Sage isn't cheap at $79 for a tasting menu plus $39 for the wine pairing.
It's certainly expensive enough that we expected exceptional food and wine.
Unfortunately, that's not the case here.
Each dish was underwhelming at best and completely unfortunate at most.
On top of that and sadly, even if they had been delicious, they were so TINY it barely mattered.
We understand that tasting portions are supposed to be smaller, and we've been to enough really high end restaurants to know, but these plates seemed like a satire of the tiny plates in fancy restaurants.
After spending almost $350, we left talking about ordering grilled cheese from room service later that night.
So, details.
To be fair, let's start with the good stuff.
The restaurant was pretty.
The waiter was attentive.
(The busboy was actually even better--a nice guy who was totally on top of everything.
)  The bread, butter and pink sea salt were all tasty.
The menu was creative, which is the reason we chose Sage in the first place.
And....well, that's about it.
Because...that inventive menu?
A mess.
Almost every single dish we had took what might have been a beautiful main ingredient and ruined it by throwing it entirely out of balance.
We started, for example, with lovely oysters.
But those oysters were drowned in a hot sauce foam that completely killed the briny goodness.
Too much!
We also had that famous fois gras brulee, which was served cold (on purpose, but it was kind of unsettling) and which they decided to throw a sweet, sticky spoonful of marmalade on top of, turning it cotton-candy sweet.
The wine pairings were no help.
For example, yes, it's common to pair rich fois with a sweet wine like a Tokaji, which they did.
But how does that make sense when one is already dealing with a mouth full of marmalade?
Sweet on top of sweet on top of rich.
Straight up gross.
The second course was the best, only because it was okay as opposed to outright bad.
We had the scallops, which were decent.
Small, and not particularly exciting, but okay.
The oxtail in the dish was superfluous, but that's fine since there was barely any of it on the plate, and the salted caramel reduction was, again, a little too sweet.
But it was passable.
The pork belly was tiny and not as succulent as pork belly usually is, and the corn tortelloni was meh; maybe some more pancetta and mushrooms would have made it better (because they make everything better.
)  Anyway, it was okay.
The wine pairing was also the best of the three, though not exciting...a domestic pinot noir, for example, that I could have found for $10 a bottle at Trader Joe's.
The main course was a complete disaster.
The pork loin was sliced too thin and was completely dry.
The beef belly, which I was totally excited about, was a lovely, juicy cut (though, again, was absolutely minuscule).
Imagine the fatty end of a texas-style bbq brisket.
Yum.
Or...yum until you drown out any semblance of flavor with a bunch of hot jalepeno-like peppers.
Then, not yum.
Not at all.
Where a little heat would have been nice, this was a mouth full of pepper in every bite, killing all other flavor.
And wines that were too sweet for both, all around.
The very best dish we had was the chocolate and peanut butter tart at the end.
But who could mess up chocolate and peanut butter?
It was served with a Madeira wine that made me cringe.
My boyfriend's desert was so unmemorable that I actually don't remember what it was...though it was served with a delicious port, so at least they got one wine right.
All in all, we were completely sad that we made the choice we did.
I'm actually a lover of food from places high and low, and I'm as happy getting delicious $8 ramen from a hole in the wall as I am with a gourmet menu.
However, when you're paying over $350 for a meal, it's fair to expect that the dishes have, at the very least, a nice balance of flavor.
These didn't.
Maybe we came on a bad night.
But we won't find out, because there's no way we're ever going there again.

Amuse Bouche of Onion Soup and Toasted Sunflower Seeds was a nice start to Sage and tantalized our taste buds as it should.
MARKET OYSTERS  Piquillo Pepper and Tabasco Sorbet/Aged Tequila Mignonette  (Nigl Riesling Kremsleiten 2005) The oysters went down smooth and then the kick came in from the tabasco and tequila mignonette.
Wow!
what a bite on the buds.
good burn WAGYU BEEF TARTARE  (2010 Prieure de Montezargues Tavel Rosé) Crushed Caper Aïoli/Slow-Poached Egg/Crispy Chocolate  Loved this dish.
chocolate and beef huh??
Yes please.
it was great.
the poached egg on top was a perfect texture and complemented the dish quite well.
I love capers and the aioli was the coup de grace and was the death of me, but a good death it was.
BACON WRAPPED RABBIT (Olivier Leflaive Bourgogne Blanc Les Setilles 2008) This was a new addition to their menu and was fantastic!!
It was tender, it melted in my mouth, every bite was bliss.
MAINE DAYBOAT SCALLOPS  Braised Oxtail/Wild Mushrooms/Salted Caramel Reduction (Elk Cove Willamette Valley Pinot Noir 2008) I love me some scallops and when scallops are cooked well, I am having a hard time, right now, finding something more pleasant on the palate.
the reduction was a perfect blend of sweat and salty.
the oxtail was amazing as well.
very tender and blended with the scallops and reduction, making it the perfect bite of smooth, crust, sweet, salty and savory.
The only thing that made this dish a little less than amazing was the broccolini that was too bitter to eat.
I like broccolini, but this was a bad bunch to me.
IBERICO PORK LOIN       Milk-Braised Cannelloni/Baby Eggplant/Creminelli Mortadella (Chateau Des Tourelles Cote-Du-Rhone) This was my least favorite dish.
It was still good, but all in all the texture was off pleasing.
It was mushy and flat.
It also had a cabbage in the dish that was so bitter.
Too bitter for my taste.
Way to bitter.
It ruined a whole bite of food and left my palate hurting.
Yuck!
Two dishes with a bitter component that almost ruined the dish.
They need to address this issue.
8 HOUR BEEF BELLY   Golden Chanterelles/Padron Peppers/California Plums (2005 Finca Allende Rioja Allende) This was my second favorite dish, right behind the scallops.
The beef belly was great, fatty and tender.
This was the best pairing of wine I had all night.
I needed a high tannin red to help open my palate back up.
CRUNCHY CHOCOLATE AND PEANUT BUTTER TART  Cassis Sphere/Toasted Marshmallow Sauce (Taylor Fladgate 10 Year Tawny Port) WOW!
this tasted like a peanut brittle mixed with a peanut butter cup of epic proportion.
If you didn't want to come for a meal here, come for a drink and ask for a piece of this scrumtrulescent delight.
APPLE FENNEL STRUDEL (Broadbent Madeira Malmsey 10 Years Old) Not a bad finish, but when you compare it to the other dessert, it doesn't hold par and therefore not note worthy.
I was good, tasted like a fancy apple pie a la mode, but nothing more.
They finished us off with a hot chocolate with kailua shot.
It was quite nice and left my wife smiling on the way out.
Chef Shawn McClain came out and the end of our meal and asked us how they did, any improvements he should look upon, and thanked us for coming in.
Very nice touch.
I like going out to eat at the fancy schmancy places but I hate the air of pretensions.
This place left me with a warm feeling.
We were kindly greeted, and seated in a very private and romantic setting.
All of the staff was extremely nice.
No hoity toity feelings.
Friendly and casual.
Thank You for the great night.
If you like good food but do not want a stuffy atmosphere, this is a great place to come.
Although we went with a prix fixe menu, they have plenty of a la carte items and will greatly reduce the overall cost.
YUM.........

The girlfriend and I were in town for a much-needed vacation.
After some advance research, we decided on Sage in Aria for our first dinner in Vegas.
We were met for dinner by a group of friends.
Our party of five was seated at a spacious round table in a large, high-ceilinged, modern yet not overdone dining room.
From its sheer size and layout, Sage lends itself to big, boisterous meals with good friends rather than a quiet, intimate meal with a significant other.
The menu is diverse and offers an appetizing selection of American cuisine.
It took no time at all for the girlfriend and I to decide on getting the $79 Signature Tasting Menu.
One of the nice things about the tasting menu is that you have a couple of choices for each course and that not everyone at the table has to order it.
Therefore, the girlfriend had one dish while I had the other which allowed us full coverage of Sage's Signature Tasting Menu.
Our meals started off with an amuse of a slice of Chicken Sausage that seemed more akin to a terrine than a savory sausage.
Not bad, but not truly memorable.
What was memorable was my first course of five Morro Bay Oysters topped with an aged tequila mignonette and an interesting, but very complimentary Piquillo pepper and Tabasco sorbet which actually looked and tasted like a frozen Sriracha sauce.
The oysters were exceedingly fresh, plump and juicy.
The sorbet was sublime and would make for a spicy dessert in its own right.
The girlfriend's first course, the Wagyu Beef Tartare with crushed caper aioli, slow-poached egg, and crispy chocolate, was equally satisfying.
My second course was the Maine Day Boat Scallops, which were seared perfectly with braised oxtail, chanterelles, and served over a salted caramel reduction.
It was simply excellent and outshined the GF's well-executed Glazed Pork Belly with sweet corn tortellini, porcini mushrooms and crispy pancetta.
The third course was my personal favorite of the meal, the 48 Hour Beef Belly...braised for two frickin' days!!!...
with golden chanterelles, Padron peppers, and California plums tossed in at some point.
Holy Mother of God, this dish was savory and practically melt in your mouth tender.
It could almost make me forsake pork belly forever for the lure of more of this beef belly!
It surpassed a very impressive dish of Iberico Pork Loin, milk-braised cannelloni, baby eggplant, and creminelli mortadella.
For dessert, we had the Crunch Chocolate and Peanut Butter Tart, with a cassis sphere and toasted marshmallow sauce.
I'm not a big dessert guy, but I can appreciate one well done.
This was one of those cases.
It was a gourmet Reese's Peanut Butter Cup, but so much better!
Chef Shawn McClain and Sage were unknown quantities to me before stepping into the restaurant.
I have been enlightened.
While Sage may not have received the acclaim of some of Vegas' other fine dining establishments, it more than holds its own.
Service was first-rate.
Sage delivers with fresh ingredients, bold flavors, and exciting dishes.
Obviously, your mileage may vary, but on this night Sage was a strong 4.75!

After contemplating on various places to eat, I decided on Sage because of the strong reviews.
The restaurant is gorgeous and elegant...reminding me of  a big city vibe.
Service was amazing, the waiters never let our water glasses go empty.
And the food was delicious, hence, I live my life filling it up with food that makes my tummy go yummm.
They give two choices of breads, a sausage biscuit one or a sourdough one which the sausage biscuit was warm and fresh.
The waiters offered an Amuse Bouche of Onion Soup with Toasted Sunflowers as well.
Onions are normally so pungent, but the aroma of this soup was extremely comforting and smooth, hats off to the Chef (who is also from San Diego :) ).
I ordered the Seared Bigeye Tuna Sashimi to share with everyone which included 5 slices of melt in your mouth tuna.
I had ordered the Braised Veal Cheeks which was extremely tender, while my friends ordered the Maine Boat Scallops and the Potato Arctic Char which both extremely flavorful as well.
The waiters also gave us another sample of a Chocolate Kahlua soup at the end of our meal with our desserts that was delish!
Very rich chocolate and it was absolutely perfect for our group of girls :)   I just wanted to try something a little different than what the prix fixe menu had offered, and I thought the Chef did a great job, however, I can also see how others could also say that there wasn't anything too impressive because you are able to find each of some of the ingredients such as tuna, steaks, scallops at other restaurants as well.
The main point I'm making is that when I go out to eat, I'm looking at the artistic point of view of how the chef turns these simple items into something memorable which is why I'm writing this review.
This place is wonderful for groups of family and friends with great service.
It is rather on the pricier side, but you are paying for service and ambiance which was top notch.
Sage Restaurant, I love your waiters, the hostess and the Chef.
I hope to visit again soon!

Foie grad custard - very rich but that's expected when you have egg AND foie together.
the foie wasn't just sitting on top of the custard but was incorporated into the custard - very nice touch.
Wagyu Tartare - as if wagyu wasn't decadent enough, they top it off with a sous vide egg!
Oysters - (very!
) small but vinegared shallots were very flavorful   Scallops - best I've ever had, and with braised oxtail -- Wow.
Beef belly - melt in your mouth richness  Apple strudel - yum but too full by this point.
The complimentary warm white chocolate soup should've came earlier :)

Very well executed plates of seasonally inspired fare.
Not a bad tasting course on the $120 Chef's Tasting Menu.
However, I can't bring myself to love this place.
For the money, I just didn't think the value was there.
The portions were silver-dollar sized.
The accompanying wine pairing was all 2 oz pours - again just enough to give you a taste.
I honestly felt afterwards like I wanted a sandwich.
Service was amiable but a bit casual for a fine dining establishment.
The hostesses at the front are your usual post-teen malcontents you'd find working at a P.F.
Changs.
For the money, you're much better off at about a dozen other restaurants in Vegas.

During our recent trip to Las Vegas, I had to do some damage control to make up for the supremely lame meal we had the previous night at Delmonico's at the Venetian.
Mid-afternoon on a Saturday, she was browsing Yelp looking for a dinner spot and stumbled upon Sage.
We called and were able to make a reservation for 9pm that same night.
We arrived a little early but the restaurant had quite a few open tables, so the hostess offered to seat us right away.
We declined and instead had a cocktail at the bar.
She told us to let her know whenever we were ready to be seated.
There was a sizable selection of signature cocktails at the bar; but the misses went with a Moscow Mule, which was served proper in a cold, copper mug.
Nice touch.
I ordered the Smokin Bulliett, which was bourbon, infused with mint and lemon.
The infusion definitely subdued the burn a bit, but it was delicious.
After a short while at the bar, we elected to be seated.
Our waiter, Marcus, promptly introduced himself, presented the wine list and went through the menu with us.
He was very friendly and polite.
When he mentioned the chef's tasting menu, we were instantly sold.
The chef's tasting menu is a six course meal ($120 per person) with optional beer ($50/pp) or wine ($60/pp) pairing.
We decided to go for the gusto and opted for the wine pairing.
To begin, Marcus brought us a 1997 Nicolas Feuillatte champagne brut with an amuse-bouche -- a single oyster with a dab of foamed hot sauce.
It was a great starter and palette cleanser, with just enough burn to notice it before it faded from your taste buds.
The first course was a hamachi sashimi with lemon, paddlefish row and a pear foam.
Wow!
This chef knows his stuff.
The combination of the yellowtail and the pear was amazing.
At this point, we both just wanted an entire entree of this course.
Next, for the second course, was a foie gras brulee with tangerine marmalade and cocoa nibs.
Another mind blower.
The "brulee" was slightly chilled, rich and creamy.
The richness of the foie gras with the hint of cocoa, and the sweet of the marmalade, worked so perfectly when spread over the brioche on the side.
With the foie gras, we enjoyed a Sauternes (Chateau Roumieu Lacoste, 2006).
The sweet wine with the sweet of the marmalade contrasted the richness of the foie gras very well.
The third course was a pan-roasted sea scallop with small, crispy potato rounds and sweet fennel.
After Marcus brought it to our table, he then poured a Jamon-Iberico (black Iberian pig ham) chowder over the dish.
This "ham" broth smelled amazing and worked in unison with the potato and fennel.
The scallops were cooked to perfection.
Of the six courses, this was both our least favorite.
Please don't take that as a knock on the dish; it was amazing, but alas, something always has to finish last.
Still a stellar dish.
The fourth course was a bacon-wrapped rabbit loin with a pumpkin puree and duck-venison terrine.
The size of this dish was small but perfectly sized to compliment the other courses.
While I enjoyed the rabbit (with bacon!
), I found the duck-venison terrine to be my favorite part of the course.
A terrine is similar to a meatloaf, but with coarser chops on the ingredients, and it's served cold.
Next was a 48-hour beef belly for the 5th course.
I'm not sure what the 48-hours meant, and it escaped my mind to ask at that moment.
The belly was very tender and, as expected, quite fatty.
This course was paired with an amazing juicy and spicy 2004 Nero d'Avola Harmonium from Italy.
For dessert we had a passion fruit mousse with huckleberries and a small almond sponge cake.
The mousse was firm like custard and very delicious.
Just before dessert came, the pastry chef sent us a small "soup" of white chocolate and cayenne pepper.
It was served in something akin to a shot glass and slightly warm.
That was amazing!
My girlfriend hasn't stopped raving about it since.
Final damage with tip was just over $500 for two people.
This was, hands-down, the best food and dining experience I've ever had!
My girlfriend agrees.
The service from Marcus was impeccable.
The atmosphere is sophisticated, modern but still inviting.
Tip of the hat to Chef McClain.
We'll be back every time we're in Vegas.

Superb food, outstanding service!

The food is So So, but my husband and a coworker got the Oysters to start with  and the two of them ended up with food poisoning!
The vegetarain options on their set menu are not great.
Their risotto was not cooked enough, i know risotto is supposed to have bite, but this was ridiculous i was chewing forever!
This year i told the company not to bring us back here!
Maybe I will go to Sirio instead... so much better!

We had an 8-person family dinner here early on a Saturday evening.
They were very accommodating of all our requests, and the service was excellent overall.
Our water glasses were constantly being refilled.
The restaurant is beautiful (and quite large), and it's really quiet, even when the place got packed later during the evening.
I would highly suggest this restaurant for large groups.
Now onto the food!
Their bacon cheese bread to start is quite tasty.
I ordered the tasting menu, and it was soo yummy and relatively affordable, and tons of food!
A few standout dishes were my rabbit wrapped in bacon served with a sweet potato (?
) ravioli.
The combination of salty, smoky, and sweet flavors was amazing!
Also, the chocolate peanut butter dessert the server suggested had amazing texture and crunch.
Served with a raspberry sauce filled dark chocolate.
So yum!
The only criticism I have is probably that the Aria is not my favorite hotel in Vegas...something about the decor/ambiance is just kind of "off".
But 5 stars for Sage anyway, check them out!

In a time when Las Vegas restaurants are remodeling left and right in order to provide a more causal dining experience, Sage still has an almost hidden entryway.
We stopped by near opening time for cocktails ... and a little foie gras.
Originally skeptical, the Foie Gras Custard Brulee was enough to make us want to stop by for a full dinner sometime.
The bar has some good beer on tap - mostly Belgians or Belgian-styles.
They also have a respectable classic cocktail menu.
We came to try out some absinthe, though.
They're a little ... overly sensationalistic ... about the recent availability and changes in law, but they have a decent selection of bottles to choose from and are happy to make recommendations in a variety of price ranges.
They also do the fun, flaming "Bohemian Method" of serving it ... or the more staid French water dripping thing.
Service at the bar was friendly and fun ... we were about the only people in the restaurant at that hour, though.

My sister made reservations for this place based on the reviews.
Thought we would fine dine it out the last night before we left the sinful desert.
Sage definitely did not disappoint.
Service - 5 Stars Cleanliness - Excellent Price - $79.00/person for Chef Mcclain's Signature Menu Seafood - Yes, oysters, Pacific Yellowtail, tuna, cod, scallops, black bass, trout Meats - Yes, beef, venision, veal, chicken, etc Vegetables - Yes, salads.
Dessert - Yes Fruits - Yes Other - (1) Located in the Aria Hotel, (2) Cash and Credit Cards are accepted here.
(3)  Chef Shawn McClain creates "The New American menu laced with Mediterranean contexts.
"  (4) McClain has received the 2001 James Beard Foundation Best New Restaurant and 2006 Best Chef Midwest awards.
Appetizer:  Chicken Sausage (Complimentary) - A-Ok (3 Stars) - Quarter sized slice of chicken sausage served with jam and green bean.
If I was blind tested, I would not of known that it was chicken.
It definitely had the texture of a sausage but it was not as tasty as I thought it would be.
The only odd thing is that it was served cold.
Bacon bread and Sourdough (Complimentary) - So they have a guy walk around offering bread and you get a choice of bacon bread and sourdough.
My sister's fiancé is a bread fiend so he asked for both.
I did the same not because I love bread, but I was worried I would leave hungry since these fancy places tend to serve small portions.
Trust me, get the bacon bread and it's for obvious reasons.
The bread comes with silky smooth butter and sea salts.
First Course:  Wagyu Beef Tartare - Yay!
I'm a Fan (4 Stars) - Wagyu beef tartare with crush capered aioli, slow poached egg, pickled mustard seeds, and crispy chocolate.
This dish does come with a side of toasted bread.
Tasted great!
The texture reminds me of pate.
The soft, raw beef along with the slow poached egg made it really creamy and went well with the toasted bread.
Very generous portion of tartare--approximately 3" in diameter and 1" thick.
Second Course:  Bacon Wrapped Rabbit - Yay!
I'm a Fan (4 Stars) - Bacon wrapped rabbit with heirloom carrots and roasted garlic ravioli with salsify cream and black truffle.
You get 3 pieces of bacon wrapped rabbit (3" x 1") and 2 ravioli (2" in diameter).
The prominent flavor was the deep smoky bacon.
The rabbit tasted like regular white meat because the bacon was so overwhelming.
The roasted garlic ravioli tasted good as well, however it was bland because the smoky bacon would not leave your mouth.
Third Course:  48 Hour Beef Belly - Woohoo!
As good as it gets!
(5 Stars) - Beef belly that have been cooked for 48 hours with roasted chestnut puree, Brussel sprouts, and pickled sweet onions.
This beef was totally like butter--soft like it, you slice through it like it, and melted like it in your mouth.
The flavor is to remember because to this day I think about how wonderful it tasted.
Other beef will not be the same after you had this beef belly.
This is the beef you marry--we are soul mates.
Fourth Course:  Warm Apple-Fennel Strudel - Yay!
I'm a Fan (4 Stars) - This is a deconstruction of apple-fennel strudel with hazelnut crumble and brown butter ice cream.
The apple was nicely sweet and warm and worked well with the smooth and creamy brown butter ice cream.
The paper-thin sheet of dough was crispy and flakey and gave the dessert a little added crunch and texture.
Complimentary:  White chocolate dessert shot - Yay!
I'm a Fan (4 Stars) - Our waiter for the evening came by and brought this out stating it was the compliments of the chef.
It was served in a white ceramic shot glass.
It was served warm and was very rich and sweet.
It reminds me of the warm soy bean that is served for Taiwanese breakfasts.
The only main difference there is a spicy kick at the end.
The service and food is wonderful here.
I definitely recommend Sage as a must try whenever you are in Vegas.
You'll like the ambiance as well--very dim and warm lighting.
Plus, the area is very spacious and you will not be in the space of other diners.
Sage is a Woohoo!
As good as it gets!

Color me disappointed.
With such high reviews on Yelp, I really thought that this was going to be great new find.
Service was just meh.
Our guy rambled through the tasting menu dishes as they came out and then was off just as quick as he came.
The food itself was not very memorable.
Now, it might have been a jaded experience because I'd eaten at L'Atelier the night prior, but had I not taken picture of each dish as they came out, I wouldn't have remembered them.
It wasn't until the next day when I saw the hamachi dish that I recalled how good it was.
I wish the entire tasting menu has consisted of that.
The oyster - meh.
And now that I see that Sarah C.'s husband and coworker got food poisoning, I'm pretty sure that's what made me sick too.
I think the most offensive dish was dessert.
I'll post a photo -- but believe me when I tell you this passionfruit mousse looked like a damn stick of room temperature butter.
In terms of flavor, it was pretty good -- but that's after you get the idea of eating butter out of your head.
Not an easy feat.
The best part of the meal?
Another server who looked just like Kevin Spacey and had personality to boot.
I wish he'd been our guy.

got the signature menu and was not disappointed it was great!

I was so excited to try Sage after one of my best friends raved about it!
I would have given it 5 stars if they hadn't basically kicked us out at 11pm.
They took our reservation for 3 at 10pm, but that's ok.
The scallops more than made up for it!
WOW!
I had a glass of wine, but my friend had the ginger beer drink and it was AMAZING!
Very impressive!
Even came in a copper mug.
The restaurant is very beautiful and very simple.
We had two waiters- one was very knowledgeable and gave excellent recommendations, and the other was delightfully sarcastic:) Overall, we had a very enjoyable experience.

I travel to Vegas frequently for work and that usually includes infrequent memorable dining experiences.
Based on proximity of meetings and entertaining clients I have been to dinners at places like Nobu, Mesa Grill, Olives, Delmonico, Cut, Craftsteak... the list goes on.
With the exception of Nobu, I think you can usually have good meal, some times very good, just nothing that's going to blow you away.
Nothing that's gonna grab you and say, "hey!
look at me!
forget the hot women (or men), loud craps table, and ringing slot machines.
This is a meal you ain't gonna forget so pay attention!
"  I've had these before in Vegas (Raku), just not on the strip and especially not for around $100pp.
Enter Sage.
You walk past the Aria lobby and through a mini hallway.
It seems as if Sage is hidden in some back room like a high roller's restaurant only.
Even at the hostess counter you don't get visibility in to the restaurant.
I immediately say to the hostess "hey this place looks dead.
are you sure I should eat here?
" With no hesitation she sassily responds with a giggle "uh yaaaah, he kicks ass.
" Right there I know I'm good.
I didn't even know the chef's name but from her comment "he" is someone that's gonna hook me up.
To make things easy my business partner and I went with the Signature tasting menu and added the yellowtail crudo cause hey I love yellowtail.
You get a few choices for each course which allowed us to sample most of the dishes between the two of us.
The amuse bouche (which I don't remember) and the yellowtail were both not bad but are not what's going to bring me back.
What's bringing me back?
Oysters!
I'm an oyster fein and my goodness these might have been the best oysters I've ever had.
People are going to slap me.
I'm from the Pacific NW and I believe these were Kushis.
There are a good amount of people who refuse to believe that Vegas can get fresh seafood.
I guess they think only humans get transported via airplane.
These oysters were amazingly fresh.
They were semi-sweet, a tad briny, and  creamy.
There was zero hint of fishiness.
It was topped with a tabasco sorbet which was was inventive.
I don't know what it was.
The freshness.
the tabasco sorbet.
Something about these oysters blew me away.
Instant jackpot!
The rest of the meal was outstanding.
With 2nd course I got the pork belly.
It was a really good cut with just the right amount of fat and lots of meat.
I remember it being tender and moist, not dry like many other pork dishes.
I also tried the scallops with oxtail which I do believe would've been the better option of the two.
For the main course I had the beef belly (lots of belly in my belly!).
This dish melts in your mouth.
You could cut it with your fork.
I know that beef belly isn't exactly the most expensive dish.
Really, it's an offshoot of the short rib.
But man, the way they do it here was top class.
Great job.
I was drunk and full by the time dessert showed up so I honestly don't remember how good it was.
I just remember enjoying some crispy tarts and a peach thingy.
What I do remember is that Sage was impressive especially at $80 for the tasting menu.
The hostess set the tone and the food carried it on.
Sage has become my favorite restaurant on the strip.
For those of you that think otherwise cause of some other places that start with Joel, e, or Guy... sorry I'm not a high roller and I don't think a restaurant that costs over $200pp that you can only dine once or twice can constitute as a favorite.
Sage on the other hand I'll be frequenting.

I don't know if I was particularly starving or exhausted or some sick combination of both, but I didn't go into Sage expecting a whole lot, but was blown away by the service and the food quality!
It was surprisingly empty for a Friday night, but as long as the food is good, what do I care?
I got the Chef's menu and enjoyed every single dish.
The chef started us off with a little amuse bouche of some sort of escargot.
I'm not a huge fan of snails, but this one tasted a bit smoky and not too much like snail, so all was well.
My first dish was the Wagyu Beef Tartare, with a poached egg yolk on top.
It was served with a generous amount of delicious toasted bread soaked in olive oil and the combination of the beef, egg, and bread was fantastic.
It was followed up with a couple of seared scallops and braised oxtail.
the scallops were cooked perfectly and the oxtail was so tender it practically fell apart.
My main dish was a 48 hour beef belly (actually, it's marinated for 24 hours, then cooked for 48 hours, so it should really be called a 72 hour beef belly) which was so tender it literally melted in my mouth.
By that time, I was completely full; however, this beef belly was so good I finished it all and powered through.
I finished off my meal with an apple and fennel crumble-like concoction with some brown butter ice cream.
While it was delicious, it was way too sweet for me and I couldn't handle it after the copious amount of food I just ingested.
Regardless, the service was amazing - all of the waiters were very attentive and friendly.
The food was delicious and completely blew me away!
I don't know why this restaurant wasn't more packed, because I've definitely been to other "higher-rated" restaurants that underwhelmed and disappointed me.
I'd recommend Sage if you're looking for a great meal at a great price!

Sage was wonderful.
I've been coming to Vegas for four years at Christmas and have eaten at a number of fine dining restaurants.
The meal I had at Sage was the best.
My companion wanted the tasting menu with wine pairings.
Many places require all diners at a table to get the tasting menu.
I applaud Sage for not going that route.
She said all of her dishes were delicious, with a spectacular rabbit dish and excellent wine pairings with very generous pours, not just a splash in the bottom of the glass.
The cocktail menu is interesting and features  an excellent, tangy Moscow Mule.
For anyone who loves the flavor of ginger in a drink, I recommend it highly.
The bread service includes a wonderful bacon bread roll so good I could have eaten half a dozen.
But don't fill up on the bread because you are going to want to eat every bite of your meal.
The amuse bouche was a lobster salad.
I'm not a shellfish fan (not allergic, just don't like it) so I can't comment on it from personal experience.
My companion was happy to eat my portion as well as her own.
I started with a lovely, velvety squash and pear soup that was perfectly seasoned.
There was a balsamic gelee at the bottom of the bowl and as it melted into the soup each mouthful was varied delight of nuanced flavor.
My second course was the pear and brussels sprout salad with bacon and a mustard vinaigrette.
You need to mess up the lovely presentation so you get a bit of each component in every bite.
When you do, WOW!
I had the short rib for my entree.
Deeply crusted, succulent with fondant potatoes and a parsnip puree.
You are going to want to soak up every drop of the sauce.
I had the passion fruit mousse for dessert.
It was light enough to not weigh me down after the three previous courses, full of fruit flavor, silky and delicious.
The final dish of the evening was a small cup of piping hot white chocolate and strawberry cocoa.
I don't know how they infused so much strawberry flavor into the drink, but that touch of acidity from the berries was just enough to cut the richness of the white chocolate.
It was a perfect capper to the meal.
Service at the restaurant was excellent, attentive without being smothering.
The interval between courses was timed perfectly, there was never a need to ask for our water or my iced tea glass to be refreshed and, when we requested lots of ice for our water, we were brought ice every time our glasses were refilled.
I cannot recommend Sage highly enough.
If you have one fine dining experience in Vegas, make it Sage.

Oooh fancy new restaurant in the Aria hotel.....modern yet classy atmosphere... everyone is dressed up....well almost everyone...I saw some woman with tennis shoes....=/ but most were in dressy jeans and dress shirts, dresses and suits.
Like all fancy restaurants...the menu is very limited...and it took me awhile to decide what I wanted.
So for starters, they give a complimentary piece of bread (either the bacon wheat or regular sourdough...since I don't like sourdough I took the bacon wheat...which oOoh was soooooo good with the lavender butter spread!
) then they was a tiny teaspoon of lobster meat and something else..lol also complimentary of the chef...it was a small bite but quite flavorful.
I ordered the Belgian Ale-Braised Short Rib....and my bf ordered the Liberty Farms Duck....I honestly didn't like the short rib that I ordered because it was like eating fat and it was pretty salty....it came in two pieces...with a few fondant potato sticks..which is really fries..lol but they were salty too.....so at $41 dollars I felt like I was eating over-salted larb.
=/ It might sound like I'm exaggerating .... and maybe I am...but that's how I would describe the short rib.
The duck on the other hand was really good...despite the fact that I don't like figs...with which it came with as a light sauce...I liked it way much more than my short ribs.
So I'm really giving this place 3 stars and half....the service was pretty good...nothing to complain about there...it wasn't a very busy night even though it's Friday evening...but then again it's Vegas...most ppl are either drunk or gambling...not eating at $50 a plate restaurants....unless they are up...haha   Overall I guess I wouldn't mind coming back...but eh I might just as well stick with buffets....for $50 bucks at least I get a wide selection...and I would be full...honestly I don't think I was full...so I wanted dessert but they didn't offer anything I wanted so I kinda left not hungry but not super full either.
Good for dates I guess...since if the girl didn't want to eat so full after fitting into that oh-so-hard-to-get-into dress.

My wife and I had the pleasure of dining at Sage the day after Christmas after randomly finding it in the Aria.
A bit of "otherwise can't be bothered" attitude from  the hostess aside, we were treated to a great meal with a lobster amuse bouche, a great iberico/beet salad, incredible roast duck, a risotto, and the final: a hop-gelato-orange-tabasco dessert that we loved.
Great service, good Oregon Pinot and a knowledgeable sommelier later, we were impressed and pleasantly surprised.
highly recommended for a quiet ambience in Vegas.

Thursday, December 22, 2011 at 5:00pm: Party of 4: My Second Visit  Sage was the finest dining experience I have ever had.
I wore my finest suit for the occasion.
We were greeted by a friendly hostess and were escorted into the lounge.
The artwork and decor were classic 1920's / 1930's.
The purple and gold hues with low lighting set the mood.
We were escorted into the restaurant.
My wife and I were in two chairs while the other couple loved the bench seating wrapped around a column.
The menus were easy to read.
Throughout the evening, the staff met all of our needs.
The ones who stood out to me were James, John and Pablo.
They were attentive, quick, personable and knowledgeable.
The meal was outrageous.
The warm bacon bread roll and sourdough baguette with creamy butter and sea salt created an obviously salty taste to the level I wanted.
My wife and I followed that up with the Shaved Brussels sprout salad with pears, macadamia nuts, and a vinaigrette.
It was sweet and tangy.
Slow-Poached Organic Farm Egg: Smoked Potato / Shaved Summer Truffles / Toasted Country Bread.
It was warm and soothing.
The Pacific Yellowtail Crudo: Shaved Trumpet Mushrooms / Black Summer Truffle / Toasted Pine Nuts.
The yellowtail was cool and the pine nuts created a nice texture in combination with it.
Side note: Truffles go great with the last two items.
My main course was the Iberico Pork Loin: Milk-Braised Cannelloni / Baby Eggplant / Creminelli Mortadella.
The meat, pasta, vegetable combination was great.
The meat was soft and had a special flavor.
I had to read a little about Iberico Pork Loin, because it was so good.
It's even a specialty in Spain (Iberian Peninsula).
We didn't get the dessert this time, but we were here in July 2011 and the dessert was excellent in presentation and in taste.
We started the day in an Aria Sky Suite with a view of the Strip watching the sunrise over the mountains just to the left of the Mandarin.
We had breakfast at the Cafe Vettro and spent the day in Aria.
This was end of a perfect day and the beginning of a wonderful evening before going to see a show at 7:00pm.

In the hip and trendy hotel of Aria is Sage, a restaurant that delineates what the hotel is about.
Cool purple lighting on the wall with a dim lit, intimate atmosphere and cool art work, the restaurant is very symbolic of Vegas.
I took my customer here to eat and he and his wife enjoyed the meal very much.
We all started out with the grilled octopus which was fantastic; in fact I haven't had such good octopus in a long time.
For entree, I had the scallops which the chef won the James Beard award with but the dish he won it with probably was something else because I thought the sauce was too rich for me and the scallops.
The customer and his wife had the special rib eye for two which came with bone marrow, mushrooms, onion and foie gras emulsion!
That's right, foie gras emulsion.
I had a couple pieces of the meat and wow was it good.
The foie that touched the meat was a perfect blend, I probably hadn't had such good meat in a long time.
Service was good, explaining and keeping us with rolls.
The rolls were okay but they had a bacon roll.
Yes that is a roll with bits of bacon in it.
Anyway I was stuffed so I didn't get a chance to eat dessert.
I'm giving it four stars because the scallops didn't meet my expectations and the bread while innovative wasn't hot as I like it.
Would I come back?
Didn't you read that I wrote foie gras emulsion?

I had a very good experience at Sage.
Everything was delicious, the aesthetics were pleasant and the staff was very accommodating considering my party was a bunch of increasingly drunk idiots.
Here is what kept my experience from five stars:  * Food was very good, not extraordinary.
To put this in perspective, most of what I had - Pear Salad, Wagyu Skirt Steak, Chocolate Peanut Butter Tart, etc.
- was not "OMFG this is the best bite of anything I've ever had" like you will likely experience at a place like L'atalier.
Don't get me wrong, everything was good but there was nothing surprising, interesting or exciting about any of my dishes.
* The staff would not let the table split between tasting menus and a la carte options.
All eight of us had to get the tasting menu or none of us could get it.
I don't know what was more disappointing, this requirement or the fact that most of my friends were not adventurous enough to get it.
Either way, no tasting menu for me!

Thanks to yelp, I found the right place for a relaxing evening of fine dining with relatives.
The food was superb, and our group of three was happy with the two Signature Tasting and an entree.
The new space is modern and spacious.
There were many large parties on a Sat night, but the crowd was not noticeable with the well-placed tables and booths.
The only drawback is the service; it was good but needs work.
The waitress should have noted that my rabbit starter and the port entree were similar and suggested a change.
Also, we made a change to the order before she left, and the change was not accurate.
Park at the hotel structure and take the tram for one quick stop to the restaurant.

Nooooo.... Last week this place had a 4.5* rating and that's why I chose it.
But now it's 4*, just like every other restaurant.
I tried to push for the $49 early menu but I was told to stop planning like a grandma and to "live on the edge.
"  So I translated that to mean, schedule a 9:30 dinner?
We got to Aria by 9 and had a few drinks at the various bars.
Unfortunately, those drinks distorted my expensive dining experience a bit.
We re-checked in at 9:30 for our reservation and they still weren't ready for us.
We almost fainted from hunger in the restaurant's bar area.
Luckily, when we were seated, we expressed our frustrations to our server and he made sure our food came our at lightning speeds.
We went with the $79 signature menu.
I chose: 1) Wagyu Tartare 2) Maine Dayboat Scallops 3) 48 Hour Beef Belly 4) Crunchy Chocolate and Peanut Butter Tart  He chose: 1) Foie Gras Brulee (OMG, only now as I'm writing this review have I realized that the foie was $10 extra.
Not worth it, btw).
2) Glazed Pork Belly 3) Iberico Pork Loin 4) Peach Praline Profiteroles  The standouts were the Wagyu Tartare, Maine Dayboat Scallops and the Glazed Pork Belly.
Everything else was good but not mind blowing.
Service was awesome and the free bread was super tasty.

Best meal we had in 4 nights in Vegas.
Loved everything...the ambiance, the service and most of all the food.
Creative, yummy,just excellent.
Hubby had 4 course menu with wine pairings.
I had shaved Brussels sprout and pear salad with bacon( fabulous) and then veal cheeks with polenta and mushrooms.meverything was wonderful and the whole experience was just right.
Elegant, and special but also modern and chic...not at all stuffy.
Would go again!

Worth it to try the Signature Tasting Menu for $79 (comes to $100 with tax and 18% tip without any wine/beer pairings or drinks)  I would recommend wagyu tartare and the beef belly.
- good for small or big parties - from the hostess to the waiters, service was very good and accommodating (we had to leave by a certain time and the waiter made sure we did) - all the dishes were delicious and portioned well - all menus are online but aren't always the most updated, either way you can get a gist of the food they serve - they really prefer if the entire table does the tasting menu but I believe will accommodate if not all of your party wants to   Food: 8.5 Decor: 8.5 Service: 8.5  *ratings out of 10

Second time here.
Signature tasting menu with the wine pairing.
I'll let the expert put together the way they think it should be.
It was excellent.
Service was excellent.
Ambience was nice.

Dishes were well made.
Flavors were distinct and came out pretty fast.
Got the tasting menu prixe fixe @ $79.
Paid about $100 per person.
Loved the tartare.
Portions are good with the number of courses.
Only thing that threw me off was the chocolate/peanut butter dessert.
Didn't seem like anything special.

This was probably one of the best meals I've had, ever.
That's saying alot because...
I eat... alot.
We did the special prix fixe that was about ~$130 that included 9 courses (the chef even sent us over complimentary oysters to start).
One of the dishes that stood out the most was the Foie Gras Brulee with a toasted Brioche bun.
[photo: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=ubSUjOIu_riQpizPG9SYDg] I'm familiar with foie gras but I've never had it quite prepared like this.
The other courses were just as good and included scallops in a chowder, rabbit loin wrapped in bacon along with a pate/meatloaf of the innards, 36hr braised beef.
And normally I'm not huge on deserts because I'm not a fan overly sweet deserts and chocolates, but Sage had one of the best if not the best desert I've ever had.
It was perfectly balanced between sweetness/acidity/tangy goodness.
It was something like a White Chocolate Mousse with Passion fruit and Boysenberries and some other stuff.
[photo: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=niFRvZwF-TyZIipUKkOySQ] We ended up ordering coffee, and it came out in a french press which is always a win, but soon regretted that decision when we realized the chef wasn't done quite yet, he also sent out some rosemary hot chocolate and chocolate truffles.
Perfect way to end an already spectacular dinner.
Sage also has a pretty nice wine list and unique cocktails.
We got two bottles from Amarone (which my friend suggested because she had it a couple times and loved it but couldn't find it much anywhere... but they were $250 a bottle!
ha.....
ouch.
) I also ordered a jack snap from the cocktail menu, which was jack honey with ginger ale citrus and some other things, either way it was so good.
Our server was 'fabulous' if you catch my drift, but he was pretty entertaining and constantly came over to check on us.
He was a pretty funny guy, so I'm not complaining.
I swear to god the bussers came over almost instantly and they even came over and folded the napkins back up when people left the table.
SUPER ATTENTION to detail.
Overall, a great experience and I would definitely recommend it if you're out in Vegas and don't mind spending a few extra bucks.

Wanted to try Sage after reading all the good reviews.
Its actually a much nicer looking restaurant than I thought it would be.
For some reason I thought it would be a little more rustic looking.
Anyways, the hottie and I had a great meal and would highly recommend this restaurant to anyone.
We got the signature tasting menu and of course, we each ordered different courses so we could have a taste of everything.
First course the hottie got the foie gras brulee.
It was good but I would not call it spectacular.
I got the wagyu beef tartare.
I will admit I am not a conissouer of tartare so I wasn't sure what to expect.
After all, you would think that since its raw, there would not be much of a difference between wagyu beef or any other beef..... wrong!
It was awesome!
In my mind, the best course I had that night.
The wagyu beef was so flavorful, mixed in with the egg, and a nice crispy toast to go along with it.
Second course, the hottie got the scallops and braised oxtail.
Good scallops but I really can't get excited about scallops anymore.
I got a rabbit wrapped in bacon.
Really creative so that the look and taste of the dish reminded me of canadian bacon.
Yum!
Third course, the restaurant ran out of the beef belly so they replaced it with the braised short rib.
Meat falling off the bone!
I ordered and was really looking forward to the Iberico pork loin.
I had heard so much about Iberico pork I think I was expecting too much.
The pork was good but nothing special.
I think my expectations were just too high for Iberico.
For dessert, the hottie got an apple streudel and I got the chocolate and peanut butter tart.
My chocolate and peanut butter tart tasted like reeses peanut butter cup but richer and more refined.
Overall, high marks for this restaurant and highly recommended to all.

Their food is amazing.
I want to savor every taste on my taste buds.
I loved the foie gras creme brulee and the wagyu beef tartare.
I could have ordered more and eaten these as the meal.
Their duck dish was by far the best.
The flavor was just perfect.
Braised veal shanks probably gave the most food and oh soo good.
The scallops were good, but I didn't think they were as amazing as the first two dishes described.
My husband said the braised short rib wasn't his favorite.

Every dish we ordered were very good, especially the wagyu beef tartare.
The service was good, too.
I also like the restaurant setting.
Highly recommended!

Sage really delivers.
A nice ambience and setting with a friendly staff and amazing food.
I had a prix fixe menu, the pork loin and beef tartare really stood out as exceptional.
The matching wine flights paired perfectly and were nice pours.
I definitely recommend Sage for a nice dinner.

Wow-what a great meal!
We didn't even know anything about Sage.
Just happened to be staying at Aria.
The best service we have ever had.
We went with all of Bonds (Jason) recommendations and he was spot on!
Perfect suggestions for both beer and wine to go with our meals.
Even Matt-who bussed our table was super helpful.
He was able to answer any questions we had about our food and was right on top of keeping our table clean.
Just really great people!
Be sure to ask to sit in Bonds section!

Read the Chowhound reviews extensively and all signs pointed to trying Sage; but ultimately I don't think I ordered the right dishes to make this an above-three star experience.
It is a beautiful space with plush décor and high ceilings located at the Aria hotel and casino.
The experience for me was more of a push-the-envelope foodie dining experience.
I read their cocktails were really good so got the Sidecar, which was good but a little pricey for what I got (I've had better).
For dinner, had the early evening menu and went with the squash and pear soup, organic chicken, and passion fruit mousse with huckleberries.
Food was very good, nothing out of this world mind blowing; but maybe that is because I didn't order off the full menu.
My husband got the Foie Gras crème brulee and brioche which was out of this world fantastic.
He also got the skirt steak which was pretty amazing.
Next time I think I will order off the full menu; I think that is what this experience is telling me.

Food was amazing and portioned perfect for my night out in Vegas.
Not too much but rich.
But we had reservations and no one was inside and it still took 25 min to seat us.
Then the food took so long that we could not get to our desserts we ordered.
Did they charge us for it?
Yes they did.
Please looks great and everyone here is nice and knowledgeable but only go here is you only plan to eat here for the evening.
it takes that long for the food to come out.
Plan on having at least 3+ hours for your meal.
Why a 2?
bc we told them up front we had to be somewhere.
we told the waiter that we had to be somewhere and he assurred us that everything would come out on time.
That being said and for them not to be able to get us our desserts and still charge us for it  - don't sound right.

One of the best meals of our short stay.
The decor isn't as inviting all the way in the back as I would have liked.
We had a group of 8.
The chairs look like conference room chairs, not like a nice dining room chair.
The food was good.
I live in Dallas where there are more restaurants per capita than NYC so I wouldn't say if Sage was in Dallas that it would be my favorite restaurant to visit but it was definitely above average.
Bond was a great server!!
Ask for him if you go here and he will make your visit even more enjoyable...oh, and order the Absinthe cart after dinner!
Even if you don't like Absinthe...it's an experience.

One of the best new York strips I have had.
Hosted a dinner for 10 at Sage and all were very satisfied.

For months, I've heard amazing things about Sage and was planning the dinner I would have in my head.
But when I got there, I made a last minute change.
Instead of the tasting menu, I went with the Oysters with Tobasco sorbet to start and Kobe Skirt Steak for my entree.
Plus, I knew I could count on my dining companion to go with the Signature Tasting Menu.
This was an experience!
Our waiter informed us that it required 2 1/2 hours and he wasn't kidding.
If you have the time, this is the way to do Sage right.
Also did the beer pairing for $39 and every course was complemented by a unique beer.
Naturally, I tried everything!
The standout courses were the rabbit (I'm sorry Bugs Bunny.
I had no idea you taste so good!!
) and the 48 hour beef belly.
Have tried pork belly several times and this was such a cool dish.
Definitely less fatty than pork, but melted in your mouth.
Truly incredible.
As for my food - - those oysters were phenomenal.
I was worried the tobasco sorbet would overwhelm the oyster but my worries were for naught.
I may go back soon just to have a few martinis and these oysters that's how much I loved these!
The Kobe skirt steak was also fantastic.
Cooked perfectly and nicely paired with grilled brussel sprouts, a little spinach and these things that looked like tater tots until you cut into them and discovered what Sage calls potato puree (call a spade a spade - it's mashed potatoes people).
One of my favorite parts was the country bacon bread roll with Sage's homemade butter and sea salt.
I had two of these suckers and I almost always skip bread.
Unfortunately, I ate them so fast I didn't take a photo.
Service was flawless and the dining room is so sexy.
Can't say enough great things about this place.
Wonderful!
Also cool - the after-dinner drinks include several types of Absinthe.
I would never drink that crap but enjoyed watching a few couples around me order it!

From start to finish, Sage was fantastic.
We decided to give this place a shot based on reviews we had read from other Yelpers...excellent work people!
As soon as we arrived for our 7:00 reservations, the staff was attentive and relaxed.
They made a point to chat with us during the very short wait for our table.
It was welcoming and rather nice.
As soon as we were seated, our server, Eric, was on the ball and making an impression--a great one.
Not only was he absolutely astute about the menu, he made fantastic suggestions.
We started with the sweetbreads--they were the most richly delicious I have ever had.
We followed that up with day boat scallops and the sock knocker-offer of the night...the American Kobe NY Strip steak.
Now, for the most part we are rib eye and filet people, but this was probably the best steak we have had in a long time--We are Morton's and Harris' people, so that is saying a lot.
This NY strip was beautifully marbled on the inside and frankly, ate like a filet.
Sensational!
Sage is the place to dine in the Aria.
Go, you will love it.

My favorite American food to date!
I have been to a few restaurants in Vegas.
Picasso,  robuchon are all good but sage tops them in value and decor.
The seasoned waiter gave us do many recommendations for food in Vegas, he even wrote us an entire list of his favorite places!
Order the tasting menu with foie gras creme brûlée please !
You will not regret it.
Even my friends who can't stand American repented after they tasted Sage

I was considering rating Sage as two stars, but the scroll-over says "Meh, I've experienced better.
" That doesn't cut it.
The proper description is "Eek!
Methinks not.
"  Where to start..
I came here with my girlfriend during our visit to Vegas (we live in Los Angeles).
Although we're not poor, it's a meal we saved money for and were planning for -- lots of research on Yelp, mainly.
And for the first time in a long, long time, Yelp let us down.
How do I describe this place...
It's very pretty, but very little substance.
This applies, actually, to most all aspects of our dining experience.
The decor is nice.
It looks like a nice hotel, a bit like the Mandarin in New York.
However, like a nice hotel, it has not warmth.
You don't really walk in and feel comfortable.
Don't get me wrong, it looks really nice, but a bit TOO styled.
Doesn't seem to have feng shui.
Maybe it's not fair to judge too harshly on that, but it does add to the experience.
The service was perfectly on point.
That's not a good thing, in my opinion.
We tried making jokes and chatting to our server, but he didn't really seem to know what to do.
Everyone was just... cold.
Even the general manager who came by seemed like he really didn't care in the slightest bit about us.
These are not people you want in "hospitality".
Okay, let's move to the food.
I don't understand how or why they did this, but they managed to ruin basically everything that looked exciting on the menu.
The oysters were flat.
I like mine strong.
You know, salty, briny.
These tasted sickly sweet.
The spicy sauce on them only accented the lack of oystery goodness.
The foie gras, once again, was sickly sweet.
Some sort of plum marmalade or something underneath it was totally unnecessary, and simultaneously took away from the flavor of the foie without accenting it or enhancing its flavor.
The wine pairings for both of these were awful.
They were too similar to the food, and ended up neither complimenting nor contrasting with it.
We had the scallops as well.
They were good.
The only thing besides the dessert that was.
Well cooked, juicy and firm, and went well with the  wine.
There was a pork belly that was quite bland and forgettable.
A pork loin, Spanish iberico style, that just tasted like ham.
This is about where I start to get hazy about the food.
Needless to say, one dish blended into the next.
The portions -- tiny.
Comedic.
The tastes on the palate and pairings with wine -- forgettable, uninspired, and utterly unbalanced.
The presentation -- pretty, but very little substance.
In a nutshell.
If you don't care about your 300 something dollars, and thinking of something to splurge on because it's Vegas, this is the place to be.
If you're looking for a 300 something dollar meal, go somewhere else.

So I finally got to eat at Sage after several failed attempts the past few times I've been in town.
I have to say it was worth all the hype and did not disappoint.
We both got Chef McClain's Signature Tasting Menu.
Started off with the amuse bouche was a single oyster with Tabasco foam on top.
I started off my 1st course with the Shaved Brussels Sprout salad with pears, macadamia nuts and crisp bacon mixed in.
I enjoyed this dish because I love brussels sprouts in any form.
Oh as an extra we got the Foie Gras Custard Brulee with a hint of blood orange taste -I thought this was an excellent pairing of something you wouldn't normally put together.
It came with warm salted brioche as well.
*2nd course-Maine Day Boat Scallops with braised oxtail and shitake mushrooms.
This course was my favorite of the whole meal-scallop was cooked perfectly and the oxtail and mushroom complimented it so well.
Then the 3rd course was the 48 Hour Beer Belly-the meat was very tender and delicious.
For the 4th course dessert I chose the chocolate tart that had crunchy bits of nuts on top which gave it an overall taste like nutella to me :)  And to top the meal off we did the whole presentation at our table of a BLAZING (now legalized) Absinthe liquor where you first have to inhale the fumes through a straw before drinking it.
Very impressive and cool and to be warned very potent.
Service was wonderful, interior was beautiful, everything was pretty much perfection.

Mediocre food and horrible service.
We made reservations for 4 people but couldn't get them until 9:45pm - we arrived early and the restaurant was practically empty.
Ordered the chef's tasting menu and the dessert was the highlight of the courses.
The entrees were over-salted and uninspired.
Our waiter transitioned service just after we were served our 3rd course (I've never experienced this at a "fine dining" restaurant with coursed dishes - typically the waiter finishes your service before leaving).
We waited over half an hour to have our empty dishes removed from our table and then another 15 for our dessert to arrive.
No apologies or explanation from the wait staff for the delay.
Meanwhile, the tables of 60+ year-olds around us were being waited on hand and foot and never had empty wine glasses.
Very disappointed in this dining experience.
I was excited for a decent meal and expected much more.
I'm willing to spend a lot for good meals, but the food and service here just don't justify the price.

We've been having trouble going to places that are fine dining lately.
We had a couple of bad experiences where the service and food just did not match our expectations.
This was not the case here.
We ordered a la carte, a lot of food and were completely happy.
Sweetbreads - always my favorite, and these were cooked perfectly.
Octopus - Big pieces of braised octopus that were charred, lovely.
Charcuterie plate - pickled cauliflower?
Yes please!
beautiful meat selection.
Beef Tartare - The texture of this egg was so perfect and I loved the saltiness of the capers mixed in, served with grilled bread, the chocolate shouldn't scare you off, you can't taste it really, it just adds a nice crunch to the plate.
Beef Belly - not sure how they cook this one, but the texture was just phenomenal.
Still super moist but falling apart.
I rarely eat beef entrees but this one was great.
We finished off with oysters which were served with a tobasco sorbet.
I don't love big briny oysters, but these were small and sweet and were just wonderful.
We had an Intermezzo of white chocolate filled with a meyer lemon soup and some celery.
Honestly.
I don't think words can describe what an amazing 2 bites that was.
Desserts were phenomenal as well, My favorite was probably the chocolate with hazelnut.
But The apple strussel with truffle (that's right the mushroom not the chocolate) ice cream was phenomenal as well.
The service was also great, very friendly and warm.
We sat at the bar and had a lovely time.
I highly recommend.

I had a lovely experience at SAGE a few days ago with a party of 5.
Casual chic with a nice atmosphere.
You can converse which is lovely--as some Vegas restaurants are loud and obnoxious.
The portions are generous for the price, and the ingredients were incredibly fresh.
I opted to do the 4 course tasting menu, which was plentyyyy of food and only $80 (you can wine pair for an additional $40).
I had the wagyu beef tartar (perfect consistency and temp but a tad bit bland to be honest), maine scallops w/ braised oxtail and broccolini (yummmX1000), 48 hour beef belly (I'm not a hugeeeee beef belly fan but whatever, it was tasty), and some chocolate amazing desert with mocha icecream.
My friends had the fluke, skirtsteak & the octopus as an app which could have easily been a smaller main!
The service was attentive without being annoying, and they were knowledgeable about the food/wine/spirits.
PS--I don't recommend the ginger cocktail though (forget the name, but was served in a quaint copper cup) and they gave us a complimentary after-dinner "chocolate soup" shot which was horrible and tasted heavily like chai (Chef McClain, if you're reading this please stop!
lol) Cheers!

I went here a few months ago and I would always recommend it if anyone wants to go to a decent and upscale restaurant.
We had reservations and we got seated after about 5 minutes of waiting for our table.
First of all, the service was AMAZING and I was pretty much blown away how great they were and constantly checking up on us.
Upon seating, they serve you with some bread which was pretty good but nothing great that was worth remembering.
Here is what we ordered: Appetizers:  WAGYU BEEF TARTARE: I personally didnt like it too much but it was good.
NEW ZEALAND VENISON CARPACCIO: Absolutely loved it!
Entree: MINES - GRILLED AMERICAN KOBE SKIRT STEAK:  I thought the steak was a little bit too overcooked, but the marinate of the steak was sensational and the avocado puree that was underneath the steak gave it more flavor.
HIS:  MAINE DAY BOAT SCALLOPS:  I just took a bite of this and it was okay for my taste buds but he enjoyed it,  We did order desserts but I forgot what we ordered, but i dont remember loving it too much.
However, after your meal is done they give you a "complimentary dessert" from the chef and we got was a chocolate shot and that single shot of chocolate was just perfect.
Overall, I loved the restaurant and the service, our bill came out to be I think at least  around $180 but with tip it was over $200.

What I loved most about this restaurant besides their insanely delicious menu is their service.
The entire staff went out of their way to make sure we had a great dinner.
Everything was brought to us before we had a chance to ask for it.
It was like they read our minds.
It was such a classy establishment that a staff member walked me to the restroom to open the door every time I went.
and it was 3 times....had a lot to drink =)    Ambiance- Just like everything else in the Aria hotel, it's very modern an chic.
Food- It was innovative and had combination of flavors I had never even thought of.
For starters, we had refreshing market oysters that came with a tabasco sorbet.
I HIGHLY recommend ordering the SLOW-POACHED ORGANIC FARM EGG.
A one of a kind dish,  it came with truffles, smoked potato and toasted country bread.
I was also very satisfied with my entree.
I ordered the fluke, which was cooked to perfection.
It was served with sweet pear and sauteed spinach.
The pear and fluke worked wonders on my taste buds =)   Just as I thought my dinner couldn't get any better, my bf ordered dessert: Panna Cotta adorned with candied kumquats and fresh grapefruit.
TO DIE FOR!!
I can't complain about anything here!
Although it is on the pricey side, it's well worth your Benjamins baby!

Quality New American Fine Dining Experience with Exceptional Service.
Prior to arriving in Vegas, my friends decided we wanted to do one fancy, fine dining dinner where we could get all dressed up and act all "BOUGIE".
We called in reservations earlier in the week and booked a 7:30 dinner time no problem on a Saturday.
After we all gathered, albeit a little after 7:30 cause part of our party caught a hot streak at the tables, the staff was gracious enough to honor and hold our reservation.
We were seated in the back of the restaurant which was nice since it seemed more quiet yet we were not neglected as each section had a maitre'd like supervisor making sure quality service was being delivered at all times.
After looking over the menu, my friend who made the reservation asked about the Chef's Tasting menu and our waiter grabbed the menus for us.
When we made a decision on which fine dining establishment to fancy, we saw this delicious 4 course tasting menu for $79 dollars with an optional $39 wine/beer pairing.
The majority of us ordered the tasting menu and heres a snap shot of the magic I ate that night:  Amuse Bouche: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=w8yQYzsqPnjnJ1smGrBdFA  1st Course, wagyu beef tartare: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=aQnsr5D6YiP5tpybvejQtg  2nd Course, Bacon wrapped rabbit served over mushroom ravioli: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=5ftT8bYa-7Hh1lmxoN_1Aw  3rd Course, braised veal short rib: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=lADKbr5KVAwOTsEBSrA6fg  4th Course, Apple Caramel Nomage: http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?select=FvMCbNDYt5Vm69UndKXkBA  Some of the finest tasting food I've come across so far.
Our waiter was phenomenal, very professional yet kept us laughing all night long.
The wait staff that served our food knew exactly who ordered what and gave very detailed explanations of the food and how it was prepared.
My friends who had the wine pairing absolutely loved it and my friend who didn't order the tasting menu said her meal was superb as well..
Overall a truly fantastic dining experience.
I would highly recommend this place if you are looking for a fine dining establishment with out paying the outrageous prices that some establishments have.

I was actually kinda dreading getting to 299 reviews because that meant I would have to man up and write this review... one I've been holding for four months.
Well, the time has come and I can't hold it off any longer.
It's time to put Sage in the books and celebrate another hundred.
If you haven't figured it out yet, Sage was one for the ages.
Or is it one for the Sages?
Ha!
It's interesting what you remember four months after eating at a restaurant.
The little things are gone and what remains are the things you probably won't ever forget.
At Sage, it was the impeccable service.
It was my awesome veal cheek entree.
It was the oh so tacky (and historically inaccurate) way of lighting the sugar cube for our Absinthe.
And most notably, it was the ab-so-loot-ly ah-may-zing foie gras brulee appetizer.
I haven't taken the time to rank them, but that delicious, delicious blend of gamey creaminess is in the top three starters of all time.
It was just that good.
Honestly, every bit of that meal made it a fantastic way for my wife and I to celebrate our eighth anniversary.
That's it.
That's all I waited four months to say.
Now go eat.

Sadly, a very disappointing experience.
I picked Sage for our first night in Vegas because I thought it would be a great way to kick-off a foodie weekend.
I gladly charged my way down the Chef's Specialty Tasting Menu.
Maybe my appetizer was an anomaly, but I did not like the Foie Gras Creme Brûlée.
Keep in mind that normally, foie gras, in all it's glorious forms, is a little bit of heaven to me.
But over-processed to a flavorless, bland custard and layered with a thick caramelized shell of sugar?
Paired with a thick, sweet dessert wine?
It was a travesty and definitely not worth an extra $10.
But every restaurant has it's bad moments and I eagerly awaited redemption with the next course.
The bacon-wrapped rabbit on top of a carrot purée ravioli with salsify sauce was not bad.
It was a very small portion (two bites of rabbit), but acceptable for a tasting menu.
Overall, nothing amazing, but a decent taste.
The third course saw another okay flavor in a small package.
I had the crispy pork shoulder.
However, a single pork tenderloin medallion and a 3-in by 2-in by 2-in piece of crispy pork shoulder from a terrine didn't add up to my expectations.
It was okay, but nothing special - especially when paired with a gag-worthy, overly-peppered red.
And finally dessert - the low point of the meal.
I wanted a light finish to the meal and ordered the pear poached in Riesling.
The pear tasted like - a pear.
But the 4 tiny slivers were laid out on a single, warped piece of phyllo dough beside an ice cream bite, sprinkled with thyme.
And the ice cream?
It tasted like a cross between a cheap Rouquefort and 'something funky'.
I thought it very telling that when we asked for the mystery flavor to be decoded, our waiter apologized for the 'recent experimentation in the kitchen with black truffle oil' and offered to bring any other dessert.
I felt bad - he seemed embarrassed to have been involved with that fiasco of a dessert.
But really -  black truffle OIL ice cream?!
Sorry Sage - your chef's taste's are definitely too "special" for me.

The service was spectacular, the orders came out promptly, the environment was lovely (what a relief it was to be on the strip but not have music blaring), the cocktails were top notch, and the menu was creative.
Sage lacked "5 star" complete excellence due to some dishes lacking a bit of flavor.
Some were amazing, some were good but not great.
My two "must try" dishes were the scallops (oh, drool, I can only dream of replicating that at home), and the heirloom carrot and roasted garlic ravioli (with a generous serving of shaved truffles and chantrelles).
Oh my, that ravioli was decadent and so worth the price!
The oysters, beet salad, and tuna sashimi all could have used a little more oomph.
The flavors on the menu looked amazing, but they were all a bit muted.
Especially with small servings fancy-restaurant style, I want every bite to smack me upside the head.
Those at our table also thought the beef tartare and beef belly were just okay.
While they were cooked to perfection, the accompanying flavors should have been a little more intense.
Deserts were nice, rich, and complex, with our favorite parts being the salted caramel ice cream that came with the pine nut torte with fresh berries.
I am enamored with the candied pine nuts, need to try that at home, and had to restrain myself from licking the plate clean.
Overall, the experience was very nice, and worth doing once every couple of years.
But, for a meal that approaches $100/person, I want everything to be AMAZING with no dishes that are just "pretty good".

During the Restaurant Week 2012(Feb 27-Mar 4), my friend took me to this beautiful place.
We decided to have a dinner together since it was my birthday week.
If someone asks what will be the best dining experience ever and why it's so special...?
I can say without hesitation that it is not the best seat in a fancy 5 star restaurant, it's the joy of company having a nice conversation and a meal.
I will not trade that for the world :) I sometimes hear people describing the art work, a music concert, opera, or even poetry reading along similar lines are beautiful but I wish more people would realize that sharing food can be the same way as well.
Actually, it wasn't my first time trying out food at Sage.
In Aug 30th 2010, there was a fundraiser for Three Square("Wet your Appetite @Wet Republic - MGM Grand).
I had a chance to sample the foods, cocktails, & desserts from each restaurant's food station including Craft Steak, Jean Georges Steakhouse, Circo, Sensi, Joel Robuchon, Fleur de Lys, Burger Bar, & Sage.
All the dishes were excellent but the Ginger flavor cocktail from Sage was outstanding that I still remember the taste of it!
I started my dinner at Sage ordering a glass of cocktail called, " Dark & Stormy" It was basically a rum with a fresh lime & a ginger beer :).
It was very refreshing and tasty.
*1st course: "Spring Green Garlic Soup" - very mild flavor of Spring garlic, light texture of Greek yogurt,  & crispy duct confit.
It was a very unique dish that I never had it before.
"Seared Bison Tenderloin Carpaccio - Amazing!
At first, It looked as a raw tuna by the color but the taste was very solid.
The roasted pistachio & beets were sprinkled over the bison carpaccio & it blended well with the dish I thought.
*2nd course: "Roasted Jumbo Fluke" - This dish was well presented with spinach, brown butter apples, & crispy leeks.
It was so tender and juicy inside and the crispy golden brown texture outside.
I learned one thing from this dish that the sweetness of the apple can go well with the fish.
"American Wagyu Flat Iron Steak" - Oh, it was melting in my mouth!
We ordered a medium cooked for our steak and it was perfect.
It was fairly pinkish red in the center, beautifully juicy, with crisped and crunchy edges, and so much flavor!
It wasn't necessary to cut the steak with a knife because it was so tender.
I was enjoying the dish along with the salsa verde and the potato puree.
*3rd course: "Gianduja Pave" - it was a small dessert/ice cream with a flavor of caramel, hazelnut, & tangerine.
The taste was so rich that the small portion was more than enough to spoil my appetite for a dessert!
*a complimentary drink for surprise: At the end of our dinner, the server brought a tiny porcelain cup of warm chocolate milk infused with fresh rosemary :) The aroma of rosemary was pleasant and I learned that it is a valuable in digesting foods that can be used in many dishes.
I thought the pine-like fragrance & pungent flavor of rosemary went well with warm chocolate milk.
I would like to say our server, Johnathan, he was the picture of perfection in service.
He was taking time to explain all the dishes we had and waited on us at exactly the right moment each time checking on us.
And he remembered to put a little candle on my dessert and that was very nice :P I extremely loved the interior decor such as high columns, huge mirror walls, elegant lamps on random tables, and chocolate brown colored theme all the way through out entire restaurant.
I really think the chef & food make a great restaurant, but also the staff & environment ambiance also contribute.
I am definitely coming back for the chef McClain's Tasting Menu to try more dishes and can't wait to taste their famous "Foie Gras Brulee" :P  PS $50.12 - per person for Restaurant Week Menu        $14 - classic cocktail price

4.5 stars  I can't remember the last time I ate at a restaurant with so much refinement and technique in the preparation of our food.
Everything was so well balanced, a little touch of acidity, a tiny bit of sweetness, something with a bit of crunch for texture.
You could just tell there was a lot of thought put into the inception of each dish.
The bison tenderloin carpaccio was exceptional.
The candy bar dessert with coffee icecream was phenomenal.
I will definitely be eating here again!

Wild and tasty!
Best Sweet Bread.
Got to get the bacon wrapped rabbit.

Wow-Where do I start!?
From beginning to end this was a 3 1/2 hour odyssey which has to place in the top 5 dinners of my life.
This is the third time my wife and I have dinned at Sage.
They were all very good but this was the best of three.
Yes-They have improved on each visit.
It begins at the Sage bar with Erin serving us.
He is truly a "mixologist" not a bartender.
You don't have to order a specific drink.
Just tell him what flavors you like and he will create something for you.
I was there with my wife and 2 other couples and he did that for each of us.
It was such a fun experience, we had 2 drinks there and were almost late for our reservation.
The atmosphere, in the main dinning room,  was laid back yet modern and has a comfortable feel to it.
Our server was Lauren and she was all about service.
She made you feel comfortable and has so much knowledge.
It turns out she has been with Sage since it opened.
The six of us all enjoyed our starters and mains.
I can vouch for the Wagyu Beef Tartare (with a slow poached egg), Kobe Skirt Steak and the Black Bass.
All of those dishes were wonderful.
You could taste the quality in the ingredients and preparation.
The wine list is extensive with a wide variety of types and price points.
The Sommelier never did approach us (that surprised me) but Lauren was wonderful in her suggestions.
We did not get dessert but a few of us did end with their now famous Absinthe.
If you do like cocktails, I would highly suggest trying this.
We wound up having 2 and enjoying every bit of it.
I would suggest doing it "Russian style" which is more of a fun presentation.
The table next to us enjoyed the show so much, they ordered it.
One tip-You may not want to hit the casino after enjoying an Absinthe or 2 which was after the wonderful selections of wine during dinner which was after enjoying 2 drinks by the Sage "mixologist" Erin at the Sage bar.
I have been to many 4-5 star restaurants in Vegas and New York and this is right with all of them.
Go and enjoy a great night!

I don't usually like trying new restaurants while in Las Vegas.
I stick to Lotus of SIam and L'Atelier de Joel Robuchon and THAT'S IT.
Why change what isn't broken?
BUT I had to try Chef Shawn McClain's restaurant, SAGE.
There has been loads of talk on the blogs about how amazing his restaurant is and I had to try it for myself.
Luckily for us, we visited Las Vegas during restaurant week and what do you know?
Sage was participating.
Made reservations and was blown away.
Upon walking into Sage, the restaurant is absolutely gorgeous.
Everything was in either black or lilac.
Perfect restaurant to be located inside of Aria.
All of the furniture and decor was modern but very classy and most of all, comfortable.
Who wants to go to a fancy dinner and feel uncomfortable and uptight?
I ordered the restaurant week tasting menu ($50) Pretty decently priced for 3 courses if you asked me.
You would think that the courses would be less than "palm" sized.
haha No.
They were very fulfilling, so fulfilling I couldn't even go out to the clubs later that night.
I was stuffed!
1) My first course I selected the Seared Bison Tenderloin Carpaccio.
Whoa.
The blood oranges on the side was an excellent addition to the course.
2) Second course: American Wagyu Flatiron Steak.
In kindergarten we were all taught that to share.
I never wanted to share this delicious course.
I had no choice!
Portion was HUGE!
Carmalized sunchokes!
Out of control.
3) Lastly, Gianduja Pave.
A what?
I can't even spell it right let alone pronounce it.
A dessert so memorable why even brush your teeth the next day?
Let it own you.
My date ordered Chef McClain's Signature Tasting Menu ($79) 4 courses of heaven.
1) Wagyu Beef Tartare.
Very rich and so beautiful to look at you want to just store it in a container and have it mounted on your wall.
2) Bacon Wrapped Rabbit.
A rabbit is an acquired taste some may say, add bacon.
No qualms about this one.
3) 48 Hour Beef Belly.
Let me see, beef belly + 48 hours?
GAME OVER.
4) Riesling Pear.
Almond.
Thyme.
Streussel.
Might be the best prepared pear I have ever experienced.
I mean my date.
LOL.
Service was excellent, waiter was not pushy nor a foodie elitist.
Came from Yountville so he knew what's up.
Everything came out perfectly and each item introduced.
Table was never dirty and water always poured without us asking.
Prices were comparable if not better than the other high end restaurants in Las Vegas.
And lastly, the food is definitely worth revisiting again and again.
Do enjoy!
I took photos of everything mentioned above up on the Sage Yelp page or check on my homepage under photos.

This was my first time at Sage, but will definitely return!
Service was very friendly and attentive.
I was seated in a lovely semi-private alcove, so I was able to take photos (non-flash) without disturbing anyone.
Had the 6 course tasting menu, and was able to substitute a yummy cavatelli with ricotta, duck confit, swiss chard and pickled turnips for the rabbit dish listed on the menu.
Loved their bacon roll!
Started with a lovely hamachi with blood orange, radish and caviar--very light and refreshing.
I finally had Sage's most amazing signature dish:  the foie gras brulee with brioche.
This was the single best dish of the entire trip!
This was followed by a lovely scallop dish in a cream based clam chowder.
The scallop was wrapped with a slice of ham.
The final savory was the beautiful beef belly that was the softest beef ever.
The beef was accompanied by Brussels sprouts leaves.
Dessert was perfect for me:  passion fruit mousse with huckleberries, white chocolate/almond sponge cake.

This was truly one of the most amazing dining experiences I've ever had!
It is quite expensive, and I have a bit of liberal/catholic guilt about the price tag, but I would highly recommend giving Sage a try.
We did the Chefs tasting menu with wine pairing and every course, both food and wine, were just fantastic.
Our favorite of all the courses was the pan roasted sea scallop (jamon iberico chowder, crispy potato, sweet fennel).
This may be the single best thing I have ever eaten.
The scallop is seared but has a sashimi consistency and the chowder they pour around has a creamy smokiness to it that is just indescribable.
I seriously am having dreams about eating this again.
(Unfortunately this is not on the ala carte menu or I would go back to Aria and order this as oftern as possible - it really was that good!
)  Our second favortie was the hamachi sashimi (preserved lemon, paddlefish roe, blood orange, smoked almond) to start the meal.
All of the flavors just expolded in the mouth and made for a terrific start to the meal.
Third favorite was 48 hour beef belly (roasted chestnut puree, brussel sprouts, pickled sweet onion).
It is like I had never before tasted beef - and the brussel sprouts along the side were fantastic.
I did find the fois gras brulee to be a bit rich/sweet, but wow I have never in my life tasted anyhing like it.
The service was impeccable but not overly stuffy.
And the atmosphere is stunning.
If you are in Vegas and are looking for an out of this world food experience (and don't mind spending some serious money) go here!

Sage was a nice, but clearly overpriced dining experience.
I went with a group of four in mid-March; we all had the four-course "signature tasting menu.
"    Pros:  - Some of the food was truly outstanding.
The scallops were among the best we had ever tasted, and the pork loin was excellent as well.
- The service was prompt and friendly, if perhaps a little overbearing.
I would rate the staff above average, even for Sage's price class.
- Our table was ready right on time.
The experience of booking the reservation and getting in & out for dinner was hassle-free.
This isn't always so with higher-end restaurants in Las Vegas.
Cons: - With tip and a few drinks per person, the bill for four people came out to over $600.
All four of us eat at nice restaurants on occasion, and I think we all felt like $600 would have gone a *lot* further as far as memorable, quality cuisine in other major cities.
- The desserts were underwhelming, as were the wine pairings.

Just like the time we went in September, we were both very worried for me when looking at the menu and seeing the vegetarian limitations.
Just like September, though, the food was wonderful and the ambiance perfect.
The wine was great, I had a wonderful warm asparagras salad with walnuts and poached egg, and English pea ravioli (modified without the bacon.
)  DH had a four course tasting menu that he thoroughly enjoyed.
Then we both splurged with dessert...  amazing, rich, but small (which was a good thing.

Fantastic food, wine, and service.
Great prices for a strip locale (which means its priced normally for a big city fancy restaurant)

There are a lot of very good places to eat in Las Vegas but there aren't that many excellent places.
Sage is one of the very few perfect Vegas restaurants.
The food is just sensational--fresh, inventive and delicious.
The service was great too.

Way cool decor and atmosphere.
I liked the layout and the ambience of the place.
The food was very good.
Everything we had was really tasty.
The service was nice but our waiter and others barely spoke above a whisper.
They brought things out quickly until the entree and then they went into slow down mode.
Don't know why but it just seemed like our guy started taking a stronger interest in other tables.
For the food and atmosphere I would highly recommend this place.
Smiley face

The second I walked into this place I knew I was for a rare treat.
We sat at the bar and the bartender was fabulous; I had no idea what to drink so he whipped up a special concoction for me with a beautiful presentation.
If your reading this, thanks again babe!
Now the food, ahhh!
My girlfriend ordered everything for us to share, only apps, cant be looking to bloated in our dresses!
She ordered the oxtail, carpaccio, foie gras creme brulee  and roasted peppers.
Each of them very elegant and tasty!
Oh and the dessert is to die for!
I forgot what it was called but it was recommended by the bartender, it was pistachio something with ice cream topped with rhubarb and meringue!
So delish!!!
I hope this review helps my fellow yelpers!
Muaaah   Try try or die die!

Sage was the first restaurant I've been to in vegas where the kitchen actually seemed to care about the food they are putting out.
Most of the high-end dining in vegas is a poor facsimile of their original NYC, Paris, or SF locations (I've been highly disappointed by Nobu, Scarpetta, Bar Masa, Michael Mina's joints, etc) but Sage is a vegas creation all its own and it shows.
The food was great - as others have mentioned...foie gras creme brulee.
I am pretty jaded when it comes to foie gras concoctions but this was just amazing.
I didn't LOVE the atmosphere as it was classic showy "vegas" but if you want a meal that is actually GOOD and not just expensive for expensive's sake... Sage is your place.

Only one word can properly describe Sage: Sexy.
Everything from the drinks, to the apps, to the dessert has a aura of sexiness about it.
I took a girlfriend on mine here recently prior to a night of gambling at Aria.
Since id been talking about Sage for weeks, I took the liberty of ordering all dishes for us that night...and wow, did we do good.
The Bison carpaccio was phenomenal!
One plate wasn't enough, but we had five plates to try and neither disappointed.
My favorite app of all has to be the foie gras creme brule.
Its no what you expect, it's better.
From apps we went straight to dessert.
Another yummy adventure and fusion of different flavors I wouldn't think of putting together.
Pistachio tres leches with rhubarb was tasty.
The pieces of rhubard kept us guessing for a while.
I thought they were chopper tomatos.
Lol.
As much as the food is amazing, the drinks are just as amazing.
I recommend the Moscow Mule for all vodka drinkers out there.
The best I can say: we had a wonderful night of fabulous food, drink, and wonderful company.
It was the perfect way to start a night at Aria.

Came here for a friend's birthday, 4 of total, 3 of us got the prefixed $50 meal and one got the prefixed $80 meal.
I had the garlic soup as a starter, wasn't that great at all, definitely fell below my expectations, 3/10 I would say.
My main entree was the duck, which was pretty good!
a solid 7.5/10!
a bit dry but the flavor on the skin was very good, a very good mix with the beans (or whatever it was) on the side  Finally the desert, I had the passion fruit mouse a solid 9.5/10!
very good!
a perfect combination of tart and sweetness!
very very good!
I highly recommend it.
Overall the place was good, and the $50 menu was priced pretty fairly in my opinion.
The soup definitely could be improved, but the bread in the beginning was good enough to make me pretty happy about this place.

Simply wonderful.
In anticipation for our trip to Vegas, my boyfriend and I made a reservation at this spot for our first night in town based on all the great buzz.
In the time leading up to the trip, I would occasionally look at the menu, drool, and hope that everything lived it to my inflated expectations.
It did.
We strolled in to the sleek, sexy, restaurant just before our reservation time and were seated immediately.
While tempted by the specials of the evening, we decided to go with those items on the menu we'd been dreaming about: the sweetbreads appetizer, the veal cheeks, and the lamb saddle.
We sipped a bit of albarino while waiting for our entrees.
Our waiter came by with a taste from the chef.
I probably should have asked him to repeat what it was, something containing duck, but it was a very nice way to start the meal.
Someone else came by with a choice of bread: mini-baguette or a roll containing bacon.
They had me at bacon, but he let us try both, and they were fresh and wonderful.
Then came the glorious, glorious sweetbreads.
Can I just say that I love organ meats so, so much?
You don't see sweetbreads on enough menus, and these were simply amazing.
Perfectly meaty, with a delightfully creamy sauce and even a bit of pork belly.
I was appetized.
After that, the entrees.
The veal cheeks were tender and delicious, and well accented by the sauce and pieces of sweet potato.
The lamb was perfectly cooked and the cauliflower and sugar snap peas were a nice compliment.
Magnificent.
I didn't want the meal to end, so we ordered dessert: a pistachio tres leches cake.
Need I say more?
It was as good as it sounded.
Yeah, it's spendy, but worth every penny.
I would love to come back sometime.

We were late 15 minutes late and they gave away our seats.
They put us in the bar area so we didn't have the best dining experience.
The food was mediocre.
I've had better.
The service was nothing to rave about.

What I do like about Sage is that you can come here and get a gourmet quality meal without spending your week's worth of salary.
Our bachelorette party of 12 came here two weeks ago and I'm pretty sure we all walked away satisfied with our meal.
For a party our size, the server said if one of us got the pre fixe menu, then all of us had to get the pre fixe menu.
That was a bummer since some of us weren't as hungry as others.
However, dollar for dollar, the pre fixe menu was a better deal even though portions are a bit smaller for each course.
They have two pre fixe menus with optional wine pairings.
Pre fixe menu 1 had 4-courses and pre fixe mnue 2 had 6-courses.
I forget the price difference, but we all ordered pre fixe 1 for $70~.
That's a very reasonable price for Vegas and this type of bougie establishment.
Although the food was great, there was nothing extra special about this place.
I am a bit disappointed that they did not make the bride-to-be feel extra special.
In the past bachelorette Vegas parties I've been to, I've seen restaurants send a complimentary drink/shot to the bride-to-be.
It's a nice touch that I think all nicer restaurants should do to make an evening more memorable so that people leave with a lasting impression.

We started off the night in a rough spot, making a reservation for our party of 6 for the wrong night.
Not just one night but actually 3 weeks off.
Not sure how it happened but the host and GM made the best of a bad situation.
They found a table and we were seated in 15 minutes (hey Mesa take a page from the playbook  of prompt seating) .
Service was prompt and well rehearsed .
We never went without drink nor were we pushed to clear out.
We all ordered a la carte but considered the two tasting menus available.
I split mine with a colleague as neither of us could choose between the scallops or pork tenderloin.
Both ended up being fantastic.
The scallops perfectly seared  on the outside without the dry/rubbery center.
The pork tenderloin served with spaetzle (my favorite) and crispy pork shoulder was just as successful a dish.
in fact I think I actually liked the crispy pork shoulder better but I do not think it could be a main.

Came here last Saturday with 3 other friends for dinner at 6:30 for their pre-theater menu.
My date and I came early, so we were waiting at the bar/lounge area.
Their bar is so beautiful!
I might have uploaded a picture of their bar, if not, someone please remind me!
Anyway, so I was waiting at the lounge, and I ordered a Desert Shrub.
It's one of their cocktails with prosecco, grapefruit, tequila, and purple sage.
I didn't know what purple sage was so I looked it up.
It's supposed to be a plant that gives you hallucination.
I guess it's a good substitute from absinthe if I hated the taste of black licorice.
I can't tell you how purple sage taste like, because the drink was very light (IMHO), I can taste the pink grapefruit and the prosecco.
I ordered and my friends came, so we went directly to our table without waiting for my drink.
They served my drink at my table shortly after.
It's wonderful to know that they know what their customers ordered and their current whereabouts.
Three of us from our group ordered the pre-theater menu.
I chose the spring green garlic soup, pan roasted fluke, and ended the meal with a passion fruit mousse with huckleberries.
My date chose the $79 four-course menu just so I can get some of his oysters and rabbit.
My soup was served with a near empty bowl with some sort of cream/cheese in the center.
The server pours the green soup so that the cream doesn't melt right away, texture is maintained.
Very interesting taste.
The mustard-like taste from the horseradish was hindering in every sip.
The wheatberries within made the soup fun to eat.
I tried some of the oysters, I can't really taste too much of the flavors other than the taste of a raw oyster.
It's sad that my tongue is not sensitive to alcohol flavors.
I did get a bite of that rabbit dish from the dinner menu.
Very tender like a well slow-cooked chicken, but with a gamier taste.
I was a bit disappointed at my fluke.
I have this theory of ugly fish taste great.
I guess it's definitely affected by the cooking method.
Pan frying a fish to the point where the meat is a bit dried is not the right method.
Especially after a great seafood lunch at Milos, I have an even higher expectation of my seafood dish at a restaurant like Sage.
And finally my dessert.
It's a piece of art.
Out of all the dishes, this was the only one that was worth a picture.
Served on a long rectangular plate, with squares of white and yellow, huckleberries sprinkled all over, and the jam spread across half of the plate.
It looked so beautiful that I was debating on if I should even eat it.
It's a great choice for those who have an interest in fruity/tarty desserts.
Not too sweet, reminds me of some sort of pudding.
Not much texture to it, it's more for ending your flavor journey with a light, creamy finish.
My dining experience here was great.
There were some bloopers from my table though.
My server was friendly overall, but time and time he would forget to bring the correct wine over with my friend's meal (she chose wine pairing) or he brought the wrong wine because he remembered the wrong dish.
When the soup was served, my other friend had the same dish as me, but he was given an empty bowl, and the server (not our waiter) did not have enough soup to pour, so she left without a word to get more.
Another server came to explain.
Food was definitely 5-stars.
Minus one for the service bloopers.

4.5 stars  I was in Vegas this past weekend for a bachelorette party and we came here for dinner on Saturday.
We originally planned dinner at 7:45 but we arrived early to walk around the Aria and City Center because some of the party people has never been there (me included).
However, we did not end up walking around because we were hungry, and asked if you would be able to be seated sooner than our reservations.
They were able to seat us early, mostly due to the Mayweather/Cotto fight that was happening, the restaurant was not too full.
Our party choose to have the prix fixe menu ($79), it would be simple to divide the check at the end.
But our server did inform us before ordering, if one gets the prix fixe menu they ask the whole table order from that menu, and the table will only receive one check.
After ordering, we received an amuse-bouche of tuna tartar with avocado mousse.
It was very taste and only there was more.
For the first course, I choose the Waygu beef tartar, my first time with beef tartar, it was good but I think if you prefer your beef more on the cooked side, choose another dish.
I had a sample of the oysters, which was another choice.
They tasted fresh but the size of the oysters were on the small side, but you do have to consider this was a prix fixe menu item.
Someone from the table ordered the foie gras brulee (this is an addition $10 if you choose this for the 1st course), and I had one bite of it.
My first time with foie gras and it tasted really good.
For the next course, I had the seared scallops, this was one of my favorites.
The scallops were cooked perfectly and were very tender.
I tried a piece of the other offering which was the bacon wrapped rabbit.
I have never had rabbit before but it did taste like chicken, and wrapped bacon around anything and it will taste good.
The 3rd course, I had the 48 hour beef belly.
It was pretty good and tender, it was fatty but its the belly, so what do you expect.
I had a piece of the pork lion, the other option, many of the girls at the table felt it was salty, but I think if you ate it with everything all together it will balance out the saltiness.
The last course was dessert, I had the pave (there was something before it but I don't remember what it was).
This was a chocolate bar meets dessert as our server described it.
It was very tasty and if you like chocolate this is good.
I liked the filling but did not care much for the crunchy parts of it.
There was coffee ice cream which was very smooth and delicious.
The service here I experienced was very attentive and friendly.
We did not have to wave down a server for anything.
There was not much waiting in-between each course, but then again if you are with good company time flies.
Everyone left feeling full and happy with the meal.
I hope if I come here again, I would like the tasting menu with is the 6-course option, but the server informed us it will take about 2.5 hours.
We'll see, until next time Vegas!

the veal cheek is absolutely superb.
amazing flavor.
just imagine the best cooked, soft, succulent, milky oxtail you've ever dreamed of... thats as close as i can get to describing the veal.
love the decor.
i dont remember the service because i was so into the meal.
lol YUM.

While in Vegas, we had been to Sage, Clubhouse (Wynn), Circo (Bellagio), Spago (Caesars) for dinners.
Sage turned out to be the best food experience.
Innovative menu (Beef tartare with crispy chocolate !?
) and tasty food.
We tried the $79 4-course tasting menu and thought it was worth it.
Service also was very good.
The atmosphere was young and hippie without being pretentious.

This was my first meal in Vegas this past weekend and it was the perfect way to kick off my trip.
Upscale setting, incredible drinks, attentive staff...oh, and I haven't even gotten to the food!
We had several starters which were all so unique and tasty.
Started things off with the duck fat roasted heirloom beets salad.
I typically don't even like beets but this appetizer changed my mind.
We also tried the wagyu beef tartare with a slow poached egg.
It was such an awesome combination, piled on top of crispy brioche cracker for a crunchy, flavorful taste.
For my main dish I got the most flavorful scallops I have ever had in my life.
The consistency was flawless and they were expertly paired with braised oxtail, wild mushrooms, and finished with a salted caramel reduction.
For dessert, they brought each of us a bite-sized, rich and tasty chocolate dish, compliments of the chef.
Overall an incredible dining experience and I would highly recommend it!

Enjoyed it so much I ate here twice on a 2-night Vegas stay.
First night made a meal of apps, second had the amazing English pea ravioli, no apps.
Yes, it's pricey, but worth it...fine ingredients, excellent service, mellow vibe.
Highlights: oysters, slow poached egg, gin martini, and the aforementioned ravioli.

To keep this review short  Must have oysters to begin & scallops w/oxtails  also NY strip is good.....

Excellent fine dining experience.
It was easy to for us to make last minute reservations for a party of 10.
Our table all ordered the four course tasting menu.
I tried the beef tar tar topped with a raw yolk, foie gras brouille, day boat scallops with ox tail and mushroom reduction and beef belly with asparagus.
For the desert course the gladly accommodated my request for berries instead of the pine nut tort or olive oil ice cream.
The food was superb, the prices were too high, the wine list too short.
For the price of the meals, I would expect a better ambience.
Since there are so many amazing places to eat in Vegas, we probably won't go back, but I would recommend it to anyone who hasn't been.

Really disappointed with Sage as it came highly recommended.
We had the $120 tasting menu and the food was mediocre at best.
Just too much going on each plate and it was not cohesive.
Seasonings and sauces were worse than average.
Amuse buche was very good, oysters.
King crab had too many components that did not work well together.
Best dish is the scallop with the garlic panna cotta.
The lamb was over cooked and sweet breads were oily and did not belong on the plate.
The 48 hour beef belly was the most disappointing as the sauce had no flavor,  the belly ended up tasting fatty and the best part of the dish was the asparagus and almonds.
The chocolate mint soup was devine.
The desserts were a mess!
Best part of our meal werethe wine pairings.
The service was lacking as our waiter was too cool for his position.
He spoke ever so softly and was full of himself.
He spoke down to us and put down the other restaurant that recommended Sage.
Once he took our order we were serviced by the sommelier, bus boys and runners.
Waiter at one point scolds the bus boy at our table.
Sage does a poor job of entertaining the diner.
Our time there was painful as dinner took 3 hours, we waited for our dessert for 20 minutes.
With so many great restaurants in Vegas, I would not recommend Sage.
I want a refund of my time back.

Good food and service for the price (we did the tasting menu), especially in Las Vegas.
But overall, it was nothing mind-blowing.
The dishes that really stuck out were the wagyu beef tartare, foie gras brulee, and the 48 hr beef belly.
The foie gras brulee was seriously something else...never had anything like it, and I would agree with some fellow yelpers that it was on the sweeter side, but when eaten with the toasted brioche that was provided on the side, I think the fruit glaze/spread in the brulee really complimented well.
(I thought the combination of flavors was actually quite similar to the fois gras terrine paired with sweet tomato jam that we had tried before at Providence in Los Angeles).
Overall, I think the dish was so unique and tasty that I would come back just for it!
As for the other decent dishes, I think I could easily find something comparable at another restaurant.
Complimentary freshly baked bacon bread and sourdough bread were both delicious!
Dishes came out in a very timely manner and we never waited long before the next course.
At the end of our meal, we were presented complimentary hot white chocolate (with browned butter) served in a shotglass...it was so rich and delicious.
Service was attentive and friendly.
Decor at the restaurant is unique and interesting -- the restaurant used a modern mix of cushioned benches with pillows and chairs.
Crowd seemed to be on the younger side (probably in the 25-40 age group).

Very Impressive!
This restaurant has been on my radar for a while now, and I finally got the chance to check it out.
I had the $79 tasting menu and it's a great value.
I had oysters, scallops with braised oxtail and crispy pork shoulder, followed by a very tasty chocolate & olive oil dessert.
Everything was well prepared and tasted great.
The ambiance was great too, nice but casual and lively and the same time.
And they have a great selection of beers available.
You won't find a better value in this town.

Ah...where to begin?
Sage is a treasure.
Hubs and I were treated to a trip to Vegas following our beautiful Sonoma County wedding (aka, our Honeymoon) in November 2011.
I did a lot of research beforehand and used trusty Yelp to make my decision on where to dine for our "fancy" night out.
(The word fancy always reminds me of Squidward for some reason).
I settled on Sage after much research into price, location, menu, and general Yelp happiness.
I will say that their tasting menu and wine pairing were mostly what made me decide on this restaurant.
Our close friends gave us a generous wedding gift certificate to Aria to assist with the cost as well, so needless to say, we were well on our way to maximum enjoyment.
We went early to expand our meal options since they offer another tasting menu for early diners.
We started with a few martinis (Grey Goose dirty martini for me) while we soaked up the atmosphere.
Posh is how I would describe it, and pleasantly lit.
We had forgotten to go grab our gift certificate from the front desk, and the host went to grab it for us when my husband was getting up to grab it.
When Hubs tried to tip him for the service, he refused the tip and said, "just doing my job.
" Big score for Sage's staff there.
Our waiter was very nice and attentive, which didn't change even when the restaurant got busier.
We ended up ordering the $79 tasting menu with wine pairing.
Hubs and I each got something different off the tasting menu so we could get the full scope of the menu.
So happy that we did.
It's been about 8 months so I can't remember everything, but here were the highlights of the meal:  Bread: They had some bread that had bacon in it!
To die for!
Even better though (I know, how does it get better than bacon?
) was the butter.
It was lavender butter.
Whipped and creamy and orgasmic.
I was a little buzzed so I though nothing of sticking my finger in the bowl and cleaning up the tidbits that remained.
I have never been so impressed with bread and butter.
Wagyu Beef Tartare: I've already used orgasmic so let's go with phenomenal on this.
Seriously, I still have dreams of finding something this good ever again.
A poached egg sits a top this yummy pile of raw meat and once pierced oozes its gooey goodness down into the rest of the goodness.
What a treat!
Scallops: I don't remember exactly how they were prepared (the wine pairing is quite a doozy, fair warning), but I remember that they were really tasty.
And not overcooked - which is a huge gripe I have over the preparation of scallops.
48 hour pork belly: Again, I'm going to blame this on the alcohol, but I don't remember too much here but that it was excellent (and we were getting very full).
Hubs and I both ordered this one and yummed it all up.
And I honestly don't remember too much more than that.
But hey, it's Vegas, right?
Everything was paced well and the staff had great patience for our slow going.
Our waiter even sent the sommelier over to chat with us once when we mentioned that we were from Sonoma County and Hubs worked at a boutique winery in Russian River Valley.
Overall, great experience, staff, and food.
The $400 price tag (including tip) was worth it.

I am not quite sure why they say this is Mediterranean which I guess it's kinda a stretch.
I really really like the service, on point and so friendly.
We did the chef's tasting menu.
The two best things on the menu the scallops and the meat tartare.
Wow.
OH and let's not forget the koramotu (sp?
) oysters.
SO amazing!
The coffee was so perfect too, came out in a french press.
I LOVED.
The manager even came by and had a nice chat with us about the restaurant and Vegas.
Great guy!
Can't say enough about the amazing staff.
Very grown up and nice restaurant in an amazing hotel.
Great for special occasions!
But is this my fave restaurant in Vegas, no..
I still have major love for Bouchon!

One of the best meals I have had, I ordered the burrata for an appetizer, it was a little spicy which I really enjoyed.
The bread was sooo good, it came with garlic butter and sea salt.
For my meal I ordered the Kobe steak with salsa verde and potato croquettes.
This was one of the best steaks I have ever had!!
Delish.

This place truly lived up to the hype.
We did the tasting menu.
There were no misses, but I wasn't wild about the 48 hour beef belly--I think this was probably just a matter of taste.
I agree with the other reviewers that the steak tartare and scallops were truly special.
The choice between bacon bread and sourdough--no contest--bacon bread.
The service was perfectly paced.
We slowed down between courses 2 and 3, but things continued on perfectly as the staff kept an eye on when we were finished.
The only service change I would make would be hovering water filler who didn't let a sip go un-refilled.
It was truly special without being pretentious or stuffy.
I would love to head back.

this place had been on my go-to list for a while since i learned that it was a new venture by the owners/chef at my former favorite restaurant in chicago, Spring.
i finally came here with some friends for a bachlorette party last weekend.
service was really good.
the table ordered the prix fixe menu for $79.
i ordered the oyster appetizer, which was really fresh with just the right amount of brine.
my friend upgraded to a foie gras brulee served with brioche bread, which was really creamy and smooth, definitely worth the $10 upgrade.
for entrees, i ordered the scallop in braised short rib sauce.
the scallops were perfectly cooked and caramelized, and the sauce with bits of short rib was succulent.
my second entree was the 48 hour beef belly, which was melt in your mouth amazing.
for dessert, i ordered the strawberry tart, which was like spring on a plate.
i will be dreaming of food from here until i return.

After my 4th dining experience - 3 chefs tasting (no menu) & 1 signature tasting menu I must say Sage never disappoints.
While waiting for my table we always enjoy a Moscow Mule (vodka & ginger beer) - I now own 4 copper mugs to make this tasty beverage at home.
For the chefs menu, you can choose how many courses you want with or without the wine paring.
The wine selection is right on, courses were timed out well, the beef belly melts in your mouth & the foie gras brulee is TO DIE FOR!
On my 2nd visit we ordered a non alcoholic pairing for a family member which was awesome.
I learned that they could make this accommodation from the bartender the first time.
Oh, everyone must experience the absinth cart & the fire & ice drink.
Quite a show, and quite the BUZZ!

Almost two years after my first visit to Sage, I made a return visit to have the Iron Chef America menu that Chef Shawn McClain's made and served the judges on last week's (9/5/12) Iron Chef America.
Chef McClain challenged Iron Chef Forgione and McClain won handily.
They are serving the menu this week only at Sage--tomorrow being the last day.
I really like this restaurant--the food, the décor, and the general ambiance.
Onto the meal.
I'm glad Chef McClain does not shy away from salt.
There's soft butter served with a small container of sea salt.
Several of the dishes had a salt flavor that enhanced the food.
My server and I spoke about this for a bit and he agreed with me about using salt.
Course 1: Dinner started with whelk toast with a tropical sangrita.
The sangrita was flavored with padron pepper.
ginger, and lime.
There was a nice kick from the padron pepper.
Very refreshing beginning.
The whelk toast was very good.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#E6mV80XbGYsn1m4UlhTzjg  Course 2:  This was sashimi of Hawaiian nairagi.
The nairagi was in small roll like curves and had some sea salt crystals on the outside.
The sashimi was on coconut purée with shaved hearts of palm, and togarashi cured pineapple.
The pepper flavor with the coconut and pineapple was fantastic!
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#HaXdWtg8SkxXD1ewW5REjA  Course 3:  Whelk ceviche with green zebra tomatoes, avocado espuma, and green mango.
What a complex mix of flavors.
Everything went well together and the whelk and tomatoes were wonderful!
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#SizPEw_4IWsPxinOsrf02Q  Course 4:  Lemongrass coconut soup.
There was a tempura fried prawn on the soup, the "noodles" were made of young coconut, and it was given an extra flavor kick with Thai basil.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#kZjlT7E5fkJuDLo-nGK_-g  Course 5:  Braised pork belly.
This was served with sweet coconut rice, thin slices Iberico ham with glazed pineapple.
There was a peppery flavor to the pork belly and it was such a great counterpoint to the pineapple's sweetness.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#EVSglQBj0DdpcRCVHaofMQ  Dessert:  Creamy white chocolate with coconut.
This was a white chocolate soup.
The white chocolate was in a small pitcher and the server poured the liquid chocolate over the rum-compressed pineapple and sweet tapioca that were in the bowl.
There was also a serving of mango sorbet.
The tapioca was cooked to perfection, the white chocolate was addicting and the pineapple was great!
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#FXHKG6FMdEU6pvNAjeLJ_Q  Lastly, at the end of meals at Sage, the server brings a small container of hot chocolate that has both banana and caramel mixed in.
What a delightful reverse amuse-blouche with which to end your meal.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog#yPSJUmfus3MsIpUvR9TYpg  Service was exemplary as I knew it would be.
When my iced tea glass was low, a server brought me another glass.
No asking, no waiting--just excellent service.
My head server was James and we chatted about the contest and how everyone had kept the results secret for almost a year since the show was taped.
James was excellent!
I hope he's working when I'm there again.
What a treat to live in a city to have such fine chefs as Shawn McClain!
Another pleasant meal at Sage.
And, I will be back for another one--soon I hope.

Excellent food and service.

Our experience last night at Sage was terrific.
Ordered the 'Early Evening Menu" with the Beer Pairings.
I'm not that big of a beer drinker but these beers have inspired me!
The waiter was attentive, friendly and professional.
The ambiance is Vegas but classy.
The Turbot was excellent as was the squash salad.
The desert was 'smoked chocolate ice cream' some might like but not to my taste.
Tasted like sausage flavored ice cream.
An excellent meal and experience.
This was social/business meeting with 3 others.

WOW!!
Do not miss eating at Sage - for any reason.
We have traveled extensively and eaten more extensively, and this was one of the top five meals ever.
Because we had a show we opted for an early dinner and took advantage of the "early", 5pm-7pm menu for $49.
You must ask for this - they will not offer it initially.
This covered three courses, each with a few choices.
Each and every dish was sublime, combining distinct flavors that complemented one another, but did not lose their individuality.
I was amazed that the "red velvet " dessert was, in reality, a scoop of smoked chocolate ice cream, over a compote of cherries and covered with crumbled red velvet cake.
My wife's allergy to dairy was handled with extreme care by the kitchen.
Service was very professional, but with casual affect.
HIghly recommend this restaurant.

This place gets everything right.
From the decor, to service, to food, everything is on point.

Went here for Dinner on a Thursday with no reservations.
Got lucky and we were seated almost immediately.
Service was great.
Often it's not the food itself that makes a dish amazing but rather the combination of all the different flavors that go into it that make a dish.
This statement is true about every single item we got in this restaurant.
Although good, some dishes even great.. this place gets 4 stars.
COLORADO LAMB TENDERLOIN CRUDO  Toasted Cashews/Roasted Sunchoke/Brooks Cherry Gastrique  AMAZINGG!!
I've never had lamb done so well!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
The lam itself was fabulous and the combination was just beyond this world!
AMAZING!!!!!
WAGYU BEEF TARTARE  Crushed Caper Aioli/Slow-Poached Egg/Pickled Mustard Seeds/Crispy Chocolate How can you possibly go wrong with Wagyu beef you just can't.. another combo amazement..   GRILLED AMERICAN KOBE SKIRT STEAK Crispy Potato Puree/Grilled Gem Lettuce/Smoked Avocado/Salsa Verde   Good dish..
The cripsy potato puree was AMAZING.. it was .. delicious.. a must have  MAINE DAY BOAT SCALLOPS  Braised Oxtail/Wild Mushrooms/Salted Caramel Reduction My disappointment of the night.
They were good, just not as good as I expected them.
They were a bit chewy....   AND FINALLY THE HIGHLIGHT OF THE NIGHT WAS The lemon souffle..
Although I'm not sure if that's what it was called.
The ingredients were lemon, cucumber and mint!
In a souffle right ??!?!
This was so amazingggggg, so refreshing  , delicate, light... elegant.. !
All in one!

I don't go out much or get to.. to say the least, but Sage.. saved me from every aspect of isolation of a homebody.
Nestled in Aria Hotel, on the casino level by the front desk, adjacent from Julian Serrano.
The array of deep, neon hues of purple awaits as you walk by the bar and into the main dining room.
Three words to describe the ambiance: Sultry, sexy, and sooooothing.
The bar and lounge area is quite inviting.
I wouldn't mind at all having my meal there.
My classy date and I were greeted by a kind, smiling lovely hostess named Alexis.
I appreciate that so much, since the warm welcoming gives a great start to a wonderful dining experience.
We were then escorted in by the assistant manager and even pulled out the table and chair for us.
My Oh my it just gets better and better!!!
This was my first time trying a Signature Tasting Menu and honestly, I couldn't be more excited and thrilled to be able to share this experience with someone that loves great creations of food as much as I do.
*Sigh I'm so happy... We tasted everything, shared everything, and that in itself meant Everything to me.
The 1st Course: WAGYU BEEF TARTARE  w/ Pickled Mustard Seeds.
Crushed Caper Aioli , Slow Poached Egg, & Crispy Chocolate  -Extraordinary.
By far the best beef tartare I ever had.
The presentation itself was breathtaking and simply a work of art.
Once you mix the egg with beef, the texture is ever so creamy.
After my first bite, combining everything even the piece of thin, airy chocolate on top of a tasty olive oil infused, crispy brioche toast.
I was singing..
Isn't she lovely... yeeeeees.
All the ingredients, solid flavors were bursting with surprise in my mouth.
It's nothing like I ever tasted before.
If this is how it feels when you fall in love...
I'm deeply in love.
We also went all out and substituted for yes..... the FOIE GRAS BRULEE!!!
The soft, slightly salty brioche muffin contrast with the richness of the foie gras.. make whoopie by eating this.
A very sensual dish.
This hypnotizing flavor is all new to me..  dizzy in love again.. perhaps that was the champagne?!
Reggie, our sommelier was informative and great.
The 2nd Course: BACON- WRAPPED RABBIT       English Pea Ravioli/Nueske Bacon, & Sweet Onion Sauce - Vibrant green colors.. gave away this freshness to the eyes.
Beautiful dish.
Every single element in this entree were magically paired to one another.
It was as if you were eating your favorite song.
Rabbit.. oh Rabbit..
I love you...
Damn it..
I do.
*hitting the dining table with my fists... gawd I want more and more of you.
Addicted..  MAINE DAYBOAT SCALLOPS  Braised Oxtail/Wild Mushrooms, & Salted Caramel Reduction -My favorite seafood.. Scallops!
Cooked to perfection, tender, juicy, and oh so damn succulent.
Forget day dreaming..
I fantasize about this dish.
Can't get enough of it.
I want this dish and I want it Bad.
Delicious!
The 3rd Course:  We both ordered... 48 HOUR BEEF BELLY   Shaved Purple Asparagus/Ramp-Sorrel Puree, & Pickled Ramps/Toasted Almond - Very rich and the depth of flavor is endless.
Extremely tender and effortlessly melts in your mouth.
This isn't for the faint of heart, but for a heart of gold due to the luxuriance of the meat.
Happily satisfied :)  The 4th course: GIANDUJA PAVE  Olive Oil Ice Cream, Hazelnut Crunch, & Basil Jam -Odd combination, but it was the best ending to such an amazing, memorable dinner.
Again, everything I tasted was like a stimulating, new fairy tale story.
It made such a profound impact of how I felt at that present moment and I could say...
I could have fallin' in love.
I never knew food could alter the way I feel and gosh darn it...
I felt So beyond special.
I never smiled so bright.
My tummy was beaming!
We were also offered complimentary breads in the beginning of sourdough or bacon bread.
Bacon, by far was it for me and the whipped, creamy butter with sea salt .. yes another smile on this face.
*sigh We also did the wine pairing with our Tasting :) I could cry out of joy from this experience.
Pure bliss... Maybe since the flavors and simple ingredients were like traveling and exploring a new country.. a first for me.
I was just stunned and even turned on by how delicious this restaurant was.
The dim, cozy decor, and colors makes this ideal for a perfect Romantic date.
I seriously couldn't be more pleased and happy.
I love the fact my date has great taste in food and loves exploring as much as eating.
Great company and great food can definitely lead to great things ;) The service was exceptional, top notch, 5 solid stars...
The GM, Robert was ever so personable, funny, and kind by checking up on us throughout our evening.
Our servers, runners, bussers, all worked smoothly together and made this one of the best dining experience I ever had in my entire life.
Thank you.
That being said..
This is my favorite restaurant in Las Vegas and I can't wait to go back.

Be sure to check out the early tasting menu before 7pm.
For $49 you can get a 3 course dinner, and you can even add a wine or beer pairing for a nominal fee.
The cocktails are really good, and the dinner paired beer or wines are excellent.
Even though the menu changes, the dinner my wife and I had was excellent until the desert.
The "deconstructed red velvet cake" was awe-full.
The smoked chocolate ice cream tasted like ash and chocolate.
Too much smoke is an understatement for this one.
We then ordered another desert, and that one was excellent.
A nice ending to an otherwise great meal.

When we looked up the menu online I worried that it would be one of those places with tiny portions of great looking but barely tasty food.
Boy, was I wrong.
The food was delicious, from the lobster soup appetizer to my wife's steak and my lamb to the dessert.
Great presentation and exquisite tastes.
The service was also top notch.
Our server did appear a bit cold and business-like at the start of the meal but warmed up towards the end thus making this a five star review.

We went here for our wedding anniversary dinner and made reservations the same day and got in without issues.
As soon as you walk in, you are taken back by the swanky lounge/restaurant romantic feel and the place looked regal with it's colors!
First of all, do not look at the prices for this is not an cheap place...but worth every penny!
The Price Fix is a great option, but if you don't like the options, just dive into the menu and order what sounds great...we did!
Apps: WAGYU BEEF TARTARE and the SASHIMI OF YELLOWTAIL I could have eaten a bowl of the Tartare as it was warm.
The Yellowtail was light and refreshing and never thought of apricots and Yellowtail going together but it made a great combo!
Dinner: I had the GRILLED AMERICAN KOBE SKIRT STEAK and my wife got the BRAISED VEAL CHEEKS.
The combination of smoked avacodo with the pureed potatoes and salsa were to die for!
The steak was cooked just right.
I had a coupe of bites of the Veal and the it was quite comforting...delicious.
Both our plates were clean.
They keep bringing out bread with butter and sea-salt...so that combined with apps and dinner forced us to skip dessert and go for the....Absinthe Cart!!
I've never had it before and my wife did in Europe (but she doesn't remember much of that!!
) and since it would make a great aperitif we went with server's choice.
She put on a great show and the drinks were out of this world.
Excellent way to relax after dinner.
The thing that I love about Sage is that though the prices were high (as expected) and the place was quite exquisite, the folks who work there are very friendly, down to earth, and make you feel very comfortable.
I've gone to many high-end restaurants before and you have to "behave" very refined.
Writing this review just made me hungry....

I took a friend here to celebrate her birthday prior to attending a show in Vegas.
We both ordered from the pre-theater menu, which was an incredible bargain at $49/each.
The service here was incredible--the timing of each course was absolutely perfect, the waiter was friendly and knowledgeable and all of our needs were anticipated.
Even before the courses started to arrive, Sage won me over with its delicious bacon bread, which should not be missed!
We also ordered a poached egg with crostini appetizer that was covered with some sort of truffle foam.
It was just fantastic and very beautifully presented.
Next came a bowl of fresh burrata with summer squash, a crispy sea bass and finally a white chocolate ganache dessert with blueberries and caramel corn.
Sage is my new favorite restaurant in Vegas.
I can't wait for my next visit!

signature menu was good..good price as well..it's basically a 4 course meal for $80.
I had the oysters..OMG so good with the hot sauce..the scallops were ok, a bit on the heavy side (comes in two)..pork?
o dear..it's heavy..but good..I tried the octopus..get that instead!
the tartare was ok..egg was a bit hard and not too creamy..the dessert..i ahd the pistachio tart..a bit on the sweet side..the pave was better...  the amuse bouche was good..service was really nice..we had a nice seating and the decor is cool..def nice place for a romantic dinner..not much of a kid environment..

Tried the signature tasting menu.
Husband went for the oysters - i could smell the tabasco and he liked them.
I went for the burrata and zucchini salad - the cheese was rich and I really like the flavors.
Next up were the scallops - everyone at our table said these were the best scallops anyone had tasted.
I went for the pork - just okay.
It tasted like bacon, maybe it was smoky.
Not bad, just not great.
Husband went for the 48 hour beef.
Wow, super tender and tasty.
Atmosphere was fine - not a totally full restaurant on a friday night.
But, enough people to not be weird.
Server and sommelier were super helpful and nice.
Almost forgot to mention the bacon brioche bread served first - we asked for seconds.
It was awesome!

Can a single meal completely change your perception of fine dining?
Can a single meal radically alter your relationship with food in general?
I think it can -- and Sage proves it.
After my dinner here, I'll never look at food quite the same way again.
To say it was my favorite meal in Las Vegas would be an understatement.
It would be more accurate to say it was one of my top meals of *all time*.
It began with an 8pm reservation for two.
Sage, located in the Aria hotel, has a relatively unassuming entrance, but that belies that grandeur to be found inside.
The restaurant is immense, with high ceilings, sumptuous furnishings, and a gorgeous color scheme with lots of golds accents and stunning chandeliers.
Needless to say, Sage is just as much a feast for the eyes as it is for the taste buds.
After we were seated, our incredibly friendly and kind server, John, came by with the breadbasket.
We each had the sourdough roll and a bacon brioche -- and both were excellent.
They were served with sea salt (served on a tablespoon) and whipped butter.
Deciding what to order was easy as pie -- we both had the 4-course tasting menu ($79).
My dinner companion splurged on the wine pairing ($39).
Our server's wine pours were *very* generous -- a lot more than the advertised half glass per course .
In fact, I was able to enjoy some wine with every course without bothering to order the wine pairing myself.
Below is a run-down of everything that we ate.
Absolutely everything was cooked and presented with the utmost class and sophistication.
The refinement of this dinner was unlike anything I'd previously experienced.
**AMUSE BOUCHE ... PRE-DINNER** A shot glass of gazpacho.
Fresh and tangy.
A wonderful starter.
**COURSE #1** Wagyu beef tartare with buttered crostini.
Easily the finest tartare I've ever had.
The beef was unctuous and fresh; the egg only added to the indulgence.
Chocolate shavings provided an unexpected layer of complexity.
**COURSE #2** Seared Maine dayboat scallops with broccolini, braised oxtail, mushrooms, and caramel reduction.
The scallops were cooked beautifully and fall apart when touched with a fork.
The broccolini was tender.
The caramel sauce provided an intriguing sweetness that contrasted against the saltiness of the shellfish.
**COURSE #3** 48 hour beef belly with braised apples.
I've never had beef this tender and succulent in my life.
Each bite dissolves on your palate and overwhelms you with flavor.
Apples provide a gentle acidity that works well against the umami of the beef.
**COURSE #4** Pistachio tart with strawberry ice cream.
A culinary work of art -- oodles of individual components meticulously arranged.
Bold, fresh flavors all over the plate.
An enjoyable juxtaposition of hot and cold.
**AMUSE BOUCHE ... POST-DINNER** Hot white chocolate with mint and coconut, served in a white porcelain shot glass.
A sweet, uplifting treat at the end of a fantastic meal.
After this meal, I wasn't just full and satisfied -- I was exhilarated, knowing that I had a world-class gastronomic experience.
The staff at Sage earned every penny of their tip.
This isn't the sort of meal I can have everyday -- but it's worth doing once in a while, if for no other reason to remind yourself that fine dining can truly be life-changing.
If you subscribe to the "you only live once" philosophy, than a dinner at Sage is a must.

*drool* My mouth is still watering, thinking about this place.
I did the tasting menu, and everything was great.
The foie gras creme brulee had that nice combination of sweet and savory.
The dayboat scallop was cooked to perfection, and the oxtail paired perfectly with it.
The beef belly reminded me of bbq beef ribs.
That's a good thing, by the way... because no bbq joint has made ribs taste THIS good!
Super delicate and tender meat, with a great smokey flavor.
The only weak point in that meal was the pistachio tart dessert, which wasn't very memorable, but I don't even care since the rest of the meal was just that satisfying.
The $39 wine pairing was a steal.
The wines weren't spectacular, but they paired well with the dishes, nevertheless.
Oh, if only Vegas were closer so I could eat here over and over again...

Good American food in classy restaurant.

Beautiful setting fantastic food.
The breads were warm and yummy and you could easily fill up on that.
I had the raw oysters as the appetizer which were sweet and creamy.
I had the scallops for dinner and they were gigantic and deliciously seared.
One of the diners had the tasting menu which was actually quite a lot to eat but offered a little of everything.
The service was impeccable and staff very friendly.

The culinary talent oozing out of the kitchen is highly commendable, the ambiance is equally pleasing to the eyes, the service, however, leaves a little something to be desired.
Still, when in Aria, I would recommend visiting Sage without fail.
Once you walk past the wine racks that line the entrance to the restaurant, a lounge/bar area serves as the holding area before you are seated in the cavernous dining room with blue-lit walls featuring sections of a painting by Seurat.
It's classy, yet modern, and delightfully decadent.
Most of our party ordered from the Signature tasting menu, which at $84 was a solid deal for 4 courses.
All dishes were wonderfully prepared with balanced flavors and artful presentation.
Although many opined on the foie gras creme brulee, I opted for the burrata, which was good, but it had me wishing I ordered the foie gras.
The dayboat scallops with oxtail was fantastic, perhaps my favorite dish of the evening.
The 24 hour cooked beef belly was wonderfully tender, reminiscent of braised pork belly, but not quite as fatty.
For dessert, the olive oil ice cream on my plate was my favorite part.
While I skipped the wine pairing, several people did and were quite pleased with the pairings.
Onto the service.
Oh, our server.
He was young and inexperienced.
He spent more time crossing the restaurant floor back and forth than coming by our table.
I can excuse inexperience, but the rest of the staff at our table seemed cold, one person in particular.
He would almost toss our place settings at our table and seemed like he really didn't care about being there that night.
It certainly didn't ruin the meal, but it was a shame to have the service mar an otherwise wonderful experience.

Ah, Sage.
I was looking forward to this restaurant perhaps the most on the trip, but it turned out being not what I expected.
First, this place definitely is worthy of a 5* star review, hence the rating.
The service was impeccable.
Since we were celebrating our anniversary, they treated us like royalty with complementary champagne and the egg course.
The amuse bouche of gazpacho and the white hot chocolate were excellent additions.
My husband and I chose to do the signature four-course tasting menu and each had something different.
The wine pairings were tasty and spot on, although I personally am not a fan of dessert wines or ports, but that's no fault of theirs.
The steak tartare and oysters were immaculate and extremely fresh and tasty.
The spanish octopus was the best I'd ever eaten (and the most tender and best cooked) and the beef belly was so flavorful and moist.
We also really enjoyed the pork and the scallops, though we felt not all the pieces went together for us personally.
This became really evident to us when we had dessert.
Their signature dessert, the gianduja pave... after hearing so many rave reviews on Yelp, we almost ordered two of these.
Thankfully, we got the pistachio tart as well!
It's not that it was bad, I think it was an extremely inventive dish, but we didn't really understand/agree with the pairing with olive oil and basil.
I just remember cutting the chocolate part in half (to split it), licking the spoon and being grossed out because it was all olive oil.
We thought the ice cream (olive oil too) was actually the star of the dish.
With this being said though, we can see how this dish may be amazing to some people, but it and some of the other dishes' components were perhaps a little too complex for our preferences.
Thus, in review, Sage is an excellent restaurant.
The service is outstanding and the detail and skill going into cooking make the food amazing.
While most of what we had was fantastic, we weren't a fan of all the complex combinations of ingredients, and prefer more simplistic gourmet meals - some people may feel this way too, but I applaud Sage for being different and trying things that some people might not appreciate as much :)

Finally we tried out Sage tonight for my bf's birthday.
The signature tasting menu has upped from $79 to $89 and wine/beer pairing has upped from $39 to $44.
Here are the items we got:  Amuse Buche: Smoked salmon profiterole.
One bite that excited our palate.
Then we got to choose the bacon bread or the sourdough bread to spread some chive butter and sprinkle some Himalayan sea salt on it if we like.
I prefer the sourdough.
1st Course: -Wagyu Beef Tartare -Delicious.
The beef was tender and yummy with the nice crushed caper aioli to give it that oomph and the slow poached egg to bring everything together.
We were given crostini to top the tartare on.
This was paired with a Chimay white.
-Foie Gras Brulee (extra $10)-like a savory dessert.
Too rich for my taste.
I only ate a quarter and was done with this.
Winner: Wagyu Beef Tartar  2nd Course: -Grilled Spanish Octopus: The octopus pieces were so tender...never had it this tender ever!
These octopus slices were served with smoked Potato Puree, fried potatoes, and other veggies.
This was paired with a Unibroe.
-Maine Dayboat Scallops:  2 jumbo scallops and they were cooked to perfection.
American Fish can learn from Sage how to cook seafood.
They were served with braised oxtail and wild mushrooms.
The scallops were the star and I could care less about the oxtail and mushrooms.
Winner:  Both were delicious, but scallops win by a few points.
3rd Course: -Iberco Pork Loin: the pork loin was a bit salty, the ham was not memorable, the crispy pork shoulder was delicious.
This was paired with a dark beer that my bf cannot remember the name of but he loved this beer.
-48 hour beef belly:  Very tender.
It was served with grilled peach.
This was paired with a Chimay Red.
Winner: 48 hour beef belly, although the crispy pork shoulder in the Iberco Pork Loin was pretty darn good!
4th Course: -Gianduja Pave: This is an olive oil ice cream with pieces of hazelnut crunch and basil jam.
It was quite beautiful  but a  bit hard to eat since we have to spoon a bit of the ice cream, the blue berries, the hazelnut crunch, the chocolate, to get them all in one bite.
My bf didn't like this dessert as much as I did.
-Pistachio Tart:  The tart was in little pieces, strategically laid out on top of some stringy cake, served with sauteed strawberries and a strawberry-black pepper gelato.
Interesting flavor combination.
It also came with a lit candle for my bf.
My bf loved this dessert.
This was paired with a fruity lindemann beer.
Winner:  Tied.
We ended the night with this white chocolate drink, compliments of the chef.
Was yummy in my tummy.
The total bill, including tip, was $300.
Worth it?
Yes.
Service was impeccable.

I've been lucky enough to visit some great restaurants around the globe.
The meal I experienced here tonight was amongst the top.
I won't even try to explain the combination of fantastic flavors that I enjoyed.
This place has a very creative chef who puts together unbelievable combinations of flavor.
They have a phenomenal wine AND beer selection to pair your meal with.
The trifecta is the well informed, attentive service.
In a word, fantastic.
I will be back here when ever I am in Vegas.
As a side thought, the bacon infused dinner rolls are outta this world.

Wow, where do I start...a complete gastrogasm.
After my first couple of days in Vegas, I felt as if I was lacking a "true" five-star worthy experience....Sage satisfied that void in spades.
We went here on a Monday night and were seated after a two minute wait with no reservation.
Each member of my party went with the Tasting menu ($89), with my better half and I opting for the Australian Wagyu main upgrade ($15).
I went with the Wagyu Tartare, the Dayboat Scallops, The Australian Wagyu main, and the pistacio tart for desert.
We opted against the wine pairing ($59) or beer pairing ($44) in favor for some of their amazing looking cocktails.
Service from start to finish was near impeccable.
Our server (whose name escapes me) was alert, attentive, and extremely helpful.
He read the "vibe" of our table perfectly, in that he fed into our playful good mood by joking with us throughout the service (e.g.
warning us about the strength of a cocktail using slurred speach, telling me upon ordering a third cocktail that 'rehab is for quitters').
Even the support staff was attentive, as my father paused to look for the restroom a staff member ran over and asked him if there was anything he could help him with.
There was the perfect mix of attentiveness without coming across as overbearing.
On to the food and drink.
The cocktails, while pricey ($16 per) were inventive and excellently prepared.
The wagyu tartar was excellent, with the aioli and finely chopped  onion adding just the right amount of flavor.
The buttered crostini were the perfect conduit for what was a delicious tartare.
The scallops was more like one large scallop cut in half.
It was good, though personally I'd recommend the octopus which another had in my party.
They Australian Wagyu main wasn't the best steak I've ever had, but it was definitely up there.
The sear was tremendous, and at several moments I had to close my eyes to savor just how good the melt in your mouth dish was.
The only hiccup on the night came with the delivery of dessert, which for some reason was inexplicably delayed compared to the other dishes.
I believe we had to wait a good 20 or so minutes after clearing our main for it's arrival.
Given that all of our courses were delivered with great timing up on to that point is seemed a bit odd.
Desserts were on par with the other courses, with a part of me wishing I had ordered the Gianduja Pave.
It wasn't that the tart was bad, it was just that the flavor of pistachio tends to be very light and I felt was overshadowed by the sweetness of the strawberrys on the dish.
Overall an unforgettable experience, and thus far my best dining experience in Vegas.
My better half dubbed it the "best meal in her life".
I can't give it that distinction, but it definitely deserves a spot in my top 5.
Highly recommended.

What an amazing meal!
I had the 4-course prix fixe menu and selected the beef tartare, scallops, beef belly, and a hazelnut/tangerine pave dessert.
Everything was just heavenly!
The tartare was very rich and tasty.
I had thought it couldn't get any better with the scallops, but then came the beef belly and I was just speechless.
On top of everything, the service was top notch.
I will definitely remember this place the next time I want a special meal in Vegas...

On The Strip, right inside the door of Aria, easily reached from the Valet.
This is a beautiful place to bring a date to seal the deal with soaring ceilings and black lit masters paintings on the walls- its trendy atmosphere is sophisticated and alluring.
Fantastic service- and easily one of the best meals I have had in Las Vegas ever.
( it better be it cost quite a few bucks).
Chef Richard serves up amazing foods with great detail.
A winner of Iron Chef, he knows how to mix flavors and combine textures to give everything we tasted appeal.
Do not miss the foie gras and the bacon bread!
( we were offered 3 different breads that night but the bacon was my standout favorite)  The service was superb- obviously they have succeeded in correcting any issues that other reviewers had, our service was nothing short of impeccable.

Wowsers!!
This place was beyond what I'd ever imagine..The SNAKE RIVER FARMS NEW YORK STRIP (yes in all caps kind of good) was beyond words.
It was so tender, juicy, succulent, any word that would describe pure bliss please add it to this review!!!
The atmosphere mixed with the people at my table..Along with Bond our waiter..It was the dopest night ever!
If you go ask for Bond he was amazing!
Oh and Abstinthe..Have to try it, the green elixir!

This restaurant was unbelievably great, and it was a great way to start our vacation.
Since it was back in May, I can't promise you that the entrees we had will still be on the menu, since their menu changes now and then.
Tip: Get the Chef's Menu with the wine paring.
How much wine did I have?
Too much, apparently.
Here's what I do remember:  - Appetizers:  Foie Gras Brulee - Very creamy but not that strong.
Wagyu Beef Tartare - Enjoyed this  A large assortment of Olives - and I'm talking 40+ olives.
The GF loves olives and will still attempt to plop one on each finger of her hand and then wave to me.
It doesn't matter if we're in a fancy restaurant, because she will attempt this nearly every time.
- Entrees:  Braised Veal Cheeks - Tender and tasty.
GF cannot stand veal, but that's more for me!
Iberico Pork Loin for the GF - I believe she liked it a lot.
- Dessert:  Giandjuja Pave - this is a must-have.
Simply the richest Chocolate/Hazelnut ice cream you can indulge in.
And some other items that I can't remember because I was pretty lit from all of the wine pairings.
I do recall that their wine selection was so well-matched with our dishes, that I haven't had a comparable pairing at dinner since (although our recent Alan Wong dinner comes really close).
The decor is very beautiful.
and very chic for a restaurant that specializes in "American" cuisine.
The service was excellent.
The waiter was knowledgeable and friendly, and helped us out with a few answers on a couple of items.
I want to eat here when we return to Vegas, sometime in the near future.
Highly recommended.

I'm not sure how you top a 5 star review.
One year later, Sage delivered an more spectacular experience than the previous year.
This time around, we both opted for the Signature Tasting Menu ($120each) and were blown away by every course.
The highlight for me was the lamb saddle and sweetbreads.
The sweetbreads were as delicate as I've ever tasted and perfectly complimented the lamb.
Every course was beautifully presented and timed perfectly from the last.
Probably the best fine dining experience I've ever had.
Every staff person we came in contact with, from the waiter to the bartender were at the top of their game as well as being personable (no stuffiness here!).
I can't wait to come back.
The meal lasted a good 2.5 hours from start to finish.
It was an experience not to be missed!

What a great first meal in Vegas.
This place actually ruined us for the rest of the restaurants in town.
My husband got the New York strip and I had the short rib.
Both were cooked perfectly and had tons of flavor.
They also served an Australian sea salt with their butter and bacon infused bread.
Neither of us had seen this before and actually questioned this, foolishly.
The slightest bit of salt in the butter really made the taste explode.
The waiter was completely on top of his game, attentive and friendly.
A great meal and a great experience!

Definitely a delectable menu with a very classy yet stylish ambience.
Steaks, poultry, fish, and duck are big on the menu.
If you're into duck, sushi, or tartare you'll enjoy the appetizer selections otherwise opt for lobster artichoke soup or the sprout pear and bacon salad.
The meats are very well prepared and incredibly rich.
Presentation was fantastic.
I was quite surprised by the extremely slow service.
We rarely saw our heavily French accented server though his support staff was always close by for water.
I enjoy long eventful dining experiences but this was not eventful; it was almost boring.
We spent most of the time with empty glasses or no bread and there's no server around to even request another drink.
At the end of our meal, we shared the white chocolate ganache dessert because of how full we were.
It was a little medicinal in flavor, licorice maybe?
We ate half, then the aforementioned support staff cleaned the table.
Approx 15 empty glass minutes later, our server made his 3rd appearance of the night to say that the dessert was well worth the wait.
He had no clue that we already had it, didn't like it, and were done with it.
I would give 3.5 stars.
Honestly the food is fantastic but the service really killed the experience.
Maybe sitting in the bar area would be better.

Very disappointing.
The steaks we had were either under done or over done.
We ended paying 70 bucks per steak.
Not even worth 10 bucks.
Outback steak house makes better steaks than this place.

My wife and I went here for a special meal and it definitely delivered.
I ordered the small tasting menu and my wife ordered the Seaboat Scallops.
Pumpkin purée - very full flavor.
Don't particularly line Pumpkin but we both enjoyed this dish  Pear salad with bacon and light vinaigrette - very light and refreshing.
Good balance of flavors  Spanish octopus salad - incredibly tender.
One of the best that we've ever had.
I don't like octopus and really enjoyed this dish.
Wagyu beef - Absolutely top notch.
Incredible flavor and just the right combination of fat and meat.
Seaboat scallops.
Four huge, well cooked scallops.
The oxtail with mushroom reduction was a very nice contrast  Dessert was the pistachio tart with strawberry ice cream.
Overall very decent dish.
The service was top notch.
Great decor and atmosphere.
Our server was named Bond.
Make sure to ask for him.
He was attentive but not overbearing; as well as knowledgeable about the dishes.
The timing of each dish was spot on.
To finish it off our server brought us a special after-dessert dessert.
Hot chocolate with fleur de sel.
Amazing taste and mouth feel to this dish.

Been wanting to do this review for  a long time now but always keeps forgetting.
My husband and I went there for his birthday in June.
We are both avid foodies and we can say that we had a phenomenal dining experience.
We would definitely go back again.
Ambiance:  The interior decor is a bit fancy and modern.
I really like the up lighting.
The high ceiling makes the space look bigger and spacious  Food:  We got the Chef's Tasting menu which was at $120 per head.
Good choice for first-timers as you get to try a little bit of almost everything.
The selection might have changed since we came but when we went these were the items in the tasting menu:  Market Oysters with Piquillo Pepper and Tabasco Sorbet, Aged Tequilla Mignonette - I normally don't eat oysters but the flavor was so good that I forgot I was eating oysters.
Don't get me wrong, the oyster taste was still there and it's tasted really fresh.
Actually, this was given as a complimentary item by the Chef  Alaskan King Crab with Creamy sunchoke, bacon, and paddlefish roe - I absolutely love this as an appetizer.
I love crabs plus add bacon and I'm a happy camper.
The flavors just melded well.
Heirloom Beet Salad  with Duck Prosciutto, Point Reyes Blue Cheese, Roasted Walnuts, and Celery Vinaigraitte - Light and fresh.
The dressing wasn't overwhelming  Foie Gras Brulle with Salted Brioche, Toasted Cocoa Nibs, and Shaved Torchon - interesting way of serving foie gras.
We think the size is too big though for an appetizer.
Maybe they can make the serving size a little bit smaller  Pan-Roasted Sea Scallop  with Jamon Iberico, Green Garlic Flan, Black Trumpet mushrooms  - scallops was cooked perfectly, flavors are just right and compliments each ingredient  Herb-Crusted Lamb Saddle with Crispy Sweetbreads, Baby Fennel, Creamy White Polenta - lamb cooked and seasoned well.
I loved the sweetbreads!
48 Hour Beef Belly with Shaved Purple Asparagus, Ramp Sorrel Puree, and Toasted Almond - beef is so tender it melts in your mouth.
Gianduja Pave  - Olive Oil Ice Cream/Hazelnut Crunch/Basil Jam - Yes, you read it right.
Olive oil ice-cream???
I had my doubts at first but it was a really good plate cleansing item with all the flavors we just had  Strawberry Profiterole - Vanilla Ice Cream/Lemon Sorbet/Chervil Mousse -  Light dessert, not too sweet,  flavors melded well together.
Service: Our server was attentive and really knows the menu that she can answer any question we have.
She also saw that I was not enjoying my cocktail since I am not really into citrusy drinks so she suggested to change it  We enjoyed our dinner and it was definitely worth the money we paid.
The only reason why I didn't give 5 stars for this restaurant was because they didn't do my request to bring out a cake for my husband as requested.
I made a note when I did the reservation requesting them to bring out a slice of cake for him but it was not done.
It didn't really matter but would have been nice if they did it.

I am going to keep this review short and sweet.
But I do want to mention that I can see why so many people love this restaurant.
The menu is small, and most what I had was crafted deliciously, and it looks like pride is taken in making the food.
Favorite appetizer was the grilled octopus.
It is served with potato puree, what a great and unique complement to the seafood.
Favorite main dish was the flank steak.
Good lord what a dish.
So tender you don't even need a knife.
It's one of those dishes that you want again as you write a review, I hate that feeling!!
Service as you will read is spot on.
My one dish that I wouldn't order is the pork loin.
So salty, not sure if it is meant to be like that.
Still gets an easy 5 though.
The restaurant doesn't act pretentious, and keeps it simple.
I love that.

This place has it together - iberico loin, flank steak, tasty veggie sides.
The meats were prepared really well (not well-done).
The pork loin had a wonderful combination of sweet and savory little sides.
I was very disappointed that we didn't have time for dessert though - apparently they make them in-house and individually.
Next time, next time...

Was looking for a special dinner...something that would truely be memorable.
Found Sage and decided to give it a go!
Atmosphere is very nice...very upscale and modern feel like the rest of Aria, and it worked well for us.
We tried the tasting menus with wine parings!
It was a first for us, and it truely felt like we were the special guests of the restaurant.
Service was great and attentive.
I won't go into each dish...break it down into a million ways, and explain why it was so good.
Every dish was great...and I felt the pairings were spot on.
It was a very fun and exciting journey down Sage's tastings, to try each of their "bests" and have fun eating each and every bite.
Highlights :    Waygu tartare was so good....I still think about it days later.
The grilled octopus was easily the best I have ever had...it was so tender, I don't even want to know how they did it....must have beat the hell outta it and marinated it for hours....so so good, you would not even know what you were eating because it was a completely different consistency.
The foie gras brulee was an experience.
I have never had it before, and the whole dish was an explosion of flavor...almost TOO much flavor.
TIP : Spread it on the bread that they give you with the brulee...you still have the amazing tastes, but it is not nearly as sweet and overbearing.
Once I figured this out, the dish was night and day better.
Lamb was great...I had no idea what sweet bread was, and I ate most of it lol.
I was told later, and it still didn't change the fact that everything was great :)  48hr beef belly was crazy packed with flavor...so tender, reminded me of pulled pork  meets pot roast...it really really works.
The waygu sirloin was the hit of the night.
So tender and packed with flavor...my mouth waters thinking about it.
Overall, this was a big splurge of pocket change to throw down on dinner...(well over $400 with tax and tip), but it did its job of giving us a very memorable anniversary dinner and a food experience we will never forget.
Go for it!

I'm in Vegas 3 or 4 times a year for work or vacation and I'm always looking for new places to eat.
On vacation with my wife in September (2012), we went to Sage and really enjoyed it.
One of the things we liked the most is that it was mellow.
You could actually hear your self think and relax - unlike so many restaurants in Vegas.
Don't get me wrong - we're not senior citizens or anything - not even close.
It was just a nice change of pace to have a killer meal and not have to listen to techno music :) The service and food were both incredible.
We did the tasting menu and it was excellent.

Excellent food and service -- worth every penny.

Stop being so sexy, Sage.
Seriously.
The dining area is dark, sexy and very pleasing to the eye.
Everything on the menu sounded amazing but we opted for the chef's tasting menu.
Best.
Decision.
Ever.
6 course menu that ended up being 8.
There was the option to add the wine pairing which I did and even beer pairing.
The meal started with an oyster infused with tequila amuse-bouche.
Next course was the Maine lobster with pumpkin flan.
Succulent.
Perfect.
Next was the foie grais brûlée.
Is this for real?
Oh my.
The best!
Next was the pan seared scallops with jamon iberico (¡Viva España!).
Mmm.
Herb crusted lamb with sweetbreads.
Yes!
48 hour beef belly.
Omg.
Green apple mousse and the addition of the white chocolate praline soup.
Woo.
The table next to us commented on how amazing our meal looked and I had to agree.
Perfect with the wine pairing too!
I was quite impressed by the absinthe selection too.
They prepare the absinthe traditionally table side which is quite fun to watch.
Service is great.
The overall meal took about 2 hours so make sure you have time to enjoy it.
I will definitely be returning.
Definitely.

My wife and I came here to Sage last night.
We had great hopes, having read the great reviews, but we left disappointed.
First, we arrived 8 minutes early, but the "too hot" hostesses refused to seat us.
"I'm sorry, we're seating on time this evening.
Why don't you grab a drink at the bar.
We will get you when your table is ready.
"  We chose instead to walk for a couple minutes, but when we returned, even though we were still early, they sat us right away.
It was obvious they were pushing people to the bar to buy drinks before they sat down.
Second, we had one good appetizer and one we didn't like at all.
The market oysters were great, prepared with piquillo pepper and tabasco sorbet.
Probably the high point of our meal.
The low point was the much heralded foie gras custard brulee.
We love foie gras, and since it is now illegal in California, we had been looking forward to trying this dish.
We thought it was strange, soupy and inedible.
Our server asked us if we liked it, we said no, and while encouraging us to try it with more bread, she acknowledged that not everyone likes it.
Each of us only had a bite, but the server never said another word about it.
No offers to bring another appetizer - no apologies, no nothing, just indifference, and $25 on the bill.
Third, our entrees were fine.
My wife had the Morro Bay Black Cod, which was perfectly cooked with a beautiful "bar" of pumpkin flan and deliciously chewy pancetta.
I had the kobe skirt steak, which was good too, but the sweet potato puree and pecan-brown butter vinagrette that were both supposed to come with the dish were just drizzles under the pile of sliced meat - there was barely enough to get the meat wet much less add much flavor.
We finished with the caramelized layer cake - good flavors but it tasted old and stale.
Plus the crumbled slice looked like it was cut by our toddler.
We wondered if they scraped together the last bits of cake from the night before.
OK, so the bottom line is that for us Sage didn't live up to its reviews and its price point.
It was pretentious and overrated, and for $250 for two, we expected better.

Most of the reviews for this restaurant are from couples, but even if you're a spinster who can't stop dating unavailable people (emotionally, physically, whatever), Sage will be an amazing experience.
Sit at the bar, let Aaron make your drinks, eat the beef tartare.
Everything's going to be fine.

If you are a budget conscious diner who wants a full fine dining experience including wine/beer pairing, then this is a great place to go.
I've been here twice so far while in Vegas and it's always been a pleasant experience.
In fact, one Vegas weekend I had dinner here one night and the next night at Joel Robuchon (which was around 10x the cost) and I actually preferred Sage's food over Robuchons.
Call me crazy, I know.
My favorite dishes here are the market oysters and the scallops.
Probably one of the most flavorful scallop dishes I've had.
Also, they tout their foie gras creme brulee as one of their signature dishes, but I must warn you, it is a very polarizing dish.
Some people will love it because they've never tried anything like it before but others will hate it.
I didn't care for it much even though I love foie gras, so I didn't find it surprising when it was off their prix fixe menu the second time around.
Their wine/beer pairings are also a great deal for around $44.
The only problem I had with beer pairing was that they were pouring near full pints each glass.
I got so drunk after the fifth course, I couldn't remember half the night afterwards.
But then again, I guess that isn't such a bad thing in Vegas.

I know it's hard to find a 5-star restaurant in Vegas.
Service can easily get subpar due to the never-ending crowd and wherever you go, the decors always seem a little clichéd and repetitive.
But let me tell you: Sage is one of those "must-go 4-star"s indeed.
We went with the chef's tasting menu, which brought us plenty of 5-star dishes including the foie gras brûlée, the chilled maine lobster with pumpkin flan and the herb-crusted lamb saddle.
The chef is not afraid of creating bold flavors and everything was spot on delicious!
My boyfriend would definitely recommend the big 6-course tasting menu.
But if you are scared of overindulgence like I do, go À la carte and make sure you get those 3 dishes I mentioned.
Living in California is awesome, but living without foie gras sucks.
So I went to Vegas hoping that I could have a little treat, but I did not expect to have the BEST mousse-like preparation of foie gras I've ever experienced.
Give it a try and let me know if you agree :)

Of all the restaurants we've eaten in while staying in Las Vegas, Sage has consistently delivered a high quality meal with great ambiance.
I also think for this sort of dining, Sage actually passes for a good value (on the Strip).
We've been three times and have enjoyed each time, either getting the chef's tasting menu with wine-pairing or ordering a la carte.
The menu is challenging without being off-putting and we've had very good service and meal-pacing.

I would totally go back here just to try some other things on the menu - there were so many things that I wanted to try.
We started with the wagyu beef tartare - amazing.
I savored every bite!
He ordered the Braised Veal Cheeks.
The meat was soft and juicy.
Afterwards, don't forget to use the delish bacon bread to soak up the rest of the juices.
I ordered the scallops... which had me at salted caramel reduction.
:)  Probably one of the best scallop dishes I have had.
Ever.
Thank you Sage for a great dining experience!

Sage is an absolutely outstanding restaurant - a couple of misses almost inclined me to go 4-stars, but after much thought, I realized the hits where so phenomenal, I'd be remiss to deduct a star.
First off, the starters: -Foie Gras Custard Brulee - Wow.
One of the most unique dishes I've had, and absolutely fantastic.
-Grilled Octopus - excellent and worth getting - nice flavor and perfectly cooked -Roasted Wild Mushrooms - Holy WOW.
Maybe I was most impressed with this because it seemed least wowable when we ordered it, but I can't put into words how delicious this dish was.
Best mushroom dish of any kind I've ever had anywhere.
I convinced my sister, who hates mushrooms, to try a bite and her eyes lit up and she said "that's amazing.
"  Mains -Pork Loin - Wow again.
Definitely one of the best pork dishes I've ever had.
Even the greens were so good I turned to my fiance and said "you have to try these.
" Don't try to picture this dish - it's nothing like you would expect.
And it will exceed your expectations.
-Braised short rib - the short rib itself was delicious, but the pickled cauliflower on this dish was a bad miss.
Kind of bizarre actually - all 4 of us tried it, and none of us liked it, and it just did not work on the plate at all.
This is reason one I contemplated 4 stars.
It's hard for me to give 5 stars with such a big miss.
-Crab Ravioli - my sister (a picky eater) ordered this and didn't like it.
I will say, it had a very unique flavor (unlike any flavor profile I've ever had with a pasta), and I could see a lot of folks not caring for it, but I liked it OK - not enough to order it, but enough that I ate several bites of hers!
The crab was extremely fresh.
But definitely not a 5-star dish, and reason two I contemplated 4 stars overall.
Otherwise, I liked the atmosphere, and the service was OK (not as good as I expect from a restaurant of this caliber, but not bad).
I will definitely return the next time I'm in Vegas.

Sage is absolutely, hands down the best restaurant I have eaten at in Las Vegas.
Did the Chef's tasting Menu with Wine Pairings.
Everything went together so well.
The Foi Gras Custard Brulee is nothing short of exceptional.
The day Boat Scallops Were cooked perfectly.
The Desert was the perfect combination of sugar and spice.
If you are going to spend some money on a good meal skip the steakhouse and try this place.
You'll be glad you did!

If you have any choice, AVOID this restaurant.
The service is AWFUL and the food is "fancy in a box" -- if it says smoked, it tastes like liquid smoke.
Everything needs salt.
The wine list isn't interesting.
It's somewhat mushy.
It took 1.5 hours to get the amuse bouche to our table.
30 Minutes to take a drink order.
40 MORE minutes to get the drinks.
20 minutes after drinks to take our orders.
When we complained to the manager, she said sorry, but the service didn't improve.
I think we complained 4 times.
It was a party of 11 people and the cost of the dinner was around $200 each.
We are all foodies and the food did not warrant the price.

Hubby and I came here after watching jabawockees (awesome show btw) and had the signature tasting menu ($89pp) & a bottle of wine.
Definitely one of the most memorable meals we've had.
The ambiance is outstanding.
Dark, sexy, and sophisticated, which is how I felt that night.
A run-down of the dishes- -   Wagyu beef tartare: Our favorite dish of the night!
It was a perfectly balanced dish that we couldn't get enough of.
Creamy and rich atop perfectly toasted bread.
-  Market oysters:  This was also delicious, although it's hard to mess up fresh oysters on the shell.
The garnish added a nice kick.
-  Grilled octopus: Relative to the other dishes, this was just mehh.
Although that's not really fair because the other dishes were just so good.
-  Maine dayboat scallops:  WOW this was probably one of the best scallop dishes we've had!
Usually I find cooked scallops to be over/under-seasoned or over/under-seared.
This one was just right.
-  48 beef belly:  This was everything a beef belly should be.
Decadent, fatty, melts in your mouth.
-  Australian wagyu sirloin:  This was an additional $15 upgrade of the tasting menu.
Not disappointed.
The sirloin was cooked and seasoned perfectly.
-  Green Apple mousse:  This was actually on the chef's tasting menu, but they let me switch the dessert at no extra cost.
Very interesting dessert (w/ peanut butter and celery) that took my palette on a sweet/salty adventure.
I'm a fan.
-  Pistachio tart:  I think this was pretty good (I had a little too much wine at this point hehe)  2 tasting menus (with australian wagyu) plus a bottle of wine, tip, tax- all under $300.
Not to mention the food was delicious.
Sage is definitely return-trip-worthy!

love this place  i was somewhat sick when i went so my stomach hates me for not being a bigger food whore when i went.
however i was in rome so i had to do my best to be a roman  the farm poached egg appetizer with truffles is STELLAR.
loved it.
the chix entree was great and sous vide  the grilled octopus salad was great but if i could do it over i'd get the pear salad.
i wish the octopus was charred a bit more but that could be changing the dish completely  service was stellar and 5 stars.
kitchen was sending lots of great stuff.
decor is gorgeous  one friend got the veal which was phenom as well  ORDER: Waitress JEANS: OK but dont show up in a t shirt or shorts or flippers.

Once a month, a few friends and I get together to dine at a nice restaurant.
Sage has been on our list for a long time.
Three of us got there early and spent some time at the bar.
The signature cocktails are innovative and fresh.
Most of the ingredients are not your conventional elements and mixed well.
Personally, I like the Moscow Mule.
Served in the traditional copper mug, the blend of lime, ginger beer, and vodka hit the spot.
James, our server, was beyond amazing.
We started off with a glass of champagne.
We found out that any full bottle of champagne or wine under $500 is half off.
That is dangerous, because it lead to five bottles being consumed throughout dinner.
It is a great deal for locals and a great way to get people to come back.
The best appetizers are the oysters with aged tequila mignonette and a Tabasco sorbet, roasted sweetbreads, and frois gras creme brulee.
The wagyu beef tartare was decent.
Nothing amazing or unique.
The ones we could have done without were the octopus, yellowtail, and the brussel sprouts salad.
The greens had too much of a bacon flavor.
I never would have thought I'd be the one to say that.
Normally bacon is the solution to all of life's problems.
In this case, the smokiness was overbearing.
Two different places have taught me that yellowtail is not to be ordered outside of sushi restaurants.
As for entrees, the veal cheeks and NY strip were melt in your mouth buttery goodness.
The side of creamed potatoes were irresistible.
The tile fish was not worth getting.
I would suggest getting something else.
Both of the pastas are impressive.
The raviolis had large pieces of king crab meat on each stuffed pocket.
The cavatelli had a generous amount of shaved truffles on it.
The toasted pine nuts add a textural component to the dish that was complimentary.
We were told that every dish was rich and heavy.
By the end, I was done for.
If death was at my door, I would gladly go.
Desserts are Sage's weak point.
The sweet potato sundae was the best offering.
Otherwise the other three desserts we ordered were forgettable.
Skip dessert and just order another entree.
Otherwise go to Jean Philippe Patisserie.

Thanksgiving in Las Vegas was starting to become a tradition for us.
2 years ago we decided last minute to dine at Nobhill, one of Micheal Mina's restaurants, and we were disappointed.
So this year I wanted to make sure I found a restaurant that would be absolutely delicious but I didn't want to get my hopes up.
Sage was magnificent.
Our server was great.
She was able to describe every dish we had questions about.
The fois gras brulee was one of the most amazing things I have ever tasted.
Our server said she often has dreams about it and she's right, I do dream about it.

Ate here last week for a business meeting, so it was a couple of less than classy gentlemen having a classy dinner.
Food was great all around - but given the price it better be.
The farm poached egg and truffles was really interesting, and the strip steak was damn tasty.
This place definitely matched the price point, would go back next time I'm in the dusty gamble-hole known as Las Vegas.
Minus a star for the service, the wine nerd was pretty unhelpful and our main server was nowhere to be found at the end of the meal.

We ordered the 4 course menu and I wasn't impressed.
scallops came with some sand.
beef belly would have been much better as pork belly and a tad more flavor.
olive ice cream came out half melted.
boo =(  on a bright note - the poached organic egg was pretty good and EVERYONE loved the foie gras.

After securing our reservation for a party of 5 on Thankgiving evening, I was very excited to finally get to try Sage.
Talk about deceiving-- from the front, near the Aria lobby, the restaurant looks as if it will be very small and quaint inside.
UH, NO.
Being led into the main dining area, be prepared to be whisked away into a palatial-style room, complete with high ceilings, pillars, dim lighting, and purple and yellow-gold notes of light characterizing most of the room.
I give 5 big stars for the superb ambiance and atmosphere!
TIP: If you consider yourself a true "foodie," this will be your heaven; most, if not all, of our dishes were notably unique (and sometimes "too" unique...I'll get to that later).
Service seemed to lag a bit at first, but picked up as the night went on.
Bread choices were brought around the room by the waitstaff; that night's options were a sourdough and a country white bread of some sort.
While good, it was not very memorable (I tend to obsess about the bread at upper-scale restaurants...love me some carbs!
)  Warning/TIP: The chef seems to have some kind of fetish/fixation with gelatin-izing several accompaniments to dishes (and even some dishes as a whole, like our dessert).
Here we go.
::Food::   *Starters: --Sashimi of Yellowtail ($21): Absolutely delectable, melt-in-your-mouth yellowtail.
This starter was accompanied with delicious smoked apple puree and some squash.
The cons?
Baby portions.
My dad and I split this item and we each got about two bites of the sashimi.
--Roasted Pumpkin Soup ($16): The best I've ever had at a restaurant.
Very simple yet complex flavors (oxymoron, whatever) overcame my senses with every bite.
Like other high-class establishments, they first brought out a bowl with just a few pieces of solid food; here, there were mini-raviolis and a scatter of vegetables, I believe.
They they proceeded to bring a silver pitcher filled with the soup and filled each bowl.
Very nice presentation.
Unfortunately, I don't think they have this item anymore (a shame, as it was perhaps the most memorable part).
--Roasted Wild Mushrooms ($21): I mean...it's what you would expect.
I, however, am very partial to different varieties of mushrooms and these were fantastic.
The dish was complete with pine nuts and a few greens.
*Main Dishes:  --Grilled American Kobe Skirt Steak ($51): PLEASE GET THIS!
What a delightful surprise.
Our waitress recommended this over the other meat option (NY Strip) with the advice that "the NY Strip you can get anywhere else, but the skirt steak is unlike anything else you will ever have anywhere else.
" ...Okaaayyy, we're sold.
When I first read that it was skirt steak, I was a little skeptical; I've never had much luck with it.
This steak was almost like that of a prime bone-in filet: tender, can essentially be cut with a fork, and has loads of flavor like a NY or even ribeye.
Once again, the accompaniments were very intriguing, but still tasty.
The crispy sweet potato puree was really like little fried balls of smooth sweet potato.
The whole table loved them, but there was a spice in it that I wasn't particularly fond of.
It also came served with a honey-roasted radicchio and a pecan type of glaze.
Bravo on this one, Sage.
--Morro Bay Black Cod ($43): Another stunning winner.
I enjoy black cod because of its mild flavor, and this one was no different.
So smooth!
Tip...if you're with some..er, older citizens who might not be able to chew very well, take the initiative and order them this dish.
We seriously didn't even have to chew the fish, it just fell apart and disintegrated in our mouths (okay maybe not that far..but you know what I mean).
Aaaaand, enter the gelatinous food stage.
Alongside the fish was a strip of yellow, omelette colored "gunk" of sorts.
This was our first encounter with the aforementioned gelatin-textured food.
This yellow rectangle was a sweet pumpkin puree of sorts, and was actually pretty good.
Just an odd texture that confused my taste buds and mouth?
In addition, the pancetta gave the fish a nice kick of salt, and don't forget the smoked green grapes!
Incredibly unique for such a simple concept.
*Dessert --Gingerbread Cremeux ($12): Strange.
Strange.
STRANGE.
This is really what cemented in my mind the idea of the chef slaving over making every dish have some kind of gelatinous element.
THIS WAS ALL GELATINOUS.
I know it might sound kind of bratty, but this was just a huge fail, in my opinion.
It was like a harder version of shaped pudding, in a ribbon the width of a fettuccine noodle.
Uhhh.
Final disappointment: Our family friend and I got their french press coffee at the end (very good coffee), and my mom asked for a small cup because she just wanted to taste it.
There was maybe 2 oz.
left in the press.
They still charged her for the cup ($5!).
I'm sorry, but nickle-and-dime-ing a table at a restaurant of this caliber is pathetic.
Overall, Sage is definitely worth a try!
Especially for foodies.

***This is only for the cocktails at the bar.
***  The girlfriend and I had heard good things about the cocktails at Sage, so we decided to check it out on our last night in Vegas.
We had previously eaten at Sage a year prior and had been very impressed with the food, so we were optimistic that the drinks would be equally impressive.
We arrived right at opening, 5 pm, and sat at the long bar just inside the entrance into the restaurant.
Sage's bar was a dimly lit, high-ceilinged, classy, retro/art deco looking space.
We were greeted by Brad, one of the highly knowledgeable and skilled bartenders on duty, who took care of our cocktail needs with personable and attentive service.
Having climbed, fully and enthusiastically, onto the barrel-aged cocktail bandwagon, I ordered the Empire State ($16), Sage's clever twist on the classic Manhattan, made with Hudson Rye Whiskey, Root liqueur, Punt e Mes sweet vermouth, Angostura bitters, and aged in a Hudson whiskey barrel.
It was boozy, yet silky smooth, offering a very nice change of pace to an already perfect classic.
While it wasn't an inexpensive drink, it was worth every sip.
For my second round, I had the Half Baked ($16) made with Boulard VSOP Calvados, Willett Rye, Germain Robin Absinthe, and Baked Apple bitters.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/f9sU31meK0bqAD7922sCog?userid=le3Xn9Mheb1hNxWurF7RSw#iHpD3jnwRXfgzsMg03OkQA  Another boozy drink, it was intriguing in its complexity but nicely balanced.
It was another winner in my book.
While Sage isn't the cheapest place for drinks, I've paid more for much, much less than what I received in terms of the quality of ingredients, drink concept, and bartender execution.
Not surprisingly, Sage delivered the goods in the cocktail department!

This was my second time at Sage, and both times it was a remarkable experience.
I came here with a friend for my birthday, and it was an awesome way to kick off a new year.
My favorite characteristics of this place are:  --secluded from the Aria casino floor --great lighting and decor --4 course tasting menu for $89 is the perfect amount of food --great wine list  I am definitely a food snob, and the creativity and lovely presentation of each dish at Sage has completely spoiled me.
Do not miss the Waygu tartare (an immaculately executed version of a classic) or the pork medallions.
This place is my favorite prix fixe option in Vegas!

Sage is in Aria.
The restaurant has a geat trendy decor and atmosphere.
All servers are enthusiastic and there to please.
Food off the charts good.

My husband came to eat here for a romantic evening before heading out to the O show.
First off, the staff there was amazing!
The waiter catered to us, let me try the wine when I wasn't sure about it, was very imformated about the dishes and he also wished me a great birthday throughout the evening.
The food was mouth watering and the bread was soo good, bacon in the bread!
At the end of the meal I was too full to eat dessert but the waiter would not let me leave without both of us trying a sample of this amazing hazelnut hot chocolate.
This was a great experience all around, thank  you Sage!

Came for dinner before the 9:30 Zarkana show.
The interior lighting is dimly-lit which gives the restaurant a romantic ambiance :]  Ordered the 4 course Chef's tasting menu ($89) with wine pairing ($44).
Not bad for the price at all!!!
The presentation of each dish was exquisite (see pictures) and everything was perfect :] Left with a full tummy too!
Sourdough/bacon bread served with sea salt and butter  * Pear Salad - 5/5 * Oysters with Tobasco sorbet - 5/5 (A MUST TRY) * Wagyu Beef Tartare w/ bread - 4.5/5 (a bit heavier than I expected) * Jumbo Scallops - 4/5  * Grilled Octopus with smoked potato puree- 5/5 * 48 hour Beef Belly with sweet potato puree-5/5  * Iberico Pork Loin- 4.5/5  * Olive Oil ice cream- 5/5 (SO GOOD with the wine pairing)  * Green Apple Mousse (Substitution)- 4/5  * White Chocolate Soup - 5/5 (PERFECT way to cleanse our palette after an amazing meal :])

Unlike most people, I thought this was just ok and didn't blow my mind.
I got the tasting menu.
- Market oyster.
I think they said it was a kumamoto, but I'm not entirely sure.
It had piquilo pepper, Tabasco sorbet, and aged tequila Mignonette.
It tasted pretty good.
Excellent start for the night.
- Chilled main lobster with a pumpkin flan, smoked apple, and a pecan-brown butter vinaigrette.
The lobster was pretty good.
It was soft and sweet.
Coupled with the flan and smoked apple, it was pretty delicious for the cold appetizer.
- Fois gras brulee.
Way too salty and was borderline difficult to eat  - Pan roasted sea scallop with jamon iberico, chopped romesco, and a creamy cauliflower sauce.
The scallops were cooked perfectly and were very tender.
Coupled with the different ingredients, you basically tasted scallop with some sweet kick to it.
So far, this was my favorite even though it wasn't that memorable.
- Herb crusted lamb saddle with roasted sweetbreads, Thomcord grape, and Chanterelle mushroom.
The lamb was pretty good with the herb crust on top.
It was cooked rare, so the meat was soft and very tender.
- 48 hour beef belly with caraway spiced heirloom squash and roasted quince.
If you've ever had braised beef in some type of reduction sauce, this is basically it with one exception.
The beef belly was VERY heavy in fat and flavor.
What I mean by this is that it's literally like eating a spoonful of roasted bone marrow with some strands of meat in it.
The beef belly was very tender, but it was just extremely fatty and rich.
- Green apple mousse with peanut butter cream, celery leaf, and autumn spice.
The green apple mousse reminded me of almond tofu in some ways.
I didn't really taste the green apple flavor that much for some reason.
There were some marshmallows that have been singed to the plate.
The peanut butter cream was a decent complement to the mousse though, but I found the celery leaves added absolutely nothing to the taste other than making the plate look nice.
The peanut butter cream was very powerful and was similar to eating caramel just with peanut flavors.
The long stick is some type of candy that cracks like a hollowed thin candy cane.
This dessert was just ok.  Out of everything I've had, I'd have to say my favorites were probably the pan roasted sea scallop and the herb crusted lamb saddle.
The fois gras brulee and 48 hour beef belly was slightly too rich for me for a 6 course meal.
The chilled main lobster was just ok, and the green apple mousse dessert was also just ok.

Had the six-course tasting menu with the wine pairing and the meal that we brought was art on a plate.
Each course and wine pairing was carefully chosen to entertain and surprise.
The service was perfect with the timing of the meal appropriately spaced out without leaving too much time between courses or rushing the next plate and wine.
I have had several similar tasting menu experiences in NYC and found this one to be every bit as good at a cost significantly less than what I would have spent in NYC.

What an incredible restaurant!
I'll remember my dinner here for many years to come.
It was an incredible experience.
The food, the cocktails, the ambiance, and the service were all top notch.

December 15, 2012.
An excellent restaurant and dining experience.
We chose the tasting menu with wine pairing - they also offer beer pairing!
All courses were excellent, service was perfect.
Would really like to return and try the same menu with beer pairing.
Highly recommend.

I was so tired upon completion of my late afternoon business meeting in Vegas that I was thrilled to have Yelp tell me that a 4.5 star restaurant was located off the lobby of my Vegas Strip hotel.
Sage was one of those magnificent, beginning to end experiences that allows heaping praise without hesitation, as so much going right cannot be coincidence.
I had an incredible first course of warm wild mushroom sald with pine nuts and black currants, washed down with a glass of sparkling Rose'.
I went high dollar for the entrée--a few notches above most of the others in price at $43 and got the black cod, smoked grapes, pumpkin flan, a crisp of prosciutto and a few layers of Brussels sprouts.
I'm not kidding.
It was magnificent.
I savored every bite.
I was so pleased I did not want to spoil my palate with any sweetness or cappuccino.
I just wanted to savor the perfection on a plate I had just experienced in two short courses.
I was alone in town for work so I sat at the bar myself and had metronomic attention and delivery.
The skillful bartender knew, among the patrons eating at the bar, who to engage with and who to mindfully check on but let alone.
He was wonderful.
This was a topflight experience and if it is any indication of an average night, I unequivocally recommend it.

YUM!
came here for dinner and tried the 4-course tasting menu for $89/person.
very good deal for the price!
hubby's absolute fave was the wagyu beef tartare- he would've picked up the plate and licked it if he could.
and i loved the scallops.
PERFECT texture, cooked to perfection.
the atmosphere is not stuffy but you do feel like you're dining at a nice, classy place.
service is excellent and we will definitely return next time we're in vegas!

The Vegas Strip is full of fine dining establishments and other good restaurants, but I have to say that Sage is probably the perfect place to start off the night with a little bit of class.
While I'm pretty used to fine dining in NYC, upscale dining in Vegas really is a totally different animal.
Everything is brighter, glitzier and more glamorous.
And dare I say, more expensive?
If there is one place to get a little fancy while you're in Vegas, however, Sage is the place.
First of all, I love its location in the Aria (since I always stay at the Aria now whenever I visit Vegas), which basically makes it a lot more modern and newer than some older restaurants in the other casino hotels.
The bf and I had a reservation for 8pm Friday night, which seemed like the prime time to come.
The dining room was lively, yet not overly noisy or crowded at all.
The high ceilings and large spacing between the tables also makes for a more romantic setting - which I definitely enjoyed.
Everything we had to eat was delicious and perfectly executed.
The famed foie gras custard brulee really is everything it's hyped up to be, a must order.
I loved the creamy, almost-whipped texture of the foie custard underneath the sweet brulee shell that was just begging to be cracked with the back of my spoon.
The pear mostarda that came atop the custard brulee provided a nice acidity, and left me yearning for more.
While the dish is quite dainty, the richness and decadence makes it very shareable; the bf and I were definitely glad we shared it, because with the buttery brioche and foie custard itself, I really don't think either of us could have conquered it alone.
The gold pear and shaved brussels sprouts salad I had was great as well, surprisingly hearty and savory with the addition of macadamia nuts and a bacon mustard vinaigrette.
Raw brussels can be a little hard to pull off, but I absolutely love it when it's done right - and Sage definitely did it right.
Another impressive dish of the night was the braised veal cheeks the bf ordered, served with honey roasted carrots, glazed cippolini onions and smoked polenta.
The braised veal cheeks were the most fall-apart tender and buttery piece of meat either of us have ever tasted.
So impossibly tender that the bf could have smeared it on toast as meat butter - which I'm afraid he secretly wanted to try at home.
Sage also has an impressive wine selection, and our wonderful server was more than helpful to recommend a nice bottle of red to pair with our meal.
Everything from the ambiance, to the food, down to the attentive and genuinely warm service here totally wooed me.
I only wish that I hadn't lost money at the casino right outside - so that I could have had a second dinner at Sage instead.

On our quest to find the perfect Strip eats we were once again sadly disappointed.
Sage has all the makings of the perfect Vegas dining establishment.
Large and swanky- just walking in makes you feel way cooler than you are.
Service is spot on and the wine list is appropriately way over priced (we are definitely dining on the Strip).
The problem lay with the food itself.
We started with the beef tartare (definitely missing the worcestershire), the oysters (the mignonette accompanying these tasty little morsels was perfection), a frisee salad (which was overdressed and had way too much bacon- is too much bacon ever a bad thing?- In this case it was), and sweetbreads (the best thing we ate)..  For the main course I had the duck and was dismayed to note that it was unevenly cooked.
Some slices were undercooked making the meat tough and chewy.
Undercooked duck verges on inedible duck.
If you're in this swanky of a place the meat should be cooked to perfection.
My mother in law had a pasta topped with crab and stuffed with fennel.
Sounds amazing- right?
Nope serious salt OD.
Our other dining mates had scallops and a New York strip steak (and were both licking their plates clean).
Hmm maybe I just ordered the wrong thing.
As for dessert- I have a huge glutinous sweet tooth and often eagerly look forward to the end of the meal.
The caramelized layer cake is probably one of the worse desserts I've had in recent memory.
Super dried out with random bits of panna cotta and ice cream decorated around the plate.
Looked pretty, tasted awful.
Sadly Sage is being added to an ever growing list of overpriced mediocre eats on the Strip.

Decided to go to Vegas this year for Christmas and ended up at Aria (great hotel) and the time came for suppa so made reservations to Sage Christmas day.
We get walked to our table and dayum this restaurant is huge!
Must have taken 15 minutes to get to our table at the very back of the place (okay maybe not 15 but you get the idea).
It's a great all around restaurant from decor to lighting to the menu and drink options and, of course, the grub.
We decided to go with the Chef's tasting menu (what the heck it's Christmas right?
) and from the amuse buse to the dessert this was one delicious meal!
I won't go into specifics as I'm sure it gets changed as much as every night but these were some of the tastiest plates I've had.
Some that come to mind are the Wagyu Beef Tartare which not only started with some great beef but also added a Caper Aioli (anything with Capers for me is halfway there) and the crispy chocolate got me all the way there and beyond.
The braised short rib with a bone marrow crostini on top was so rich that I'm sure an artery got blocked that night.
On top of that it was as tasty as tasty gets.
Our waiter seemed a bit arrogant initially but it may have been the setting as when the wife left for the ladies room for the second time (she has the bladder of a squirrel) he and I got to talk a bit and he was really a cool and laid back dude that recommended some other nice places to grub the next time we came back to LV.
By the way this place has a great selection of not only wines but some very good beers.
For me being able to chose from more than one IPA on the menu (when you aren't a pub) scores a 10 in my book.
Actually, just OFFERING an IPA on the menu is better than most places.
Overall I would come back here not only for the food but the beer, wine and good service.

The food is great - and it deserves a better venue than this.
The 3 stars are for the food alone, but everything else just doesn't work.
The food is delicious, and was immensely mood enhancing - a good thing, considering the impression Sage made on me from the start.
The amuse bouche, appetizers, and mains reminded me of Scott Bryan's uncomplicated perfectionism, while the desserts are very creative and offer interesting spins on seasonal flavors.
It has a large by-the-glass program, and the pours are a decent size.
Normally I could overlook the inexperienced staff, the decor, and the uncomfortable seating, but the prices put it within range of Eleven Madison Park, which outclasses it in every way.
It's a hard place to give a full recommendation to, but perhaps if you can eat at the bar, some of the unfortunate factors can be avoided.

Regarding my own meal: My Sea bass had very flavorful leeks with it (absolutely delicious), but the fish itself was bland, bland, bland.
Wine pairings were all very good, from the Chablis to the Oregon Pinot Noir that the sommelier will go to heaven for choosing.
Dessert came in a fountain (6 different desserts for 6 different people) and every single one was absolute bliss.

Yelp works!
Who knew?
I was looking for a nice restaurant to have dinner with my lovely lady before a show.
I wanted to find a nice, adult restaurant for a date night diner and stumbled across Sage on, who would have guessed it, Yelp.
I trusted the Yelpers reviews and was beyond pleased with their reviews and recommendations.
Sage is an amazing restaurant with fantastic food, that I believe is overshadowed by other, newer "it" spots to dine.

We're S.F.
Bay Area Foodies (Jan 2, 2013) Best  kept secret:  Pre fixe theater menu (5 pm - 7pm)  $ 49 person, Wine or Beer Paring  $ 39).
We had the wine pairing (generous pour).
Best value in Vegas  $ 90 @ person.
Soup (Pumpkin) or Salad (Shaved Brussels Sprouts)  Choice of one:  Organic Chicken Title Fish Flat Iron Steak  Dessert: Caramelized Layer Cake  The Staff, Chef ...
Excellent Service, Chef and Kitchen pays attention to every dish.
Flat Iron Steak was as order Medium Rare.
Who would have thought that I loved the shaved Brussels Sprouts Salad (I hate Brussels Sprouts).
The Fish Pan Roast with had a nice seared skin and was moist.
The best surprised entree was the Organic Chicken that was vacuumed packed and cooked in water .... so moist and tender with a truffle sauce.
The de constructed layer cake with ice cream was a work of art.
Added bonus ... White Chocolate Soup...
Hot ... first slip we were in Heaven !!!
We will be back !!

Very elegant classy restaurant with very good service and professional staff and great tasty food.
We ordered a lot of food from the menu and they were all excellent quality.
I was super excited about the foie gras.
The dessert was the best part of the meal.
We got the apple tart and it was not what we expected at all in an amazing way.
Not only it was absolutely delicious and you couldn't get enough of it, it was also a very beautiful plate just to look at and take photos of.
We were very happy with the overall experience and would go back for sure.

Came in here last week after losing my paycheck.
The only thing that woulda made me smile was some good food.
Let's just say I left this place with a smile on my face.

Came here for a team dinner with my manager and co-workers.
DELICIOUS!!
Food was absolutely amazing and the service was impeccable.
Cocktails are so unique and dangerous!
And the chefs small dishes he sent out were to DIE FOR!!
The ambiance was very intimate for the group, but we definately didn't feel like people were on top of us, in fact the other tables were nicely spaced out so you weren't being spied on :)

Sage has been on my yelp bookmark for long time.
I've heard so much good things about Sage.
People are saying Chef Shawn McClain| has very creative and interesting dishes.
I had my expectation high before my visit.
It didn't let me down at all.
I ordered FOIE GRAS CUSTARD 'BRÛLÉE' for appetizer.
It was amazing!
I am BIG foie gras lover and I never had it in this form before.
I felt heaven after my first bite of salted brioche with foie gras custard topped with crispy sugar.
It absolutely was one of my best foie gras tasting experience.
I had scallops with braised oxtail for entree.
It was very interesting combination in a good way.
Salted caramel sauce brought the whole dish together in a very balance way.
I finished my meal with olive oil ice cream.
It was very good too.
I had olive ice cream at Jaleo by Jose Andres before.
I think they are about same good!
The only thing I could complain was the service speed.
It probably took 20 mins or so for our server brought my bday cake to table.
Other than that, everything was great.
I also sampled all dishes my girl friends ordered.
There was no dish I tasted I didn't like.
Sage is definitely a good place for adventure foodies.

Being at the whim of those at the table and our schedules, we were unable to do the chef's tasting menu or the Absinthe service, but my experience with the two-course dinner I did do definitely has me wanting to try the chef-creative experience.
My wagyu short ribs were nothing short of superlative and a great reminder of how great good food can be.
I also sampled the risotto, and the meyer lemon taste was amazing.
Service was professional but not stuffy.
Would definitely go back

What a fantastic place.
The room is opulent and elegant with a great energy, but still manages to feel relaxing at the same time.
It's hard to describe the menu--I'd call it creative, eclectic Continental with a decidedly American sensibility.
Standout dishes included the foie gras brulee and the octopus salad with apples, tiny mushrooms, almonds, and pecans.
It was a mix of lots of flavors, but they all worked miraculously together.
I've been here three times and we've dined at the bar each time.
This place must have just about the best bar staff in town, because they've always been chatty, informative, and terrific with their liqours.
On the most recent trip, we even got to see an absinthe service demonstration.
I wouldn't hesitate to make this a destination dinner for your Vegas trip.

Wonderful service- our waiter was attentive and personable.
I definitely felt important and like a valued customer.
The ambiance was great, we didn't make our reservation til a day before we went, so we had to arrive on the early side.
At that time the dining room was pretty empty, but by the time we finished it was nearly full.
However, it never felt crowded (except towards the end when a group of 6 rambunctious business men sat next to us) the dining room is spacious with high ceilings and the seats were all comfortable than standard dining chairs.
My only complaint is that the table was really wide- I felt a mile away from my date!
And since the service consisted of all small courses (never family style), this didn't seem necessary.
Ok- here is the real scoop: The food was DELICIOUS.
My bf brought me here for a recent celebratory dinner, and we each got the smaller tasting menu ($89/person).
We diverged on each course except the second  (scallops!
absolutely the best dish of the night!
) which was nice to get to try most everything  The highlights for me were definitely the scallops, the pork loin entree and the beautiful desserts.
Neither was overly sweet, each had a savory element, but both were decadent and delicious.
This was an amazing dinner and I would LOVE to come back again for another special occasion (well, I would love to come back much more often than that, but with drinks, the bill was $250 for the two of us, so definitely not an every day meal!
) I highly recommend

Great food and wine list.
Somewhat overpriced, but it'll be an excellent dining experience.
The service was great, and our dinners were fantastic.
Overall, the prices are not good, but the chef really knows what they're doing.
If you just want the same dishes you can get at any restaurant, this is not the place.
If you want an original dish, or something weird, Sage really excels.

Delighted with the chef's four course tasting menu - the Maine Day Boat Scallops were amazing- the waiter, "Bond" was cheerful and pleasant, the ambiance was exciting and the overall experience was a "10".
We were in awe of the nine billion dollar complex which houses Aria and the Mandarin Oriental.

In my top three dining experiences!
Had the 36 hour short rib, which was to die for!
Tasted the risotto which was light?
And tasty!
The tables are not right on top of one another, so you can enjoy your company.
The service was on point but not over bearing.
Desserts were also lovely.
Top to bottom Sage is a stand out among many in Vegas.
I will be back!

Easily my favorite place to dine in Las Vegas!
Gorgeous room, terrific bar and cocktail program, fantastic and creative food, and absolutely the best service!
The same server took care of us about about a year ago...and upon our return he remembered what we'd had before...unbelievable!
6 stars if I could!

Don't believe the hype!
We went to Sage on a Saturday night to celebrate my wife's birthday.
We chose Sage because the reviews were so high...my were they misleading.
It was a comedy of errors from the minute we walked in.
We ordered a pear and brussel sprouts salad, they brought us a beet salad.
We let them know and they corrected it.
Fair enough, everybody makes mistakes, we weren't that concerned about it.
But that was only the beginning.
They offered us a choice in bread - I opted to be adventurous and try their bacon bread.
Disgusting, to say the least.
It was extremely salty and near vomit-inducing.
When it came time to order, I asked the bartender what he recommended (clearly I wasn't making good decisions on my own).
He highly recommended the scallops, said there was no way I could be disappointed in them.
I trusted his recommendation and went with that.
They showed up on the table looking tremendous...very well presented.
I started to think "maybe we're turning a corner here"...WRONG.
I ate my first bite and tasted something crunchy...thought maybe a piece of shell or sand snuck in...no big deal.
But nearly every bite had the same something crunchy going on.
I asked our server about it, he said scallops don't have shells...possibly it was sand but that had never happened before.
I offered him a bite but he politely declined...I still don't know how it "never happening before" was in the least bit relevant.
Anyways, he did take them back and asked if I wanted something else in stead.
By this point I was done with the place, no chance of that.
Finally they brought the bill.
They had removed the charge for the scallops but had managed to charge us not only for our pear/sprouts salad that we ordered, but also the beet salad that we didn't.
Good thing I didn't trust them enough to just pay the bill without checking it first.
When I brought it to their attention they removed the charge, but one has to wonder in a place like Vegas how many customers miss that.
After all of this I requested to speak to the manager to give them feedback on the utter disappointment we had experienced.
We gave our feedback to a girl up front, she went to tell the general manager, and not surprisingly the GM wasn't interested in talking to us.
With leadership like that, is it any surprise that the organization is a failure?

First night in Vegas and my friends and I decided on Sage.
Most definitely a great choice!!
Upon first stepping foot in the restaurant I was blown away by the high ceilings, and dim lighting...very sexy chic...very Veags.
Our watier was very attentive and offered drink and food suggestions.
In the end, I ordered the taylor gold pear and shaved brussels sprouts and the braised veal cheeks.
Both dishes were beyond excellent.
The veal melted in my mouth and with a combination of polenta the dish was perfect.
The portion sizes were just right I wasn't stuffed by the time we left and even had room for a few drinks.
Even though the meal was on the expensive side I would definitely say it was worth the money for anyone looking to have a fantastic meal in Vegas.

Wow.
Wow.
Wow.
Wow.
There really aren't any words to describe how excellent Sage is.
I give it six stars, how's that for wow?
I have been here twice for dinner, once during Restaurant Week when it first opened (best decision ever) and then for my husband's birthday.
Both times the food and service were beyond spectacular.
The restaurant interior is impeccably decorated and provides the experience of a luxurious yet inviting restaurant.
For appetizers I have tried the steak tartare and roasted pumpkin soup, both really, really good.
The pear and brussel sprouts salad with red endives in a bacon mustard vinaigrette, the wagyu short rib with an interesting horseradish potato puree and the ochicken were all excellent.
For dessert I have tried a fruit tart-type of thing, the pineapple mousse and gelato.
The cocktails are excellent as well.
I can't recall exactly what I drank but it had pine nuts in it, VERY INTERESTING.
It wa super delicious, I highly recommend it.
Sage has been, without a doubt, one of my best dining experiences I've had in this city.

Loved it - and it doesn't HAVE to break the bank.
The sleekness starts at the entrance, when you walk in between see-through floor-to-ceiling wine coolers.
This "door" is the only thing you see from the casino floor, so the restaurant feels a little hidden.
The dining area is modern and quiet (but not awkwardly so).
Our service was excellent from the hostess to the waiter to the bussers, and everyone was very knowledgeable when it came to the menu.
The waiter suggested a virgin Moscow Mule for my pregnancy cocktail and the Empire State for my husband, who was interested in a rye cocktail.
Both were spot-on.
For dinner, I got the pre-theatre menu, which I recommend to everyone.
It's $49 for 3 courses (bargain), but only available from 5-7pm.
I selected the pear & brussel sprout salad, the tilefish, and the pineapple mousse dessert.
My husband went with the a la carte menu (not bargain) and got a mushroom salad (~$20) and the skirt steak (~$50).
We also shared the beef tongue appetizer.
I have never tried beef tongue and have always been apprehensive about biting into something that seems so chewy and just weird, but I was so glad we got this.
The meat was served in little cubes with rye toast, celery, and white beans, and was awesome.
I could have eaten twice as much.
If you're waffling on trying tongue, this is an excellent way to start!
Both of our salads were delicious - the brussel sprout/bacon/pear combination tasted great, but seemed kind of standard.
The mushroom salad, on the other hand, was really unique.
The mushrooms were so hearty, they actually tasted like meat!
And there were so many different mushrooms, all with different tastes.
The skirt steak was awesome, served in a sweet-ish sauce with these fried sweet potato ball things, which were also awesome.
The disappointment of the night was probably the tilefish - it was good and all, just not anything to wow me.
I guess they probably did all you can do with tilefish.
The dessert, however, was incredible.
The plate had pineapple mousse, little bites of pineapple cake, pineapple ice cream, and actual pineapples!
Oh yeah, drizzled with some kind of pineapple-y sauce.
Don't be scared, though, it wasn't overpowering at all, just delicious!
I wished I could have sat and slowly savored each little bite, but I had to hurry a little to make it to the show on time!
I had been saving Sage as a special-occasion, expensive kind of night out, but it doesn't have to be.
If you come in early for the pre-theatre menu or just hit the bar for happy hour apps & drinks, you can get out for $150 for 2 people.
Additional tip: all wine (ALL!
) is half off for locals on week nights!

Our food was amazing.
We had salads, seafood, pasta and beef.
Our server was a pretentious ass.
Otherwise this would be a 5 star review.
Please instruct your servers if the customer orders a merlot with a seafood / pasta / beef order,  do  not correct the wine choice to Pinot or such.
Seriously, I am not an idiot, I know precisely what I want.
I also know the range of palates dining with me.
I have previously experienced the wines I am choosing between, and I am making an informed choice.
It is insulting.

Love this place!
Fantastic food you can get in Vegas without breaking the bank!
Not to mention they have one of the most authentic and delicate absinthe station for your personal enjoyment ;)

I do not like being one of those 'one star reviewers', but I really was not impressed with Sage.
Just another over the top fancy place without a memorable impression.
(I'm very familiar with the industry and culinary arts, both have been a passion)  Went for my birthday-- terribly terribly over priced for the experience- Atmosphere = stuffy and non existent.
Food taste = trying too hard to be rich and fancy, each bite probably contained 5 spoons of butter.
My date and I spent over  $400 on tequila shots and wine but barely touched our food, whole entrees went to garbage (or hopefully some enthused servers belly).
I feel like the server and som were all over us because we ordered a lot and we were very funny.
If that had not been the case, I get the impression that they would seldom come around.
I eat out a lot... 4-5 times a week, and have no problem blowing serious cash on a great restaurant experience.
I really don't think I will be back here, sorry guys.

We made a Valentine's Day reservation at Sage while in Vegas.
We were very excited based to go but left very disappointed.
Neither me nor my boyfriend got the prixe fixe Valentine's menu.
I had the braised Wagyu beef short ribs, which I was expecting to be excellent having just had the best wagyu beef porterhouse at Cut the night before.
Not so much....
I have never encountered braised short ribs that I could NOT pull apart with my fork.
When I cut them apart, they were not "marbled" but inundated with thick layers of fat, and no, it did not melt in my mouth.
There was barely any meat to my short ribs.
My boyfriend had the pork loin and he said it was only "so so".
The service was a little standoff-ish.
The items definitely overpriced.
Not worth it at all.

This service was not up to level that you expect for this type of highly priced restaurant.
The food was inconsistent.
My entree was great- I had the scallops- but my dining partner had the waygu beef and it was just ok. For $50 it should be better than ok.
The ambiance is just ok, music a little loud, seating is uncomfortable.
Wine list is also not that interesting.
All in all it was just an ok experience.
For the prices, it should be a fantastic experience.

This place is good, but definitely only someplace I would visit when friends are in town.
We ate all the stuff that foodies would order.
Foie Gras-Good Braised Beef Tongue-Really good Wagyu Beef Tartare-Amazing Grilled Octopus-Really good Sweetbreads-Mhm different in a good way  Braised Veal Cheeks-Good Scallops-just like anywhere else  Absinthe Blend-Nasty and I love to drink  The place is affordable for the quality and the location...there you have it.

Define: sage  /saj/ Noun:  An aromatic plant (Salvia officinalis) of the mint family, with grayish-green leaves that are used as a culinary herb.
A profoundly wise man.
Adjective Having, showing, or indicating profound wisdom.
This place totally deserves its name!
We didn't do the tasting menu (which I regret a little), and also didn't get any cocktails (also, a miss - they looked amazing and I overheard people at the table next to us praising them).
I think that our menu choices weren't really "sage", we got some wine, I got catfish dish and my fiancé got a Kobe steak.
Both dishes were great - presentation, taste, just the right wise combination of spices, perfect portion size.
However, I must say that I liked the sides more than I liked the proteins - I had amazing pea puree and my fiancé's parsnip puree made me reach out to his plate a few times.
However, the reviews of dishes in this restaurant are irrelevant - their menu keeps changing...
The dishes from previous reviews are not longer available.
But I am sure, that if you take a tasting menu, you will not regret!

Lovely, trendy place that suits Vegas well--and with fantastic food!
The lemon risotto here is a must-try if you like risottos (in case you can't tell from my other reviews, I like me some risotto).
My boyfriend got one of the Absinthe drinks; they came out with a very fancy display and cooked the sugar on top of the glass and dribbled the absinthe in and it was a very Big Affair.
The drink was really good too.
And this is coming from someone who thinks Absinthe tastes like tires cooked in gasoline.
Well done, Sage!
Favorite dish: Lemon Risotto

The food was really great and the atmosphere was enjoyable.
The only reason I am docking it one star is because it took about 20 minutes for us to initially be greeted.
I try to be open minded when it comes to service because I have worked in the service industry to eight years, but the rest of my party was very upset with the service.
The food was amazing!
I got the scallops and really enjoyed my dish.
I was also kind of surprised at the dessert menu.
They had a lot of interesting options, but they didn't have a staple dessert like a brownie or creme brulee.
With all of that being said, I would highly recommend Sage.
The food was great and we all had an enjoyable time.

Love love love their food.
Really innovative in combining technique with different flavors.
The stand outs are their kushi oysters with Tabasco sorbet and tequila mignonette, and poached egg with potato and truffles.
They also have smaller portions of items at their bar if you don't want the whole dining room experience.
But if you do want the entire experience, I highly suggest their $89 chef menu.
You get a good menu with choices in each course.
A must go if in Las Vegas.

Of all the five star high end restaurants in town, most disappoint me in one way or another.
However, every once and awhile, you stumble across one that not only meets but exceeds your expectations in every way imaginable.
From the service to the ambiance to the food, everything thoroughly surprised me.
Mind you though, that all that fanciness doesn't come cheap but I am a huge believer in getting what you pay for.
The last couple of times we have eaten here, service has been superb and the details never a miss.
While the portions are generally on the smaller side and served a la carte, it does allow one to sample many things off the menu which is always a treat.
However, the best way to get a little of everything without getting to full or breaking the proverbial bank is the tasting menu.
I generally try and always take advantage of tasting menus when available because they truly allow you to sample a little bit of everything on the menu.

*review for 'early dinner' special*  we were staying at Aria, had tickets for Zarkana, and it was raining outside.
"let's just eat somewhere in our hotel.
"  we originally had dinner reservations for Otto but then saw the 'early dinner' menu at Sage.
since we've already tried 3 of batali's restaurants (in LA and vegas), we decided to try something different.
and very happy we did.
the early dinner special ($49/person), comes w/ a soup or salad, main course, and dessert.
my wife got the green garlic soup, which was creamy and delicious.
i got the green asparagus salad.
it was fresh and bright and also quite tasty.
there was just a perfect amount of dressing, a nice citrus burst of flavor.
oh, we also got fresh, warm, baked bread.
i had the bacon roll.
yum!
comes w/ herb butter and sea salt.
also got a little duck something or other, amuse bouche, which was ok.  wifey then ordered the organic chicken dish, which came w/ truffle sausage and celery, and the most perfectly crisped chicken skin cracklin on top!
the chicken was very moist and flavorful.
and the truffle sausage was freakin tasty.
the dish had a brown sauce poured over everything, which tasted a lot like the sauce that came w/ my steak.
i had the flat iron steak which comes w/ potato puree, miatake mushrooms, cippolini onions, and a glorious sauce over everything.
cooked a medium rare, the dish was phenomenal.
meat was tender, flavorful and perfectly cooked.
the tanginess of the onions bulbs went perfectly w/ everything.
and i love miatake mushrooms!
absolutely perfect dish.
for dessert we each got the pineapple mouse w/ vanilla gelato.
outstanding dessert.
service was good.
the servers were attentive and made sure we had everything we needed.
we'll definitely be back and maybe next time, try the full tasting menu.

DATE/TIME: August 20, 2012 // 10:00 PM  PRICE: $70/person for Chef McCain's Signature Menu - 4 Courses (+$10 supplement for foie gras brulee) - Increased to $89 as of 3/15/13 VALUE: A great deal.
After a series of disappointing dining experiences at a few Michelin-starred restaurants, Sage was a pleasant surprise.
AMBIANCE: Dimly lit.
Romantic.
Modern.
CHANCE OF RETURNING: 80%  ___________________________________  We were here for our 3 year anniversary, which we forgot to mention when we made reservations.
To be able to taste a wider variety of dishes, my husband and I usually have a habit of ordering different dishes for each course and swapping plates.
A few dishes that we both had trouble swapping include: foie gras brulee, dayboat scallops, beef belly.
___________________________________   :::: [ THE FOOD ] ::::  * FOIE GRAS BRULEE (+$10) (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ)               - [5/5 - This dish fully converted my husband into a foie gras lover.
He couldn't get enough.
SO rich, creamy and luscious.
Well balanced blend of sweet and savory.
Better than I expected.
]  * WAGYU BEEF TARTARE (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#f7sseKdjnTYi_kBYb39-tw)               - [4.5/5 -  With crushed caper aioli, slow poached egg, and crispy chocolate.
The slow poached yolk added a luxurious layer of richness to the dish.
]  * MAINE DAYBOAT SCALLOPS (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#d20AT93H8ZElti4xGmjsxQ)               - [4.5/5 - With braised oxtail, wild mushrooms, and salted caramel reduction.
Cooked to perfection, well paired with the oxtail.
]  * IBERICO PORK LOIN (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#GKvaD5E9QvngdmyQ8zMuGA)               - [4/5 - With crispy pork shoulder, spaetzle, and creminelli mortadella.
]  * 48 HOUR BEEF BELLY (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#sSlizHWPEnqLlzWvypWS1w)                - [4.5/5 - With grilled summer peach, sweet corn puree, and pickled ramp.
Very tender.
]  * GIANDUJA PAVE (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#32an46uyiXWARAKC8dO1MQ)               - [4.5/5 - With olive oil ice cream, hazelnut crunch, and basil jam.
]  * PISTACHIO TART (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=vhHgJh_3RxC2PVTNyCTneQ#e9L3_aLJyTpCEGevKeClwg)               - [4/5 - With sauteed strawberries, honeyed mascarpone, and strawberry-black pepper gelato..]

We ate here on a Friday evening and got the Signature Tasting menu with wine pairing.
This is a 4 course meal and takes a little over an hour.
First of all the food was excellent.
It was not cheap but the tastes were unique and we felt like splurging for our special meal during our Vegas trip.
We come to Vegas to take in the shows and eat, as we are not gamblers.
When we got there on time for our early evening reservation I was disappointed we were seated by the bar area instead of in the back with most of the other diners.
The ambiance from that location was not quite there.
Nevertheless the food made up for it, as each course was excellent.
My wife and I especially enjoyed the scallops in ox-tail sauce.
I am taking off 1 star for the service.
What kept this meal experience from being extraordinary was the aloofness of our server.
He started off the evening on the wrong foot by being over assertive in his correction of my misinterpretation of the menu.
Let's just say he was a bit jarring and awkward in his interaction when a light touch would have sufficed.
During the rest of the meal I felt service was prompt and adequate, but never once did anyone inquire about how we were enjoying the food.
It felt somewhat like an assembly line process.
I understand it's Vegas and Sage is a high-volume restaurant, not an undiscovered gem.
Still one should never be reminded of this.
Would we eat here again?
Maybe to try the Chef's tasting menu.
But next time I would be asked to seat in the back room instead of by the bar.
And I would cross my fingers for more personal service.

The food was great but this restaurant is definitely lacking in service.
Our head server was quite rude.
It seemed to be a huge inconvenience to him to separate the bill by couple.
He made us write out who each menu item was to be charged to.
Not impressed.

What a tremendous disappointment!
Our waiter blew us off after not ordering an expensive bottle of wine....we had to beg for more bread....no one bothered to ask our group how the meal was......the waiter showed up after the dishes were cleared......just a huge letdown....,I spoke to the manager while leaving and Marie seemed to have no reaction.
We walked out and will never walk in again!!!!
It was a business diner with clients and none of us were impressed.
Take your money and your business to one of the 16 other places to eat at Aria!
Pete G

I can not believe how underwhelmed I was by this place.
Perhaps my mistake was not doing the signature course meals.
I didn't like what was being served on the 4 course meal (120 per person)  The place is super nice and the ambiance is great.
Servers/hostesses were all great but for what I paid for, I feel like I got totally jipped.
The portions are ridiculously tiny and NOT worth what you pay for.
King salmon sashimi - 18 ish dollars.
4 measily tiny pieces.
Seriously... FOUR  Foi Gras Brulee - 25 dollars - This was THE thing that was the saving grace to this restaurant.
I wanted to bathe in it it was so tasty.
Me: Pork dish - crispy pork paired with another pork loin wrapped in bacon served with some kind of greens and carrots.
Sounds amazing right?
EHH WRONG.
Crispy pork was good but not knock my socks off and take me to bed good.
It was just meh.
The pork loin wrapped in bacon was tough.
COME ON  I pay 40+ bucks for this meal and it's tough?
I can't even cut it with the knife you give me?
Give me a break  friend: veal cheeks.
Those were tender served with some pickled veggies of some sort and a very creamy mashed potato type of thing.
That dish was pretty good but we weren't blown away by it.
Not to mention, the portion was super small.
I think that if we hadn't had buffet for lunch, we would have walked out of this still hungry and ticked off.
Last but not least... if I'm going to spend that kind of money on a place, I should expect to not feel rushed.
We were in and out of there in about 45 minutes.
Almost felt like they had the dishes waiting and mildly heated them up before everything came out.
Blah...
Totally underwhelmed.
Never going here again.

great service, great food!
they have a foie gras brulee... delicious!

I had read some of the poor reviews below, and I was somewhat apprehensive about dining here.
In fact, I almost contemplated canceling my reservation, but I'm glad that I kept it as the food and service were exceptional.
We had heard that the specialty cocktails were tasty, so I ordered an Empire State...good but certainly not worth the Vegas price premium.
We did have the kumomoto oysters which featured a tabasco kick.
For our main course, we ordered the special:  Aged bone in Prime Ribeye steak for two which included the marrow.
It was sensational, and the presentation was equally good.
Throughout the meal, our waiter and the accompanying staff were extremely attentive.
I don't believe our water ever got to half full.
I would encourage those who are wavering to try Sage.
Date:  March 30th, 7pm

Visited Sage on our honeymoon.
It was a great treat.
We had the chefs special menu, which was very impressive.
Our server was very attentive, friendly and polite.
We got to enjoy some absinthe after our meal too.
I have to say though the legal version of absinthe has such a low level of wormwood that it is just a stiff alcoholic beverage (basically, I didn't see any green fairies)  So, why 3 stars?
The portions were very small and the prices a little too high.
On this trip we visited some of the best restaurants Vegas had to offer and I have to say for $420 (after tax and tip) I don't feel like it exceeded some of it's rival restaurants which ended up costing almost half this amount.
I will say this, we noticed that most people who were dining in there seemed like they were there on business.
We noticed a lot more couples sitting at the bar area in the front.
I guess the food and drinks would go down easier if you were putting on the company's tab :)  We caught a show after dinner, when we left the show we were hungry again, so had to stop to grab a bite somewhere :(  Overall, I might go back, but not for dinner.
Maybe for drinks and appetizers.

I've been dying to try out Chef Shawn McClain's new restaurant... and when I found myself spontaneously going to Vegas for my spring break, I HAD to make a reservation for Sage.
To be honest, I had really high expectations coming into this meal.
I was definitely not disappointed.
The food was delicious, portion size just right, and pricing not too bad for Vegas.
I especially liked the amuse bouche, which was the perfect way to start the meal.
I also loved the bread that came with the meal (very reminiscent of the bacon brioche that is served at Melisse in Los Angeles).
For appetizers, I got the poached eggs with shaved truffles and country bread.
Oh my god.
I didn't know what country bread was until I ordered this... basically its super deep fried bread, aka.
AMAZINGNESS!!!!!!
I was afraid that the poach egg would be too simple, too plain, not impressive enough.
BUT, instead, the flavors and texture of the poached egg complimented the umami taste of the truffles.
Overall, this dish was just perfect.
The oiliness of the bread was subdued by the soft creaminess of the poached egg yolk.
We also ordered the foie gras creme brulee, since foie gras has been deemed illegal in Cali.....
I've been so deprived of this fatty goodness.
I was hesitant about ordering this at first, fearing that the foie + egg would be too sweet and too creamy.
However, the consistency and taste was just right.
The layer of crunchy burnt sugar on top of the fluffy foie custard was perfection.
In addition, there were blood oranges thrown in, giving the custard more depth.
For the entree, I got the chicken entree with braised celery and truffled sausage.
Boy oh boy.
The chicken was tender, the sauce was amazing, and the truffled sausage was sooo tasty.
I'm never been a huge fan of white meat (woo juicy dark meat!)..
but this piece of chicken breast was so tender and moist that I forgot for a split second that I was eating white meat!!
Overall, this was a great food experience.
Only reason why this didn't 5 stars is that the service was a bit iffy.
The servers weren't very attentive and we had to keep flagging them down to refill our waters and take our order.
With that being said, it may have just been a down day.
I'm excited to come and try the tasting menu next time that I am in Las Vegas!

Excellent.
The foie gras brûlée is an absolute must.
I've never had foie gras prepared like this and I loved it.
The scallops and beef belly were sumptuous and the dishes were well executed.
The dessert poached bartlett pear and truffle gelato was an interesting combination which I'm not sure I loved but it was still enjoyable and I always like trying out new flavor combinations so I would still recommend the dish.
Overall the restaurant had good food and a nice ambience so I would definitely go again.

This place is AMAZING.
They have an early dinner 3 course menu that was $49, perfect before a 9 or 10PM show.
I got the wine pairing and the wines were so amazing!!!
It was a great value for the money.

A couple weeks back, we celebrated my birthday at Sage inside Aria.
We've been once before during Restaurant Week and it was fantastic.
It was time to return.
We made reservations on opentable ahead of time.
We were seated promptly upon arrival.
We had a quaint table that was a bit sectioned off; I loved it, it felt like we had the place to ourselves.
We perused the menu and scanned the tablet with all the beer and wine selections.
Sage is one of the few restaurants that offers beer pairings with the tasting menu, it was tempting, but we preferred to order from the menu.
We selected beers; North Coast Scrimshaw ($8) for Frank and Lefe Blonde ($10) for me.
While our waiter fetched those, we were given a choice of breads: bacon or sourdough with sea salt.
We snacked on these scrumptious treats and ordered the green garlic soup ($16) and roasted sweet breads ($17) to get us started.
Sweetbreads have intrigued me, I've only seen them on menus previously in my less adventurous days.
I figured there was no better time to try them than at 33.
Well?
They were... delicious.
For those unfamiliar, they are most often the thymus gland of calves, lambs or piglets.
When properly prepared, like these were, they are a bit crisp on the outside but perfectly tender inside.
Think about the most flavorful chicken nugget you can imagine, times that by 1000 and you have sweetbreads.
These were served with glazed bacon, trumpet mushrooms, and creamy polenta.
The garlic soup is a vegan dish.
The garlic is very mild, and the soup is like silk.
At the bottom of the bowl was a sweet surprise of potato stuffed tortellinis.
Truly it was thing of simplistic beauty.
For the main course we had difficulty making our selections because everything sounded wonderful.
Eventually, we narrowed our choices down to the red snapper ($42) with crispy bread crust, english peas and braised leeks, and the lamb saddle ($42) with braised lamb shank and fava beans.
I don't know that I've laid my eyes on two more beautiful dishes that packed such a punch of flavor.
Well executed doesn't begin to described how expertly these dishes are prepared.
My snapper was superb, but I must admit it was outshined by the lamb.
The fava beans weren't our favorite, but the lamb prepared two ways was stellar.
My favorite was the braised shank it was so carmelized it was like candy.
I mean that in the best way possible.
I'd ask for it for my final meal.
It was that good.
We didn't think the meal could get any better, but we gave the dessert menu a gander.
I have this knack for selecting items I can hardly pronounce because I'm so curious about items that are new to me.
In this case it was the Gianduja Pave ($12).
I didn't have the slightest clue what it would be, but I was anxious to try it.
I later learned that Gianduja is a type of sweet chocolate with hazelnut paste.
It's used in the pave which reminded me of a light mousse, it was served with a scoop of olive oil ice cream, and dressed with hazelnut crunch, basil jam and pomegranates.
I love desserts that are a bit more savory than sweet and this was simply perfect.
A perfect end to exceptional meal.
I cannot think of a better way to celebrate my thirty-third year.

After hearing about the signature tasting menu from a friend during my NCAA tournament trip, when I ended up back shortly afterwards, I opted to try the same thing.
First, their amouse bouche was pretty good, a little lamb tartare with house pickles.
Too bad I had also selected the beef tartare as my first course...heavy tartare here.
But both had great flavor, and I loved the pickles with the lamb.
The beef came in a quite large serving, with some kind of crisp chocolate wafer/cracker things, which were a cool compliment to the beef and the toast it was served with.
I would never think to put chocolate with beef like this, but it was good.
Not being an egg person, the slow poached egg yolk was removed from it's place on top of the tartare (thankfully, all in one piece) and then moved to the side of my plate.
Next, diver scallops with braised oxtail, mushrooms, and broccolini.
Very good stuff here, great sear on the scallops, and the rich beef broth was a good compliment.
I liked the crisp broccolini as a texture change from the similar scallop and mushroom.
My one complaint is that while the outside sear on the scallop was great, the insides were a bit underdone for this kind of preparation.
At least, to my taste.
I don't know how you'd easily get the insides more done without going too far on the outside, but yeah.
That's the misstep here.
Finally, my Wagyu sirloin was delicious.
Amazing texture - the chewier texture I would expect from strip that rapidly broke down in to incredibly tender, rich beef.
Really delicious.
The potato puree under it all could have used some work, as it didn't really do much for the dish, but the beef was good enough to stand on its own.
There was an upcharge for the beef, but I'm glad I did it.
For dessert, the gianduja pave.
This was...schizophrenic.
So many flavors and textures competing, I feel like it could have been a little simpler.
There's the rick chocolate, drizzled with olive oil, the olive oil ice cream, and then hazelnut crunch thingies, a sweet berry jam, basil jam, pomegranate seeds, and then even something on the plate in a sort of design.
So lots of things going on.
Maybe cut a couple out and present this as a more simple dessert, and I think it could have been better.
As it was, it was tasty.
I did like the savory of the basil and the olive oil with the sweet chocolate and ice cream.
All in all, quite good.
Come for the scallops and the beef - maybe get the other dessert offered on the tasting, which is more of a traditional sweet dessert.
I'm very happy I made the walk to Aria to enjoy the menu.
Service was very good, and the atmosphere is pretty cool too.
But then, everything in Aria just seems cooler.
Someday I'll actually stay here.

We were in Vegas in July 2012 for my oldest friend's combined bachelorette/bachelor party.
The bride to be and groom's flight delayed their arrival by 1.5 days and I wanted to make sure everything was perfect for the bride when she arrived.
Thank God for Yelp.
I found Sage through Yelp and based on other Yelpers, scored a 7pm reservation for the7 of us, thereby assuring our reservation would still qualify for the early evening 3 course meal for all of us.
Do this-great deal for excellent food in Vegas.
This was a well traveled group with high expectations for food and Sage did not disappoint.
From a delicious salad with burrata to start to tasty wines throughout, this restaurant helped make their weekend special.
On a visual note, we enjoyed the purple up lighting and linens and the feeling you were in a quiet restaurant, far away from the strip even though you're actually inside the visually stunning Aria casino.
Don't hesitate-go here!

Sage is one of the must places to eat in Vegas if your in or near the Aria Hotel.
Had the 5 course tasting with Wine pairing.
It is one of the most reasonable cost for a tasting menu.
89 bucks.
wine extra.
Each item I had was spot on for appetizer to dessert.
And just enough food without feeling like a blimp.
Elegant surroundings  good service and a nice bar to hang out at while you wait for your table.
You can even eat at bar if there are no tables.
I would go back no problema.

I must say this is one of my new favorite restaurants here in Aria!
Reservation is highly recommended because of their rising popularity since their celebrity chef Shawn McClain's winning on American Iron Chef.
The dark purple decoration inside the restaurant makes it look trendy and fun.
Dark wood, dim lighting, high chair at the bar, sofa seating with leather cover, all in all make this place upscale and fun.
We came here for appetizer and drinks and their pink lemonade is amazing!
I should certainly come back and try their absinthe.
It seems so interesting.
We had their Greek salad and Foie Gras Creme Brulee.
I have to say that salad is probably the best I had in a long time.
It is simple and fresh with their special sauce.
I almost want to rush back to the kitchen and get the recipe.
For the Foie Gras, which is their signature dish.
I can't have enough!
Highly recommend it!
The service is impeccable.
Our server knows what she is doing and gave us a great "class" on their food and prep, very knowledgeable and polite.
I highly recommend this place for any occasions.

Sat with Bond.
When I was figuring out how I like my steak, he recommended that I get it "perfect".
That shall now be how I ask for my steak cooked  The Maine Dayboat Lobsters are magnificent.
A unique blend of flavors that screams for you to slow down and enjoy the interplay of flavors on your palette.
Almost like a bespoke surf and turf.
Australian Wagyu Sirloin with La Ratte Potato Purée & Confit Baby Raddish Was horrible!
Well, it horribly ruined my ability to accept blasé steak with traditional sauces.
The sauce reminded me more of a braised/stew dish and was pleasantly tasteful and different from the norm.
Rhubarb Tart with Oatmeal Crisp, rhubarb ribbon and creme fraiche sorbet.
The perfect dessert to top off a perfect meal.
A delightful blend of sweet and tart flavors with an incredible texture mixture.
There are almost too many flavors but right when you feel pushed to the edge, you take a moment to slow down and then everything comes together and you realize each element is in its perfect place.

I came here for my brother's engagement dinner, b/c our friend picked it out based on high yelp reviews.
Sorry Yelp, you let us down a bit.
On the plus side, the cocktail menu is huge, and the bartender is quite talented.
I had a terrific Sazerac.
On the other hand, the vibe is very snooty (wine and cocktail list are presented on an ipad, which is a cute gimmick, but kind of a pain to flip through), and the servers were as well.
The food menu is quite limited and the cuisine was all heavy meat.
My brother and I are vegetarian and they didn't have a single vegetarian entree.
I muttered to him that, if the chef is good, he could whip something up, and the waitress overhead and chimed in, "he is very good".
No he's not.
The recommended appetizer was a slow poached egg with potato and shaved black truffle--sounded fantastic, but the flavors were way off.
Somewhere between an ashtray and used cat litter.
The special entree was no better and not filling either.
The chef seems to heavily favor bitter, smokey, and highly acidic flavors and food was not balanced and totally lacking in seasoning.
Coming from Northern California, where there are lots of great, great restaurants, it was painful to spend this much money on a meal that was so mediocre.
I suppose if the idea of a $120 steak with bone marrow is your thing, then maybe this is your restaurant (although those who ordered it weren't raving about it).
I am not familiar with the Vegas scene, but think that you should be able to get more creative, local, and flavorful cuisine for far less money than what we paid.

My wife and I went for her birthday and we had a great meal.
I loved the wine and beer list on the ipad.
It offered a low pressure way to get tons of info on every available wine and beer.
The egg app was awesome!
Something I would never make myself and very rich.
The bread was some of the best I have had.
My wife had a steak and mash for dinner and I had the scallops.
The scallops had a sauce that was based on a meat and honey that I do not think complimented the scallops.
It could have used an acid but everything was cooked perfectly.
The waiter was very attentive and helped make a great dining experience.

Every time we go to Las Vegas Sage is a Must to eat for dinner!!
The have the best; to die for Steak tar tar!
I always have the tasting menu and Im never disappointed.
If you want to try a new drink try the Moscow Mule.
Its tart with a hint of ginger beer-very good!

With so many fine dining options and celebrity chefs in Vegas, the food scene is as BIG if not bigger than the casino and clubs here.
Sage is good, very good,  a solid restaurant but it did not rank up there with the best meal or best resturant category.
Zagat rated the cuisine at 28 but I'd give it a 22 or so.
My favorite were the oyster and wine selection, unique.
I would rather be seated at the bar than the resturant, the vibe there felt more upscale and chic.
The atmosphere in the dining area didn't stand out.
The service was solid but not 5 star worthy.....

A solid 4 star rating.
Not sure it deserves the extra half that helpers have given it though.
The ambiance is definitely 5 star....amazing decor everywhere.
We got the 4 course tasting menu, which had a lot of potential.
They started us off with a salmon tartare amuse bouche, which was definitely the best part of the whole meal.
Very complex and delicious.
Next came the Wagyu beef tartare, which was great.
I've never eaten poached egg yolk before, but this was a great introduction.
The meat was definitely fatty and rich, but wasn't overwhelming.
Then a replacement option to the scallops, which I had to beg for since they rarely do substitutions.
Had the red snapper, which basically had a piece of fried toast stuck to it, with some ground crunchy peas.
Wasn't impressed at all with this one.
Next came my Wagyu steak, which I paid an extra $10 to select.
The Wagyu tartare was much better.
This was a good steak, but the flavors weren't distinguishable and really didn't stand out against any other steak I've eaten in a restaurant.
Last came dessert, which was great until I bit into the fresh sage they put on my plate.
Why do restaurants put inedible things on your plate?!?!?
This ruined my taste buds....really took about 5 minutes to recover from the bitterness of this spice.
All in all, amazing decor, really good service, and good, overpriced food.
Was expecting a bit more from a chef that is claimed to have 3 Michelin Stars.
Do they mean 3 yelp stars?

Sage continually delivers.
I am a huge fan of their appetizers but you really can't go wrong with anything.

The short rib was amazing as well as my cocktail.
Service was 5 stars!

I have heard such great things about this place, so I was excited to eat here.
I had the Signature Tasting Menu.
The portion sizes were as expected for a four-course tasting menu and I was decently full afterwards (at the point where I'm satisfied, but if you were to put an In-N-Out burger in front of me, I'd eat it).
Make sure someone at your table orders the Foie Gras Brulee as their app.
It's very rich and you might not want all of it, so it's good for one person to do the upgrade with the other just orders a lighter salad and then sharing.
The only impressive entree was the Iberico Pork Loin.
Nothing else really stood out entree-wise.
And for dessert, make sure you get the Gianduja Pave.
It was probably the most exciting thing I had that evening.
Service was a weak spot for me that evening.
We had a prime table near the center of the room, but didn't get much attention throughout the meal.
As a whole, the dinner was good.
But it definitely wasn't something memorable.
I might have just gone on an off day, but I felt like every dish either had too much of something or was missing something.
The main entrees were the least impressive (except for that amazing Iberico pork dish).
Everything was lacking a certain depth.
If you can spend a little more, I'd go for Le Cirque instead.

The food was delicious, but not like the best in my entire life.
We had good time there with my friends during the dinner, but I am  sure there are places with the same quality food around, not that pricy.

One of our favorite restaurants there is anywhere.
The Moscow Mules are amazing

Although my boyfriend and I didn't completely fit in with the crowd here, we came for dinner in a long progression of 21st birthday dinners for him!
I'm beyond happy that the Aria gave us the $100 food and beverage credit, otherwise I wouldn't have been able to have this amazing food experience.
They start you off with a choice of either sourdough or bacon bread, and of course the best way to go is to try both.
They serve it with sea salt that's imported from Australia and a lemon zest butter.
I never ever put butter on my bread, but paired with the sourdough it was amazing.
Also included was an amuse bouche, which I honestly cannot remember or recognize what it was.
However, the one bite of goodness was the perfect opening to the meal and set the bar high for the food to come.
We chose the Wagyu beef tartare for appetizer after reading all the reviews that raved about it.
It came with egg yolk that was perfectly cooked so it stayed on top of the tartare, but still had a runny quality to it.
Each bite with the tartare and egg on top of the sourdough toast was amazing, and I could hardly tell that I was eating beef.
The meat was extremely fresh and the flavors were really clean.
I had the Maine day boat scallops for my entree, and it came with four huge scallops on top of a bed of mushrooms and braised oxtail.
The oxtail was so tender and the mushrooms were marinated in this dark sauce that was so good.
The scallops were the most tender that I have ever had, and the size of them alone was overwhelming!
My boyfriend had the 36 hour braised short rib that fell off the bone so easily.
The flavors were incredible and the tenderness of the meat was beyond description.
It was also served with a layered potato that probably has a fancier name, but was essentially extremely thinly sliced potatoes that were restacked into a tower.
The end result is a slightly crispy and chewy potato side unlike any regular fries or roasted potatoes.
This is probably one of the fanciest places I've had the opportunity to dine at, and the experience was incredible.
Las Vegas is packed with amazing restaurants, but this is definitely one to come back to.

Service was stellar, food was excellent, atmosphere was killer.
All in all this was a great experience.
It got even better when our bill was actually less than we had budgeted.

Delicious food, so-so service.
My lobster ravioli was luxurious and not overly creamy, which was a major plus.
The Vancouver Island Kushi oysters would have been good on their own-the tequila mignonette added nothing.
I found the server to be a tad snooty, which perhaps can be attributed to the fact that we were, after all, dining inside the Aria Hotel.
Besides the less than desirable service, I think Sage is a good choice for dining on the Strip, if you don't mind a hefty price tag.

Another visit at Sage in my last Vegas trip.
This time we just ordered from their regular menu.
I tried their Foie Gras Creme Brulee served with salted brioche, entered the second course with Veal Cheeks with Candied Carrots and Creamy Polenta, ended the meal with Coconut Key Lime Float.
They changed the bar menu to iPads for easier surfing, you can see the actual image of the drinks without having to search through tons of pages of pictures on Yelp.
Another great experience here beginning with our server who's named Bond.
Such a humorous guy who told us he's a secret agent (whoops, not so secretive anymore!
)  Anyway, finally tried their famous Foie Gras Creme Brulee.
It's a very rich starter, slightly offset by the strawberry jam dabbed in the center, scoop a spoonful onto the fluffy brioche, and what you have there is a mouthgasm.
Basically you have a little bit of everything, savory fragrant foie gras, salty and buttery brioche, and a tad tarty sweet balance.
I must say, I should have ordered a lighter entree because it was quite a heavy appetizer.
Next came my mini pot of veal cheeks.
Veal cheeks were made correctly, very soft and tender in each bite.
Fatty pieces?
Why of course!
That's the best part of tender meat.
I am not the biggest carrot fan nor sweets, I must admit that I was picking at the carrots.
They served their part flavoring the sauce and making the polenta less bland.
It might be just me, but I could barely finish half of this plate after the foie gras brulee.
A bit too much flavors going on that made this dish less appealing, mistake on my part.
And then entered my funny server.
He handed the menu to me saying that he knows exactly what I want.
Unfortunately points at another heavy piece of dessert, Gianduja Pave.
I could handle it a year ago, but not this time, I opted for the Coconut Key Lime Float, something to cleanse my palette and something light.
Not a disappointment at all!
when my dessert came, I was like "oh cool, a sorbet in a glass cup set on top of a bowl of ice.
NBD" Then comes the fun part, like the experiment of dry ice.
The foam for the float was a tequila based soda.
It looked like I had a white volcano for dessert.
I had the next table wanting to take pictures of my dessert.
And if you want to order this, be sure to have your camera ready, the foam sinks in so quickly, your newest phone might not load fast enough for it.
As expected, very light in the tequila taste, each scoop of gelato has very well defined flavors.
I wouldn't suggest eating either of it alone.
Maybe you can for the coconut, but the lime is darn tarty by itself!

Good food but the service was terrible.The waitress was in a hurry, she was always talking with the Bartender.
The restaurant was empty.
We were a group of 10 and none of us will come back.

Perfect in every way..
The dining room, lighting, seating, perfect.
Food & service perfect.
Ambience was perfect.
Just a perfect evening.
One of the best restaurants in Las Vegas right now!

Birthday meal for the birthday boy.
This was our second time there and everything was excellent, just like the year before.
From the Moscow Mule to the Absinthe tasting, to the amuse bouche to the main courses.
Love this place and can't wait to go again!

***There are a few good things about Shawn McClain's Sage, but it (like a lot of Vegas restaurants) is overpriced and does not deliver the same quality as similar upscale restaurants in cities like San Francisco, Los Angeles and Chicago***  Sage is one of the several upscale restaurants in Aria.
Aria's upscale restaurants are much more contemporary than the traditional fine dining spots you will find in older casinos like Caesars Palace and Bellagio.
Sage follows that trend.
Sage is in a very modern space that has kind of an upscale lounge feel.
There is  no white tablecloth though the restaurant does feel like a fine dining restaurant when it comes to their menu--a la carte items with premium ingredients, a pre fixe menu and a tasting menu are available.
I had the pre fixe menu, which offers the choice of several of Sage's signature dishes across four courses.
The meal started with complimentary bread--two crusty options including a bacon roll and salt dusted sourdough.
Both breads were fine but nothing special.
The amuse bouche was raw tuna with cucumber and wasabi.
It lacked the brightness and vibrant flavor of a good amuse.
http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=Xx2ixDh92XbugQPNsARWxA&userid=w-w-k-QXosIKQ8HQVwU6IQ  I started with the foie gras creme brulee, which was a foie gras custard base with a traditional creme brulee caramelized sugar crust.
Garnishes included good and sweet Bing cherries as well as warm, buttery and sweet brioche (topped with a little bit of salt).
The starter was very dessert-like, but it did have a strong foie gras flavor as well as foie gras' creaminess.
The brioche was a little oily.
I liked the dish, but I think it would work better as a dessert given its very sweet flavor.
http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=tuTEWuF9RJLCM0gO39PSEA&userid=w-w-k-QXosIKQ8HQVwU6IQ  Next came day boat scallops with good mushrooms, greens and braised oxtail.
I did like the garnishes.
The oxtail was very good--tender, juicy and meaty--though there was too little of it.
The scallops were just okay.
They just were not as soft, fresh or moist as I have had at other restaurants including Vegas spots like Picasso, Table 10 and Olives.
http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=-AmrCdNy2bPb4g30EVVeSQ&userid=w-w-k-QXosIKQ8HQVwU6IQ  I had the braised beef belly for my entree.
It was an okay tasting dish.
The garnishes were decent but not as good as what came with the scallops.
The best garnish with this beef dish was the tart pickled ramps, which was the only real flavor that stood out.
http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=7u38OgDbTux-a4MU7_N2dQ&userid=w-w-k-QXosIKQ8HQVwU6IQ  The beef belly was like ribs.
The beef belly had a good flavor and it was tender and juicy.
I did not like the unevenness of it with some meaty parts but also fatty parts that were not rendered down.
It could have just been the nature of this cut.
Dessert was an almond tart, which was really dense and thick with the texture of a butterscotch square.
It was dry and had no cake-like or cream-like consistency.
I did not like the core of this dessert though the garnishes of macerated berries and creamy, refreshing and fragrant lavender gelato were both good.
http://www.yelp.com/user_local_photos?select=W9-266MC8A3Rbr7hAIaKYQ&userid=w-w-k-QXosIKQ8HQVwU6IQ  A la carte prices were very high like other high-end Vegas restaurants with entrees in the $40s and $50s.
The pre fixe menu was not too bad of a deal given the variety of ingredients and generous portions.
Service was good.
The staff was attentive and the food came out at a quick pace.
Our server had a matter of fact manner (which I liked).
It was a little different from the service I have had at similar restaurants where servers tend to be very gracious and eager to please.
Even though she did not have that incredibly pleasant approach of those other places, she was still polite, professional and engaging.
Overall, the food at Sage was decent and properly cooked though not much about the meal stood out.
Though Vegas has a lot of fine dining and upscale restaurants, I actually find it quite hard to have a really great high-end meal in Vegas.
If you are looking for really good contemporary upscale cuisine, I recommend the more expensive L'atelier de Joel Robuchon in MGM Grand.
If quality of ingredients and good flavors are what you are seeking, I recommend the similarly priced though more formal and traditional Picasso (in the Bellagio) over Sage.
Aria, like most casinos on The Strip, offers both complimentary self and valet parking.

Food was 5 stars, dynamic and innovative  food, the sommelier was very knowledgable.
Service was 4 stars and nearly perfect.
Only complaint was having to sit at the table without water or a menu for a while.

My boyfriend and I came here for dinner.
We had the Signature Tasting Menu and it was a good amount of food.
We shared so we both had a little bit of everything on that menu.
Some highlights are the Foie gras brulee and the wagyu beef tartare.
We really liked the brûlée but I am glad that we shared because like the waiter said it is very rich.
The scallops were also notable.
I paid a little bit more for the wagyu sirloin but it was worth the money.
It wasn't the best wagyu I've ever had but it was good.
My boyfriend got the beef belly which he liked but I thought was okay.
I have to say that overall this is probably the best meal that I've ever had.
I liked or loved every plate.
The waiter was friendly and very helpful as well.
The food came out in the perfect amount of time, they give you a little time to rest before the next plate.
I was definitely full after the tasting which I was surprised about.
I wish that I had saved a little more room because the white hot chocolate drink they give you at the end of the dinner was sooo good.
The music is kind of loud but that's pretty much the only thing that I could think of that needs improvement.
We loved it here so give it a shot if you're ever in Vegas!

Let's face it, if you are going to Sage you know you plan on spending a decent amount of $, it shouldn't be a "shock" when your bill is over $100.
That being said, on our trip to Vegas in May for our first anniversary we decided to make a reservation at Sage for our anniversary dinner.
We were so glad we did as everything we ate was nothing short of stellar.
To start my meal i ordered the Confit Heirloom Beet salad.
The toasted dates and vinaigrette dressing complemented the beets so perfectly.
Every bite was full of flavors and different textures, delicious.
I ate every bite.
I was expecting the portion to be much smaller than it actually was, so I was pleasantly surprised when it arrived.
The complimentary amuse bouche was the best bite I have ever had.
I couldn't even tell you what it was, but it was delicious and I wanted more.
I ordered the Lobster Ravioli for dinner.
What a refreshing dish.
Not your typical ravioli dish filled with heavy cream making you feel like you have a rock in your stomach.
This was light with hints of lemon and sweet chunks of Maine Lobster.
I ate every last bite.
Service was top notch, our waiter was one of the best I have ever had.
Attentive and spot on with his suggestions.
We will be back for sure

Sage delivered the best meal I had while in Vegas, and that included trips to the Mesa Grill, CraftSteak, Sensi, and Emeril's.
The service was first rate, very attentive, and never overly intrusive.
The restaurant's interior was beautiful, and lounge-like.
And the food was excellent.
The corn soup with crab that I had was wonderful; the American Kobe Skirt steak was perfectly cooked, bursting with flavor, and surrounded by some absolutely delicious crispy avocado balls.
The Pineapple Mousse I had for dessert was beautifully plated and a great cap to the evening.

Best service.
Incredible food.
I ordered the oysters...unbelievably sweet and perfectly seasoned.
The beef tartare was delish...it had a couple shavings of chocolate which i didnt care for but it was still tasty.
And in my opinion its pretty hard to mess up beef tartare.
Let me tell you the scallop entree that was made into an appetizer for me was what really blew me away.
OMG!!!
The sauce and mushrooms were unbelievable.
I opted to not have the shredded oxtail on there and didnt even miss it.
Great wine list.
Fancy cocktail menu and creative way to display drinks and cheeses on an ipad with pics and all.
Bartenders were helpful and knowledgeable.
I will def go back!!

After a lot of research, we (brother, cousin, me) chose this as our fine dining restaurant of the trip.
The ambience is fantastic - dark, comfy seating, great decor.
Service was excellent.
When I didn't like the drink I ordered, the server let me taste something else before pouring.
Every course was explained and questions asked to the chef and answered (my brother is in culinary school and had a few questions).
The timing was perfect - not too fast or slow.
The food was amazing.
My brother and cousin ordered the 4 course tasting menu and I had the 6 course chef's menu.
We shared each course which was perfectly prepared, presented and sized.
They have an absinthe cart that we did not sample, but it looked interesting.
I would not hesitate to recommend this restaurant or eat there again the next time I'm in Las Vegas!

Amazing!
Located at Aria... One of the best experience we've had in fine dining.
The staff in this restaurant is very courteous and very attentive.
Ambiance is very intimate and sophisticated.
I little bit pricey, but it is worth it.
We tried the Kobe Skirt Steak and it was very delicious.
The meat was cooked right and it was well-seasoned.
Their selections of libations are also very impressive.
If you want to have a great night with your date, start at Sage.
It should be one of the places you should go to.

This was definitely up there with the top five dining experiences of my life.
Everything was absolutely perfect from beginning to end.
The hostess was friendly, and seated us promptly upon giving her our reservation details.
We loved our table, and really appreciated the generous spacing between tables in the dining area.
It's so nice to be able to sit down and enjoy the food, wine, and atmosphere that comes with great dining experiences, while not feeling as though you're in a crowded space.
My dinner companion and I both ordered the four course tasting menu with wine pairing.
The food was incredible.
The wines, too, were incredible, and paired so well with each dish.
We really found ourselves wowed by the experience from beginning to end.
As for service, the timing of each course was impeccable.
We were not rushed, nor did we ever wait extended times between courses.
All presets and wines for upcoming courses were brought at the appropriate times.
The server was extremely professional and knowledgeable with respect to any questions we had throughout.

Lots of great yelp reviews on this one and the concierge who confessed he was a foodie recommended this one.
I would have to say I agree with Anthony N's review on 6/11/13.
First, service was great and the sommelier was great.
We ordered the signature menu (4 courses, $99 with the foie gras creme brûlée).
Plus 2 bottles of California wine and tip came to $165 person).
My knock against Sage is the meal lacked passion!
Exception was the Foie Gras.
Everything else was over-sauced and our pork loin was overcooked.
The Day Scallops would have been a whole lot better if their delicate flavor was enhanced, rather than drowned by the sauce.
The chocolate/olive oil desert looked like it skidded off the plate, making eating a bit of conundrum.

Sheer perfection.
Scallops with oxtail, pork loin, Wagyu beef tartare (never thought I'd try), 48-hour beef belly, and dessert that includes olive oil!
My wife and I were having one unforgettable culinary experience after another.
Las Vegas has LOTS of top-notch restaurants so we always want to try new ones.
However, next time, we WILL be coming back to Sage!
Besides, we loved the hotel itself as well!

A top notch restaurant that was delicious from start to finish.
The people working there will literally give you the shirt off their back!
My wife was freezing and our excellent server offered the manager's cardigan to wear during dinner.
Who does that??
We went with Chef McClain's Signature Menu for $89.
No wine pairings because I am usually too buzzed at the end to appreciate the flavors.
I started with the "Wagyu Beef Tartare" with crushed caper aioli, slow poached egg and dark chocolate.
Chocolate and beef isn't a combo I am usually down with but it was a fun twist that totally worked.
I literally could've had this as my whole meal.
The buttered and grilled sourdough bread complimented it perfectly.
My wife got the "Foie Gras Brulee" which was wow, wow, wow.
It was such a creative dish and a wild mix of flavors upon first taste but it just got better and better after each bite.
It's ok to lick the dish, right?
This could have been a dessert and I wondered if the chef ever considered that.
I got the "Australian Wagyu Sirloin" for my main entree.
It was as tender as expected but I was ready to swap after having a bit of the 48 hour beef belly.
That was treeeeemendous and what I would go with had I done it all over again.
"Gianuja Pave" was my choice for dessert.
It's not often I get to try olive oil ice cream with basil jam.
That was a really excellent ending to the meal and kept up with the creativity of the experience.

Service was bad and unprofessional comments made by our waiter -  Manager called to apologize for our experience which was very nice but wont dine here again - Food was mediocre and portions are small - thankfully we got our meal charges refunded but still shouldnt have occured in the first place

Wonderful restaurant!
Another winner at Aria (we love Julian Serrano).
Not at all your typical Vegas restaurant - it is hushed and elegant, with superb food and very good service.
If you need refuge from the chaos which defines Vegas, you could do worse than slip into Sage for a meal.
After a weekend full of gluttony, we couldn't handle much more than a couple of appetizers, so we sampled the beef tartare, which was a very nicely done version of the classic; the grilled octopus, which wasn't bad but probably wasn't the strongest of our dishes; and the poached egg.
Okay, let me say something about the poached egg.
This thing is so good, we actually had to order a second one!
My mouth is watering just thinking about it!
It is a perfectly poached egg served over some sauteed potatoes and then topped with shaved biancetto truffles (spring truffles, sort of a cross between a white and a black truffle), and served with lovely toasted rustic bread.
When you crack the yolk, it forms this melange of tastes and textures, and when eaten on top of the bread, it is ... well it's sublime!
This dish alone is reason to head to Sage next trip to Vegas!

Located by registration and the neighboring crystals wing of the expansive Aria resort, this unassuming contemporary restaurant had me intrigued as soon as I stepped inside.
As we traversed through the dimly lit bar flanked with purple hued impressionist walled paintings that soared up to the high ceilings and into the main dining area, I couldn't help but be impressed by the sleek modern club-like feel of the space.
It was the perfect mix of contemporary cool with traditional elegance.
With chilled house music pulsating in the background, I did get an ultra lounge vibe from the restaurant, which was actually refreshing and relaxing.
We also didn't feel crammed next to our neighboring diners, which made things feel much more intimate and private.
Our server was full of friendly banter and made every effort to make us feel welcome.
We all went with the Signature Tasting Menu.
The wait staff knew that we were heading out to a show afterwards so they made sure our dishes came out at a good pace.
We were started with a tuna tartare amuse bouche that was just the right mouthful of tang & punch of flavor to whet our appetites.
The first courses were all very good.
From the fresh oysters to the beautifully prepared wagyu beef tartare to the exceptionally inventive foie gras brûlée.
The second courses were inspiring and enjoyable, as well.
The octopus was grilled to perfection and the dayboat scallops were easily the best I've ever had!
These thick golden medallions were beautifully seared on the outside locking in a fluffy and buttery flesh that left me in complete awe bite after bite.
Our third courses were also winners in my book.
The wagyu sirloin was mouthwatering and each tender bite was blissful.
The 48 hour braised beef was incredibly soft and you could tell it was cooked for awhile for all those rich, permeating flavors to develop.
Desserts were exquisite and what could be better than a surprise at the very end!
A shot of cinnamon hot white chocolate.
It was both warm comforting and festive.
An excellent end to an amazing meal.
I can't say enough about my wonderful experience here.
It's definitely one I'd gladly experience again and again.
Happy Eats!

I went to Sage for a tasting menu with my husband for his birthday last year, which is our tradition.
The tasting menu at Sage is, by far, the worst tasting menu I have ever had.
The service was fine, but the food was gross.
I can't speak to the regular menu, but definitely don't get the tasting menu.
Overpriced and disgusting.

Very impressed with the creativity, impeccable sear on the proteins, beautiful presentation, and bold favors... Plus, the portions are very generous for the price and service was surprisingly warm and friendly (I'm not sure what some people were complaining about... Just go to a buffet if you are looking for quantity over quality)  The wife and I got 2 signature tasting menus with the wine pairings (90 + 45 each; you can't beat that!
) Oysters w/ tequila blood orange mignonette - just the right amount of flavor as to not overpower the delicately sweet oysters Foie gras brûlée - the highlight of the dinner and a must have.
Make sure you let it melt in your mouth and then wash it down with the wine pairing.
Believe me, I fought to not lick the dish clean.
Octopus - I LOVE octopus, but this none fell a bit short.
Very tender, but the flavors seemed to fight each other and I ended up picking out the octopus to dip in the sauce of the next dish Scallops with braised oxtail and oyster mushrooms - this dish was up there with the foie gras for top dish of the night.
Unbelievable sear in the scallop and a succulent sauce with just enough mushrooms and oxtail.
Pork loin - solid dish.
A bit rich but the pork really was incredible Wagu sirloin - melts in your mouth and, again, an unbelievable sear that made you wonder how they possibly maintained a perfect med rare Olive oil ice cream with chocolate and raspberries - delicate ice cream and beautiful presentation.
Very good.
Blueberries with lavender ice cream - powerful lavender and beautifully macerated blueberries made for a truly unique dish.
Well done Sage - we will definitely be back!

Wow!
My fiance and I were staying at Aria and wanted a nice restaurant to go to that was close to home.
Sage, is where we ultimately landed and we could not be happier.
Now, the important stuff, first the service was amazing, very attentive and extremely knowledgeable in everything involved throughout the night.
The food: I cannot begin to tell you how pleased we were with the quality, flavors, selections.
We ordered the grilled spanish octopus for an appetizer, it was unbelievable how tender and tasty the meat was, first time having octopus outside of sushi and I cannot imagine every having it again anywhere else.
My fiance's Maine day boat scallops?
wow!
I'm from New England and I have never tasted such perfectly cooked scallops!
And at end of the night I had my first ever taste of absinthe which I recommend to anyone, first as a digestive aid(per our waiter and very accurate after eating all that amazing food) and secondly as just a really memorable experience as the process of actually creating the absinthe is indicative of the whole night of challenging the senses at Sage!

Ask for Bond!!!
He is the best in the business.
I have traveled around the world and go to a lot of restaurants and I have never had anyone better than Bond!!
He made our experience so magical and dreamy!!!
We love Bond!!!

Beautiful restaurant... We had a bit of a table conflict..
But in the end all turned out great... First the bar...
Friendly but not fake bar tenders.. Great music and atmosphere..
Ordered a bottle of Farniente ...my boyfriends favorite ... Then moved to dinner and stumbled across the 4 corse tasting menu..
Incredible mix of flavors ... We both ordered 4 courses and got to taste 8 ...
Perfect portions and food for your eyes and your soul.
This is a top notch Vegas restaurant!

Had quite the tasty meal here on my latest Vegas trip.
We did the $89 prix fix  which had 4 courses with great portions  Oysters or Steak Tartare - all good but Oysters were one of the best oysters I've ever had.
Perfectly dressed  Scallops or Calamari - Both delicious and perfectly cooked.
Pork Tenderloin or Beef - These were probably the most disappointing part of the meal.
Both were just "ok" but didn't stand out as much as the previous dishes  Chocolate something - don't remember but it was good with olive oil something....  Service was also great and very attentive.
Would recommend it!

Great food.
Nice upscale and exclusive vibe without being too stuffy.
Great bar too.

So I saw the foie gras (FG) creme brulee on a list of "must try' FG dishes in Vegas and being the FG-deprived CA girl that I am I simply had to try it.
;-)   This turned out to be an amazing deal of a meal!
My girlfriends and I chose to do the Signature tasting menu which was more than enough food, as I actually couldn't even finish all my food.
I still can't believe it was only $89 -- seemed super reasonable for the quality of food and caliber of service/ambiance.
Our server started out a little stuffy but eventually warmed up and turned out be very friendly in the end.
Make sure you order a cocktail here.
They have a great variety of fun and unique drinks.
We tried several all of which the names escape me but we really enjoyed them all.
Standout dishes included the the foie gras creme brulee (of course!
) -- it really was as delicious and decadent as everyone raves.
I also really enjoyed the Maine dayboat scallops and and the wagyu skirt steak -- upcharge on this one but worth it as it was very tender and flavorful.
My friend also really enjoyed her 48hour beef belly.
The Pave dessert here also wowed me, and I'm not one to be wowed by dessert.
It has to be one fo the best I've ever had at a fine dining restuarant and the olive oil ice cream was UNBELIEVABLE.
I loved every bite of it!
I'd come back here in a heartbeat and hope they don't become wise to the fact that they're one of the best deals in Vegas IMHO!
;-)

I was in Vegas last weekend for a bachelor party, and we decided that we'd dine at Sage for one of the nice dinners we were having.
Sage came as a recommendation by a friend who currently works as a chef in Vegas.
The overall ambiance was good, and I liked that it wasn't overcrowded by tables and rowdy diners, yet wasn't too stuffy and quiet that you can hear a pin drop.
We were definitely on the louder side, but that's what you get when you have nine guys drinking wine and scotch.
The $89 tasting menu is definitely a good deal, with plenty of viable options to choose from.
There were actually couple items on the tasting menu that was not available on the a la carte menu.
Unfortunately we had some friends who are rather picky eaters, and the tasting menu requires full table participation.
Sage also offers a 10 course chef's tasting menu.
Vancouver Island Kushi Oysters - we ordered a plate to share for the table and ended up getting another.
One of the best oysters I've had in a really long time.
The Kushi oysters were incredibly fresh with a hint of sweetness in each shell.
The mignonette served on the oyster is what really made this dish work.
I usually find mignonettes too overpowering with vinegar.
The aged tequila mignonette was undertoned and let you taste the natural sweetness of the oyster.
Grilled Spanish Octopus - this was the main starter that I ordered after contemplating getting the foie gras creme brulee.
Coming from LA, I really miss my foie.
But after talking to the waiter about how the foie was prepared, I wasn't really sold on it.
I'd much rather have a hearty piece of foie seared on a pan on a toast.
The octopus was cooked well but nothing was very memorable with it.
Snake River Farms New York Strip - not your typical dry aged steak from a steakhouse, but cooked to perfection and melted in my mouth.
I saw beef marrow on the list of ingredients so I was expecting a nice grilled beef marrow with a toast on the side, but I guess they put it in the sauce that they cover the meat in.
I wasn't a big fan of the sauce as I like to enjoy my meat the way it is, but it wasn't terrible.
The quality of the meat definitely made the dish work.
La ratte potatoes were also excellent.
May have been one of the smoothest mashed potatoes I've ever had.
Coconut Key Lime Float - I usually opt out of dessert and finish the meal with an espresso, but since everyone was getting something I felt compelled to order something as well.
The coconut key lime float was recommended by the waiter as I was looking for something that was not too sweet.
This ended up being the most creative and interesting dish of the night.
The entire dessert comes on a bed of ice and they pour shishito pepper foam over the coconut and the key lime sorbet.
The shishito pepper was foam was really interesting.
You wouldn't expect a very peppery taste profile would go well with dessert, but it cut the tartness of the key lime and added great flavor to the somewhat mild coconut.
Overall we had an excellent dinner and everyone left very satisfied.
One hiccup was that the restaurant overcharged us by $600.
They somehow messed up and included one of the other table's orders on our bill.
Good thing that I had caught it, if not some lucky table would have had a free meal on us.
It took the restaurant almost 20 minutes to sort everything out, which, in my mind, is entirely too long of a wait to fix a wrong.
No apologies were given either, which was very surprising.
Perhaps Aria could work on training their service staff a little more.

Whenever I visit Las Vegas (and that happens at least a couple of times a year, typically, if not more), I try and pick one restaurant that will be my 'splurge' for that particular visit.
This time around, my friend and I decided that we would try Sage based primarily on the contents of the four-course tasting menu ($89 plus $44 for generously poured wine pairings).
We were not disappointed by any stretch.
The beef tartare is a revelation--I didn't know that tartare could remind me so much of tuna, but it was melt-in-your-mouth stunning.
The scallop and oxtail was delicious, and the beef belly was terrific (and I don't even typically like belly cuts of pork or beef).
And the desserts are in a league of their own--it's hard to even describe the complexity of what we were served.
Suffice it to say, they were phenomenal.
I'm extremely pleased with our decision to come to Sage and I do hope that I can return.

This place in the new Aria hotel is nothing short of beautiful.
Great place if you want to do it classy in Vegas.
As the location should demand, the cocktails were impeccable.
In fact, the bartender wasn't satisfied with the first one he made for my partner (we still thought it was pretty good), so he made her a new one.
The wine list is similarly thoughtful.
The sommelier suggested perfect pairings for our meals.
The food itself is good, if not always up to the price point.
I love salmon, but was disappointed that it was the only fish option on the menu at the time.
It was certainly delicious, but I expected a little more creativity.
Whatever's fresh, I suppose.
My partner, on the other hand, absolutely loved the lamb.
Definitely a good place for a special occasion, but not that friendly if you're not in the mood for meat.

My meal I had here is in my top 5 meals I EVER had... yes, Gary Danko, Keiko's, French Laundry, Guy Savoy, and Joel Robuchon, someone has stepped in the arena and is a MAJOR player.
Service was a bit slow at the beginning and we were questioning if we made a mistake coming here, but then it got much better.
We had the signature menu $89/per person:  *Foie gras creme blulee:  Can you say nice and creamy like and a bit of sweetness like the combo of peanut butter and jelly.
Holy crap!
*Bison takaki: First time I had bison and from what I was told by friends is that it is a bit gamey.
Nope, not this.
Tender and melted like butta in my mouth.
*Heirloom tomato salad: It was a great follow up from the bison.
Light and tasty.
Sometimes people go overboard with the vinegar.
Not this.
Very smooth tasting.
*Wagyu beef tartar: This is another Holy Crap moment.
I thought this dish was going to be too heavy.
Nope.
The slow poached egg on top with the toasted bread... DELISH!
*Grilled Spanish octopus:  I rarely order octopus because 95% of most places over cook this.
Oh this place hit the mark!
Nice smokey flavor and has some "toothie-ness" but not chewy AT ALL.
*Dayboat scallops, braised oxtail, caramel reduction:  I was totally surprised that you get two huge scallops!
The sauce was to die for.
*Iberico pork loin: Ok... that should say it all.
Anything that is Iberico pork is heavenly.
*Beef belly: This was soooo tender and deep in flavor.
We jokingly said that all the dish was missing was white rice.
The waiter went next door to the other restaurant and got us a bowl.
Now that  is service!
*Gianduja pave (olive oil ice cream):  I wanted to pick up the plate and lick the whole thing.
They had two different breads: sourdough roll and a bacon roll.
If you're from the Bay Area skip the sourdough.
Nothing compares or comes close to our local stuff.
The bacon roll was tasty.
The couple next to us ordered the funnel cake.
It was sooooo tiny and they said it didn't taste as good as the ones you get at the ballpark or county fairs... cause probably this was a healthy version LOL!
I will DEFINITELY come back here.
EVERY single dish was a major hit.
I can't say that about Joel R.  I  know there are 16 dishes for JR, but none of the dishes was a Holy Crap moment.
I can also say that I never had a Holy Crap moment at Gary Danko's either.
Wow....
I can't believe I said that!
Can't beat the price, quantity and quality of food for $89!

New American at it's finest.
Combining globally sourced ingredients and flavors with classic American cuisine then trying to achieve the broadest range of taste results in incredible good eats.
It's all done without molecular gastronomy.
For starters, the wagyu beef tartare; great beef flavor and just the right accompaniments to balance the usual cloying fatty finish (pickled mustard seeds, capers, the usual coddled egg yolk, and CHOCOLATE).
The bitterness balanced the entire dish.
Not to be missed, the foie gras custard brulee; excellent.
Cherries for the requisite acidic sweetness, toasted cocoa nibs for bitterness and a twist, salted brioche.
Imaginative.
Finally, the roasted sweetbreads; stunning.
Bacon fat (from a thick cut piece of bacon) provides the seasoning to the airy sweetbreads they blend well with polenta and wafting umame of trumpet mushrooms.
Slightly one dimensional texturally but good eats for sure.
Salads are anything but common.
How about a heirloom tomato salad with smoked peaches and baby fennel accented by lemon pickled cucumber.
Vibrant acidity, complexity from the licorice fennel, sweet bitterness of the peaches.
Perfect.
For mains, the Iberico pork loin, cooked medium, tender with a pronounced heritage pork flavor.
It contrast well with a piece of crispy pork shoulder.
Served with a sweet, smoked date pure that makes the perfect accompaniment heightening the natural sweetness of the pork.
The 36 hour braised wagyu short rib, equally good.
One of the best braised short ribs I've had (the best being Craftsteak).
Served with an earthy horseradish potato pave and caramelized onions, glazed in its own braising liquid.
The braised beef, rich and melting the sides providing a sweet, earthy balance.
Excellent and efficient service.
The wine list remains excellent.
Vegas resort pricing.
Truly a foodies playground!

Nominee for best restaurant on the west coast, certainly most interesting food in Vegas.
Service, food, decor, are all tip top.

Way over priced for quality but that's Vegas.
Had to ask for the $59 early dinner menu (server seemed to "forget" they had one).
Corn soup was good, fish was an attempt to be creative but fell flat and dessert (pineapple something) was way too sweet and uninteresting.
Service was good, better restaurants for the price.
Chef seems to preoccupied.

This was the last place i ate before going back home in the morning.
I gotta say it was one of the best meals i had on this trip.
You walk in to this place and its a low lit ambiance, with refined decor.
Yes this place is on the pricey side but it well worth it, because not only the food was stellar,  but the service was just as great if not better.
I had the tasting menu which consisted of Chilled maine lobster, Foie Gras Brulee, Sea scallops, Herb-crusted Lamb Saddle, 48 hr braised beef belly, and to finish a Green apple Mousse.
Everything was done with love and care.
You can really taste the love they put into preparing all the dishes.
The Beef belly so so tender, almost like butter melting in your mouth.
Lamb saddle was very flavorful, with there herb crust enhancing the lamb flavor rather than covering up with gamey flavor.
My favorite dish though was the Foie Gras Brulee......
OMG!!!!!!
It was so rich and such a smooth texture.
If i died after that meal.... i would died a happy man.

First off, FOOD was EXCELLENT but the service was terrible and unnecessarily so.
We had called ahead to let them know that we were a little late for our reservation.
10 minutes and I believe the standard allowable is 15 min.
Arrived to be told that they gave our table away and that we would have to wait for it.
Told them that was not satisfactory, that we had called ahead and were told this would be no problem.
They said they would see what they could do.
We were okay with that because we had found a table in the bar and figured we could have a few drinks.
Waited almost 40 minutes and asked 3 times for a bar menu.
This waiter ( I assume) kind of wander by and finally gave us an Ipad with no explanation as to what to do with it.
Tried to use it and it didn't work.
The same waiter came back and took it away and never came back???
At 50 minutes in, we asked about our table again and they said "Oh that's right, come with me,"  I'm guessing they forgot we were waiting???
We finally get seated and immediately ask for our drinks.
We again, had this Ipad given to us that didn't work.
Now an hour in, we asked somebody to please just take our drink order and bring us something.
Maybe the desperate plea is what they were waiting for because I'm assuming our "waiter" finally came over and took our drink order.
It took a second request to "bring our drinks sometime...today" and a half hour before our drinks finally arrived.
They then took our order and at this point we felt trapped.
We were hungry but hated being there but our friends were jet lag and not up for hunting down another place and waiting more time to get food.
So we reluctantly placed our order.
The food again was excellent but took about 30 minutes to come out.
But the service for our table was the equivalent to being served at a Denny's.
Our tableware was practically thrown on our table and made clanking noises when placed.
When our food was served, it was shoved in front of us to the point that our food slid to the other side of the plate.
In total, we spent 3.5 hours there and only an hour of it eating.
2.5 was spent trying to get drinks, food...someone to acknowledge us?!?!
I hate writing these type of reviews because I feel like I'm whining but honestly it was this bad.
Not sure if this was an off night or new staff but it's unacceptable and I don't recommend dinner here.

Service was fine.
Nothing went horribly wrong, we paid him money and he brought us food and drinks.
A little slow and we didnt leave raving about the waiter but he served his purpose I guess.
Still for 60 tip you expect to want to come back.
The food is where I was sad.
I canceled reservations at le cirque to come here and it wasnt memorable.
After learning that the tasting menu was going to take too long (had a show to get to) I chose the tartar and the kampachi.
The amuse bouche was FANTASTIC and had us all excited.
The tartar neither of us finished and didnt find it to have a memorable signature  to make that particular dish unique to this chef.
Again the waiter didnt ask why we didnt finish, he was too busy.
Next was dinner.
The smokey sauce on the kampachi is SO STRONG.
Im sorry but that only belongs on a tasting menu.
I probably ate 1/3 of the dish and was sick of it.
I would say it was "just me" but my girlfriend poked around at her pork and didnt like it and my husband said his steak was "okay" but not worth $50.
Again the waiter didnt ask about sending full plates back to the kitchen.
Didnt have time for dessert bc the service was slowish.
Should have done j&gs or gone to another of the big restaurants.

HUGE disappointment!
Service was decent, food was below average (at best).
Veal was flavorless and hard to swallow, lobster dish was very close to awful with the oily and lukewarm pasta and orange segments that did not belong in the dish to begin with.
Expected such great things from this place and left with such regret about spending one of our nights in Vegas here.
Of all the great places to eat in the area - this is not the one to choose.
Only part that saved the meal was my Moscow Mule.

I was hesitant to try this spot since it's pretty steep in the pricing area, but I was very happy.
As far as service goes, we had no complaints ... at all.
We didn't have an appetizer because we were not starving, but I wish we were because it all looked good.
Bacon bread was yum!
I had the shortrib, and that was FANTASTIC!
My husband's steak was perfectly cooked and seasoned.
The dessert (olive oil ice cream with hazelnut ... forget name) was good too.
Love the decor and the ambiance; great wine list as well.

Great service, delicious food, nice ambiance....
When food like Sage's makes me moan with every bite,  it's a 5 star in my book.
Service was great, our waiter (wish I remembered his name) was nice and very attentive without being snooty.
I was impressed when he handed us an Ipad and a quick tutorial on how to view the drink menu on it.
Ok it takes little to impress me but still....  - Complimentary pre appetizer mango froth from the chef was light and tasty.
- Complimentary bacon bread and sourdough loaf with australian sea salt and butter- good but would have liked the bread to be warm.
- 36 hour wagyu braised short rib - flavorful, melts in your mouth short rib, heaven.
- The hubs had the $89 prix fix menu and chose the grilled oysters, Spanish octopus, Australian sirloin plus foie gras for 10 bucks extra and olive oil ice cream with hazelnut crunch and basil jam.
- all amazing.
Sage is one of your pricier restaurants but hey it's Vegas, gotta splurge at least once or twice when you're here.
I wouldn't say the ambiance is super fancy but it's nice and worthy enough to get dressed up for.
I did see guys in there wearing jeans and a t-shirt, which I thought was kind of meh but just fyi if you were wondering about the attire.

A wonderful dining experience - great cocktails and an absolutely delicious meal.
Would highly recommend their scallops!

I didn't realize how talked-up the foie gras brulee happened to be until I came to yelp to review the restaurant.
Honestly, if you look at the price tag and decide that this place is perhaps a bit out of your reach, spend a more reasonable amount just to have the foie gras brulee.
However, if you're seeking to enjoy a spectacular festival of taste at a venue with stellar ambiance and service and don't mind the price tag, pull up a chair.
I came for a work outing.
We had the big eye tuna sashimi and the brulee for appetizers, three rounds of medium wagyu skirt steak, and three desserts which seem no longer to be on the menu.
To the desserts: I can't recall anything other than to say that my own choice was a primarily chocolate-centric treat, whereas the second dessert composition had been arranged entirely from items not intended to be used as dessert components (cucumber, for instance) and was itself therefore quite notable, and the third item was not consumed by myself and ergo not memorable to me personally.
Two of us also exercised absinthe options to begin a traditional Vegas outing, but I'm the odd one out in that I personally don't drink, so I can't attest to that adventure.
I'll be brief in stating that literally every single item consumed by myself at that table was the best it could possibly have been, and that my own experience overall at Sage decimated any possible perception my mind had previously held about the concept of an excellent restaurant.
Yeah, I'm probably lavishing too much praise, but that's how I feel about it.
Now, going more in-depth in describing my experience would necessitate a significant increase in my enslavement and ensuing abuse of wild adverbs.
If I had to describe just how wowed I was by the experience, I'd struggle to precisely define just how my taste buds registered what exactly I had consumed.
The complexity in flavors and textures rendered me capable of appreciating the individual ingredients, their respective preparations, and the resulting whimsical delight with each taste which my own mind struggled to tame.
The crispy avocado in the skirt steak preparation, for instance, complimented the delicate tenderness of the steak by introducing the slightest tart and crunch to each bite, and the radish shavings freshened the palate immediately following consumption.
The portions were about what one could have expected from what was effectively an experience in flavored art, meaning that it would have been unfair for me to have entered with the belief that a Cheesecake Factory-esque helping of food would have been delivered to my table.
In spite of this, the process of truly experiencing every morsel of what I had consumed made the entire meal not only the most tasteful in memory, but also the most adequately filling.
I admit that this is perhaps the most politely colorful language I've employed in any review thus far in my limited history as a yelper and likely in any review to follow for a good while.
I stand by it, and we intend likewise to visit Sage as regularly as one can visit a top tier restaurant off the strip when living on the other side of the country.
Addressing the bill: If you have a room credit on your room, go ahead and use it.
It'll adjust the sticker shock you'll feel once your next credit card statement hits.
Shows are great, but this is by far a more memorable experience than any of the dozens of shows on the strip.

Best experience of our trip.
Similar to others experience.
Food ambiance and service were top notch.

You ever walk into a bar for the first time and say to yourself, " Oh, I'll be back here again...maybe tomorrow night..." ?
That.
And that was before we even ate the food.
Our charming and expert bartender Aaron was fun to watch, solicitous about our likes and dislikes, cocksure in his mixing and his opinions, and who skilfully entertained us while also leaving us to our conversation.
The modified classic cocktail menu was fun to peruse and the Last Word cocktail I had was gorgeous, complex and sent me to dinner with a lovely little hum in my head....
I read about the foie gras Creme brûlée and it seemed like a must-have, but I had hesitations.
I don't like whimsical food, nor do I like food that tries to emulate something opposite (for instance, a dessert out of meat.
)   Aaron strongly recommended it though,  as did our server James (more on him later).
What the hell, I was game....  Rather than rhapsodize about it here, read the other poetic odes contained in these reviews, and they are accurate.
I would like to add though that it is NOT whimsical food.
It is not a play on dessert.
It is an appropriate and accurate expression of the aspects that make foie gras beautiful, the texture and delicate flavor and the mouth feel.
Yum.
Aaron told me to order one to share  but I ate more than my half, and wanted more.
My girlfriend and I weren't hungry enough to order the tasting menu, so we picked two appetizers and split an entree.
I will return another time for the tasting menu, properly hungry.
The poached egg was a great example of what a skilled chef can do with a few perfect ingredients.
Shellfish and sweetbreads were not going to pass the lips of my dinner mate, so James, our attentive, funny server steered us to the Iberico pork loin which was perfectly prepared.
The amuse bouche was tar tare (bright and delicate) and the chef sent out a beautiful tiny hot chocolate with coconut to end our meal.
We skipped dessert and went back to Aaron, guessing correctly that asking him to make us something alcoholic and dessert-y would be a task he was up to...he didn't tell us a name for it, but it was chocolate, cold, foamy and perfect.
I haven't mentioned the bread, the wine, the sommelier, the beautiful decor in the dining room that is simultaneously hip and comfortable, the  pace at which the food came to the table, etc., all very good.
I left Sage wanting more.
(And yes, I came back the next night for more.

The food we received clearly showed masterful techniques and was done with the finest ingredients with a touch of molecular gastronomy thrown in as well.
They offer you rolls one is studded with bacon and the other is a French loaf along with real herbed creamy butter and a special salt.
Next comes an amuse bouche ours was a raw salmon that went down fast.
The sashimi dish featured melon like I never tasted before I think they were compressed and delicious, very sweet with an almost crisp texture.
I thought this plate looked stunning and part of the look were those buttermilk caviar beads.
The beads did add a texture and had were there for attractiveness but for me they seemed strange but I still thought this was a good dish.
I admit I'm not the biggest fan of molecular gastronomy.
We are suckers for truffle so we tried the slow poached farm egg.
It came out all foamy and you had to break the egg yolk and smear it on the nicely seasoned toast they give you.
I thought the flavor was spot on and really great but the texture of the white foam was odd and little like raw egg white to me.
I thought the Oro King Salmon was OUTSTANDING.
The fish seemed carefully sous vided and then seared.
It truly melted in your mouth like butter.
The marinated fancy tomatoes were flavorful and sweet.
I enjoyed the carefully seasoned yellow squash that was cut into linguini noodle shapes.
I didn't recognize the eggplant in the dish but it must have been the sage laced sauce on my plate.
I was pleasantly surprised by the tasty use of snow pea tops in this dish.
This dinner would have been better on a smaller plate because it was almost lost on the very large plate they put it on.
Wagu Short Rib was a winner.
We tried the corn dessert.
It was very unusual and lacked sweetness.
Then we received an amuse bouche of hot white chocolate coffee.
Service was efficient and kind.

I'd probably give this restaurant 3.5 stars if it were an option, but since it isn't, I am giving it 3 stars due some of the factors below.
The ambience is great, and the price of the tasting menu was very reasonable.
The food was pretty good, and I'm glad I tried it, but I think there are better places in Vegas.
The foie creme brulee was disappointing for me.
I love foie, and I love creme brulee, but I didn't think the foie came through enough for me.
I would have rather just ordered seared foie instead (I think that should be an option in addition to the brulee).
The meat dishes were well prepared but again nothing I really even remember one month later now that I'm posting this review.
And our server wasn't very friendly for 75% of our dining experience.
During the last 25% he got friendlier, as we got closer to tip time, but he seemed a little condescending before that.
In summary, food quality would yield 3.75 stars, service would yield 2 stars, and price would yield 4 stars, for an average of 3.25 stars.
Who knew I would be doing some math for a yelp review?!

I've tried several high-end dining choices The Strip offers, but I always come back to Sage whenever I want amazing food (and when my wallet can handle it).
I've always gone for the Signature Menu (~$89) with four courses.
Food: Amazing.
Portion sizes are just enough to make you happy full, not Olive Garden full.
Every bite has a plethora of different textures and tastes that complement each other -- I felt like I was commentating the Food Channel when I ate here with the bf.
And not only that, it was different -- the tastes, and textures were completely things you have yet to try.
Party in my mouth, indeed.
From the complimentary plates (comes with every meal) to the bread to the dessert, I cannot rave enough about this place.
Service: Excellent.
Informative, on hand when you need them, and always concerned with how we liked our meal.
Ambiance: It's not the place where it's so quiet, you'll want to whisper, but it's definitely a more trendy type of crowd.
If I can be nitpicky, the tables for two were too long for a normal conversation as we had to shout over the table distance as well as over the music.
Although most of the dinner was eaten in silence, we both knew our palates were in heaven.
Drinks are Vegas prices ($$$) and well made, but nothing to rush for.
If you could do it, find a nice bottle of wine instead.
(The list is pretty expensive, though -- cheapest probably started at ~$50) Overall, a nice dinner for locals.

My husband and I always go on a food crawl whenever we go to Vegas.
There are many great restaurants and we have tried some each time we go.
This was a complimentary meal given to us by management.
So let me get started.
Ambiance: The lighting and the layout of the restaurant is beautiful and very romantic.
There is enough room between diners so that you aren't on top of the next party of diners.
My only criticism was the music.
A bit too loud and not my favorite or suitable for a nice dinner.
Seems all the restaurants want to be trendy here.
Service: The service was excellent and we never felt like they were hovering over us or like we were being ignored.
Very friendly and willing to make us happy.
Bar: All sorts of great concoctions at competitive Strip pricing.
They have an incredible absinthe selection!
The drinks and bartender were superb.
Food: Don't know where to start it was all SO delicious.
Rolls studded with bacon and crunchy on the outside.
I could eat dozens of these with herb butter.
Next, complimentary Amuse Bouché which was a yellow fin sashimi with sauce & scallions (one small bite) to get the juices going!
Appetizers :WAGYU BEEF TARTARE Absolutely incredible served with buttery  toasted brioche CHARRED SASHIMI OF BIG EYE TUNA Not as good as the tartare but a worthy sashimi dish Dinner: MAINE LOBSTER MEZZALUNAS really good with just enough sauce and great lobster flavor SNAKE RIVER FARMS NEW YORK STRIP by far the BEST steak I ever ate!
Really, it was a very nice sized steak and cooked to perfection.
Wine reduction for the sauce and marrow delicious Dessert:GIANDUJA PAVE which is:Hazelnut Crunch/Pomegranate/Olive Oil Ice Cream/Basil I have never tasted anything like this.
It was heaven During the course of the meal they brought us a thyme infused hot chocolate after our dinner.
It was the size of a shot.
It was so good!
Portions on the food are generous and enough to fill you up.
Great wines by the glass here folks and an impressive wine list.
This dinner will set you back $200 before the tip for two but well worth it.
Wines are from $50 to $1000 a bottle so if you want a bottle of wine, plan on spending some money.
One of the best meals I ever had!
We will be back!

This is now the second time we have been here, and both times we had great meals.
After having been to many other high-end restaurants, I think this place offers incredibly good value as compared to some of the rest.
Sadly, I don't remember what I had the first time about a year ago, but I did remember having a very good meal.
Last night's experience with the 4-course signature menu was very good.
We did not choose the 7-course signature menu because the whole table would had have to have it.
The lineup was as follows:  Fois gras brûlée: very interesting concept and tasty.
Basically creme brûlée made with fois gras.
Worth trying once for the extra $10, but probably not worthwhile every time, as the Waygu beef tartar was also very good  Scallops: prepared well with ox tail  Pork loin - this is where the money was.
After I took the first bite, I had to ask the waiter what I was eating because it was SO incredibly good.
The loin itself was good, but they did a second part of it minced and seasoned with mostly pork shoulder, at least according to the waiter.
It was unlike anything I have ever eaten.
It would have been awesome if the whole dish was made out of that!!
Layered chocolate cake with coffee ice cream: I remember using a different two-word term starting with a G (ganache?
) but can't recall exactly, but wow it was heavenly.
It appeared as a small bar, but it was densely rich an incredibly decadent.
The coffee ice cream with cocoa shavings was also very good.
Overall, a very good meal, and excellent value for the price.
The Tea Rose cocktail was also very good.
Last but not least, the ambiance was also well done.
Our party of 8 was located in the smack middle of the filled dining room, yet we felt we can have private conversations without being overheard.
We can tell it's very happening all around us, but we didn't have to talk loudly to be heard.
I will definitely be back.
It has become a favorite place of mine.

Sage at the Aria is (so far) my favorite restaurant in Vegas.
My dining partner (A.P.
)and I decided to order the four-course Signature Menu.
Each course came with two or three choices.
A.P.
and I strategically ordered different items for each course, so we ended up sampling a total of eight dishes.
For the 1st course, A.P.
ordered the Vancouver Island Kushi Oysters - fresh and succulent, with a hint of the sea.
I opted for the Wagyu Beef Tartare, which came topped with a slow-poached quail egg and a few crispy chocolate ribbons - clean-tasting and nicely chilled.
A great way to start off the meal.
The 2nd course was even better.
A.P.
chose the Maine Dayboat Scallops, which were served atop a bed of braised oxtail and wild mushrooms - the plump and sweet scallops contrasted beautifully with the rustic oxtail and mushrooms.
I ordered the Grilled Spanish Octopus, with charred leaks and shishito peppers - the tentacles were so tender that I could cut the pieces with my fork.
The 3rd course was not really an entrée course, as the portions were small.
A.P.
and I shared the Iberico Pork Loin, a few half-dollar sized slices accompanied with roasted pork bread pudding, heirloom tomato jam, and braised chard, as well as the 48-Hour Beef Belly on sweet corn puree.
Outstanding!
The pork loin, in particular, was prepared to perfection.
For our 4th course -- the desserts - we shared the Gianduja Pave, an amazingly smooth and pleasing olive oil ice cream and hazelnut crunch, and the Marcona Almond Tart, with blueberries, whipped Mt.
Tam cheese, and a soul-soothing lavender gelato.
What a wonderful and unique way to end a fabulous meal.
The wine pairings were exquisite (kudos to the sommelier).
The only negative was the relatively slow service on that especially and perhaps unexpectedly busy Tuesday night.
Nevertheless, in my book Aria is a five-star restaurant.

We were all excited about having our only all together bachelor party dinner here.
You are dealing with at least 3-4 big foodies among the group so anticipation and expectations were high given the 4.5 stars overall.
Service:  Pretty good.
It was a group of 11 and given large group sizes, in general are harder to deal with which I understand.
The hostesses were accommodating when our group sizes kept fluctuating from 10 to 14.
Our waiter even managed to skillfully pour one bottle of wine evenly for all 11 of us as we were limiting drinks since we were hurting from partying the night before :)  In addition, one person was a vegetarian and they made him his own meal which I really appreciated.
Food:  We mostly ordered the signature menu.
There was generally a disappointed feel to the food with the following thoughts: - Amuse:  kanpachi krudo - disappointing ... was a bit on dry side so should've used a fattier piece or add some oils etc.
Flavors of ingredients didnt really come out.
- wagyu beef tartare - very very good - 2 diver scallops with braised oxtail - good and tender but didn't see or really taste much oxtail.
Hard to ruin fresh scallops unless overcooked or unseasoned.
- Octopus:  decent mix of flavors but not really memorable.
Not rubbery but it shouldn't be at a nice restaurant.
- Short ribs:  very good but portions were small.
- Iberico Pork Loin:  Flavor was only okay.
Nothing amazing.
This  was ridiculously disappointing after the waiter recommended it and 4-5 of us got this.
We each had EITHER, 2 or 3 thin (why the inconsistency) medallion slices probably 2 inches in length and one other piece that was a bit bigger with more of a crispy texture.
For a "main" (3rd course out of 4), the diver scallops were bigger than this.
I am seriously NOT a portion person as I am often amazed at portion sizes in the US, but this was ridiculous and left all of us hungry.
- Wagyu Sirloin - this was well proportioned (as the Pork ordering people felt jealous) but nothing overly interesting.
48 hour beef belly - curious to try since most have never heard of this but nothing mind blowing.
- desserts:  there were 2 main ones we ordered a chocolate mousse (good) and another one I forgot the name of which basically was expensive popcorn.
- Vegetarian meal:  I dont have details but this was well enjoyed and felt like a personal touch since there were no vegetarian dishes on the menu really.
Again, overall service was good.
But more than half of us leaving hungry (some people wanted to  get a hot dog after) and that's a tough result considering the food was okay at best.
When one of us asked about food portions and we are still hungry, the waiter shrugged his shoulders in a 'there's nothing I can do about it' way.
I cannot recommend a return  to this place.
Pretty big disappointment overall.

I think my expectations were too high.
This was not a bad experience by any means, but I have had better meals at some of the other high end restaurants in Vegas.
I treated a friend for their birthday and we opted for the early evening dinner three course menu ($59 pp) with wine pairing ($29 pp).
The restaurant is classy and beautiful with plenty of quite and intimate space.
Our server was attentive, but overbearing at certain points.
Overall, I think he did a great job, so I won't really nitpick there.
We started off with an amuse-bouche consisting of kampachi and mango.
The texture and flavor was incredible.
I started off with a chilled sweet corn soup while the other party opted for a fresh vegetable medley.
I absolutely devoured my soup, it was perfect.
Her veggies were completely unoriginal, they tasted fresh, but that is about it.
There was no interesting spin or vinaigrette to accompany the meal.
As my entree I opted for the Pacific Yellowtail Kampachi with chanterelle mushrooms, bacon, manila clams and black grapes.
The fish was not cooked evenly, but the overall flavors worked superbly together.
The other party opted for the flat iron steak which ended up being $10 extra on top of the tasting menu price.
It was a generous serving of protein that was cooked perfectly.
The final course was the dessert, and that was heavenly.
It was a caramelized pineapple mousse with all sorts of other goodies added to it.
To acknowledge her birthday, it came with a single candle that I though was a nice touch.
Overall it was an enjoyable, yet not a mind blowing meal.
Especially for $250 with tip.

Enjoyed a top-5 dining experience in Vegas at Sage in the Aria.
Right up there with Bar Masa in terms of service, quality/freshness of food, and innovation.
Had the 4 course tasting menu and every course was excellent.
The oysters, octopus, and the peach cobbler dessert was one of the best i've ever had.
Highly recommended for an excellent (and expensive) dining experience.

The shortribs were amazing, yet left me hungry.
The wine list was expansive with "Las Vegas" pricing (2x the price of any other list elsewhere).
Service was outstanding.
A wonderful restaurant, just don't expect to see Americanized portions, not that any of us really need that much food.

My second time eating here.
While I love the flavors and fusions of food that I'd never expect to go together, tonight the service was too lax.
It was downright cold in the restaurant--I am rarely cold, so others much have been freezing, which exaggerated the lax service.
I was in a hurry to eat and leave because of the discomfort.
It was a $70 meal for one, and while delicious, the service and temperature both brought the experience down.
Til tonight, this was my favorite Vegas restaurant.
Overall, delicious food in an upscale modern atmosphere.
The short ribs are delicious and foie gras a nice mix of sweet and gamey.

I read great things about Sage and since we were staying at Aria, it was easy to make it there.
Our waiter, John, was great; he was knowledgeable and patient.
We ordered the beef tartare, foie gras creme brulee appetizers and the scallop main dish; all of this to share between two people.
Everything was amazing quality and taste.
Beef tartare is a staple in France and while it's hard to imagine eating raw ground beef, the seasoning, unsweetened chocolate flakes, herbs, and the egg yolk mixed together makes it so delicious.
It also helps that the beef is from a Wagyu cow.
The foie gras was unique; shavings of foie gras were placed atop a layer of creme brulee and topped with cherries.
The taste was both sweet and rich; a great combination.
The scallops were expertly cooked and tasted great with the vegetable and braised oxtail shreds.
The chef gave diners a complimentary taste of lamb tartare (first time eating raw lamb and it was good) and a shot of truffle milk (wow).
Our taste buds were singing after this meal; it was a great first dinner of our Vegas stay.

I was wavering between 4 and 5 but the friendly staff pushed me to 5.
Solid 41/2!!
Upon arriving, every server we passed welcomed us.
Waiter was very professional and helpful.
Stressed us relaxing and enjoying out meal and managed our courses well.
Holding off on dessert so we could enjoy our wine.
Did 4-course price fixed menu.
Amuse was exactly what it should be- a perfect little bite.
Oyster were wonderful.
Scallops with ox tail was a little surf and turf sensation.
My husband had the pork which was very good.
I went with the beef belly which was good but quite rich.
Dessert were not too sweet-- which I like, especially after rich beef belly.
Complementary hot almond, vanilla, honey drink was nice finish.
Again, all staff wishing us good night on way out.
Good price for tasting menu.
Wine pairing was a little too pricey .. Waiter recommended to go with bottle if wine and sent over sommelier.
Would recommend and return!

We were there just because of Restaurant Week.
It looked like a bar when we looked from outside but you can't see the dining area.
It was less busy than what I expect (when I compare to the Dine Out Vancouver).
Our server did not offer the Restaurant Week menu until we asked for it.
It happened to the other tables too.
amuse bouche (Duck tartare with cream cheese and pickled grape) 3.5/5 - better than my expectation.
First time to try duck tartare but I liked it.
The picked grape was good too.
GRILLED SUMMER PLUMS 4.5/5 - The plums/peach/apricots were sweet.
Crunchy bacon (more like bacon or pork fat than pork belly to me).
Totally mixed well with the pecans  MAINE DIVER SEA SCALLOPS 4.5/5 - 3 giant scallops.
They were gigantic and well (under)cooked.
Seared with rare inside.
BRAISED BEEF SHANK 3/5 - too small when we compare to the Scallops.
4oz at most?!
COCONUT AND KEY LIME FLOAT 3/5 - They pour the foamed soda in front of you.
The lime soda was too sour.
I didn't find that they were matched.
FUNNEL CAKE 4/5 - reminded me of the Chinese egg/bubble waffle.
Not too sweet.
Came with vanilla ice-cream.
Hot chocolate soup with cayenne pepper 4/5 - complementary!
It was too sweet for me but the others really enjoyed it.
There was a kick when you get to the bottom.
Dining on the Strip has at least 50% markup.
We were only because of the $50 special.
We would have picked the $89 tasting menu without the Restaurant Week (more likely we wouldn't have come).
It was okay but not good enough for me to come back any time soon.

Restaurant Week was cut short for us this time, because I was traveling to Chicago.
We snuck in one more dinner beforehand at Sage.
It is also one of our favorite restaurants so we knew it would not disappoint.
Sage is great on many levels, but one thing that sets it apart from others is its beer menu.
They always have a great selection and a few rare choices on draft.
One day, I'm determined to come hungry enough to try the tasting menu with beer pairings.
On this day, though, the husband had a German beer, Schneider Weisse, and I had St. Feuillien Saison from Belgium.
Both were delicious!
Already off to great start, we welcomed the choice of bacon or baguette rolls.
The baguette is my favorite.
And we were brought an amuse bouche of lamb tartare.
Yum!
What a scrumptious little bite.
While we intended to both choose items from the Restaurant Week menu, the husband opted to order off the menu so he could enjoy some favorites.
My three courses for $50.13 included Chilled Sweet Corn Soup, Sea Scallops and Funnel Cake.
He ordered Sweetbreads ($17) and the NY Strip Steak ($54).
The soup was silky and smooth with chunks of delicate Dungeness crab.
Huitlacoche was also part of this dish.
It's not something I was familiar with, which is part of the fun at Sage.
It always introduces me to something new.
It's fungus that grows on corn, it's not common in the US, but in Mexico it is treated like a delicacy.
Like we would consider truffles to be.
His sweetbreads were amazing, just like the first time we had them at Sage for my birthday dinner.
I was fortunate that he shared.
He must love me.
His steak was beautifully prepared; a perfect medium-rare and it was piled high with mushrooms.
Accompanied with a side buttery mashed potatoes.
My scallops had a lovely sear and on the side was a lovely medley with sweetness from grapes, smoky saltiness from the bacon and the earthiness of the chanterelles.
We wrapped up this outstanding meal with funnel cake laced with strawberries and malted ice cream.
It was a fantastic version of the carnival classic.
Service was once again exceptional.
They do it right at Sage.
I hope it stays put for a good long time.

I had a spectacular experience.
it's one of the few restaurants I visited during restaurant week that I would actually go back to.
I'm definitely going back there to try their tasting menu.
8 courses of amazing food?
Yes please.
We started off with cocktails while we waited for our table to finish being ready.
They serve moscow mules there, which is one of my favorite cocktails.
It was pretty decent pricing for being on the strip ($17).
Like I said earlier, when I went I was there for restaurant week.
Everything I had was great.
They even gave us a free amuse-bouche and a free little dessert drink.
We also ordered the beef tartar in addition to the pre fixe.
I'm pretty sure we ate it all within a couple minutes.
I'll update this as soon as i go back and try the tasting menu.
I'm not sure if the food offered during restaurant week is on their regular menu - so I don't want to dive too far into that.
But, the food was all good enough to make me want to go back and try their regular items.

Really excellent from the food to the service.
The foie gras brûlée is as good as everyone says.
Highly recommended!

Don't understand why the ratings for this place are so high!
We had dinner at Sage while we were in Vegas a few weeks ago and I was really looking forward to eating here.
Overall, the experience was pretty disappointing: the dishes were all on the really salty side and the service was just not there.
The ambiance and decor was nice but I seriously didn't understand the big deal about the food.
Due to time constraint the 3 of us only took the smaller set menu.
I really wanted to try their foie gras creme brûlée because the description of the dish seemed amazing but it was actually very disappointing.
I don't think that Sage is really worth spending time and money at, there are so many amazing restaurants in Vegas that i'd rather go to!

We went here for the August Restaurant Week tasting menu, pretty much expecting the food/decor/drinks to be amazing.
And they were.
Between the two of us, we had every choice on the menu, and every single item was ridiculously, platonic ideally, good.
Perfectly cooked scallops, roast beef so tender and flavorful it didn't require chewing, beautifully balanced cocktails, and deserts that made us grin from ear to ear.
What we weren't really expecting was the staff to be as awesome to us as they were.
And they were great.
We're definitely not the normal economic bracket there, and it was a dinner we'd saved up for.
On the rare occasions we get to go somewhere as out of our usual box as Sage, we've definitely gotten the 'oh, you don't want a $200 bottle of wine, peasant?
" sneer down the nose before.
That was not the case here.
Every single person we ran into, from the hostesses, to our main server, to the water and bread guys were friendly, real human beings, who genuinely seemed happy we were enjoying our meal.
They didn't pester, hover, judge, but they knew their stuff and were very friendly and helpful.
Everything I had hoped for in a "rare treat" of a dinner and more, I loved the experience here.
This place is what 5 star dining is all about for me.
On top of that, we got a neat "amuse bouche" (I'm spelling that wrong but I don't care and extra mini-desert that were just a bite, and not included on the menu, but were still wonderful and fun.
Thanks Sage, you guys rock

Yummy bone marrow, and oysters.
Nice classy place, and great service.

BEST KEPT SECRET.
I'm so glad I came here before all the hype, because seriously, michelin star/top chef/celebrity chef type restaurants are a dime a dozen in vegas.
Tucked in the Aria hotel, is this amazing restaurant.
I knew it from the bread.
When they offer you a biscuit, you take it, regardless of if you're going carb free or not.
Had the signature tasting menu and everything was amazing.
We also ordered the oysters which were SO fresh and delicious, but so expensive (this was in addition to the tasting menu since we orderd the foie gras supplement), they disappeared fast.
The waygu beef tartare was very good, especially since we both aren't fans of raw beef generally.
Dessert is usually my favorite but I didn't enjoy the olive oil ice cream too much, was weird for me.
Overall a great experience.
All in all, everything was great, the service was not stuffy at all and they made it very welcoming, because let's face it, not everyone is a gazillionaire in Vegas and some of us normal people just want to eat good food too.
Sage, I was weary to give you a high rating, because I don't want you to get too popular for me!

We went to celebrate the engagement of our friends.
We were blown away!
Delicious menu, drinks, and excellent top notch service.
Our waiter was really a great waiter.
Attentive, knowledgeable, and hilarious!
Our dinner was absolutely charming and we look forward to coming back.
The food...
So good.

enjoyed dinner tonight at sage.
as always, prior to going to a new restaurant, I checked yelp reviews to see what to expect.
of the few lukewarm reviews, the biggest complaint was that the dishes were too salty.
i found the seasoning on all of my dishes was fine.
in fact, i will typically call out a restaurant for being too timid on seasoning dishes.
i want flavor and that's what sage delivers.
we started with complimentary bacon bread and French bread with murry river salt.
both were excellent.
the amuse bouche was a fennel sausage with crème fresh.
it was refrigerator cold (on purpose) but tasty nonetheless.
first course was beef tartar.
rich and delicious with plenty of toast.
i also tried the oysters which were mild and fresh.
next course was roasted octopus with potatoes.
it was ok.  not enough acid and the potatoes seemed too heavy for the dish.
i also tried the diver scallops with rabe and oxtail.
outstanding and perhaps the most successful dish of the night.
tor the main course i had the pork medallions with crispy pork shoulder.
the crispy pork shoulder was fantastic.
the loins were small and not very interesting.
the spinach got lost in the big flavors of the dish.
dessert was a caramel something with gelato and some crunchy stuff.
very good.
nice tap beer and wine by the glass selection.
service was impeccable.

After reading some of the glowing reviews about Sage, some of my fellow Yelpers and I decided to give it a try.
We had reservations for 7:00pm and our table was ready on time.
Our server was attentive and after perusing the menu we decided to order selections from the four course Signature Menu.
After we ordered, a server brought us an herb butter with some sea salt and we had a choice of either a french roll or a bacon bread.
The french roll was average, but the bacon bread was very good as was the butter, and the salt was a nice touch to give just that extra bit of flavor to the bread and butter.
For our first course we tried the beet salad and the oysters.
Both selections were very good.
The oysters were small, fresh, and served with a spicy sauce, but were not extraordinary.
The beet salad was very good and I wished I could have had more of it.
For our second course some of us had the  scallops and some of us had the octopus.
The two scallops were delicious and the octopus I was told was also very good.
For our main courses we ordered the Wagyu beef, the beef belly and the Iberico pork.
All  were good, but the portions were incredibly small, more like an appetizer portion than an entree portion.
The Iberico pork tasted very much like Canadian bacon and consisted of two quarter size slices which were about 1/8" thick.
This is not an exaggeration.
The two tiny medallions of pork were served along with some pulled pork that was the size and shape of a one inch cube.
The beef belly portion was a little smaller than a deck of cards and the Wagyu Beef, which was a bit greasy, probably weighed 2 ounces.
For dessert, we ordered the olive oil ice cream with hazelnut crunch and the rhubarb tart.
Both desserts were delicious, but were again very small portions.
The olive oil ice cream was about the size of  one tablespoon.
The service was average with the waiters not knowing who ordered what and the pace of the courses was not well timed as we waited a very long time between the first and second course while  the third course arriving very quickly after the second.
I thought I would have a problem finishing a four course dinner, but the portions of the food were so small that I had no problem finishing them.
My fellow diners said if they had not pigged out on the bread, they probably would have left hungry.
Overall the food was very good and the service was average.
The value for the money was ok, as even though the portions were incredibly small, the four course Signature menu was only $89.00 per person.
(Add $15 for the Wagyu beef entree).
The atmosphere of the restaurant was modern and elegant and very conducive to good conversation as there was no loud music and tables were spaced well apart from each other.
I would recommend to give this restaurant a try if you are looking for good upscale food at a relatively reasonable price.

First things first... Best salt I've ever tasted!
They bring freshly baked rolls, herb butter, and salt to your table.
Get one of each roll if you can.
So yummy!
We ordered the poached egg worth truffles for an appetizer and they were not stingy on the truffles.
The egg was perfectly poached and the toast just melted in your mouth!
For entrees we ordered the veal cheek and the gnocchi.
Both were great choices.
Although the gnocchi portion was not large I could not finish it because it was so rich (Not complaining).
I can't remember what the dessert was called but it was a little chocolate disk.
Very yummy but not too heavy, which was perfect after our filling meal.
Overall a wonderful experience.
Wait staff was great and I felt we got a good value for the price.
Definitely left happy and full!

Want some Sage advice?
Go somewhere else.
There are dozens and dozens of better restaurants in Las Vegas.
I am clueless here.
I really, really don't understand why the ratings for this place are so high.
This is the kind of restaurant where the presentation is everything.
Where presentation is more important than the taste.
I've never seen food look so pretty.
Every dish looks like it is ready for a photo shoot.
Unfortunately, every dish didn't taste very good.
Just bland.
But hey, if you like your food to look as pretty as the people around you this is the place to go.

Totally hip, totally fun, totally delicious.
Servers were attentive, playful and far from uptight.
Great all around dining experience -- Vegas style!
Starters:  Grilled robada apricots with toasted pecan purée, shaved pork belly, watercress and crispy guanciale -- Different and tasty!
Wagyu beef tartar with crushed caper aoili, slow poached egg, pickled mustard seeds & crispy chocolate!
Heaven on earth!
Foie gras custard brûlée with bing cherries, toasted cocoa nibs & salted brioche -- My favorite way to have foie gras.
DAYAM it was GOOOOOD.
Main Courses:  Maine scallops with braised oxtail, wild mushrooms and salted caramel reduction - Fabulous-O!
Salted reduction was genius.
The short ribs were dynamite.
They were so tender and quite the party in my mouth!
I've been dying for something like this after watching an episode of Master Chef season finale.
Dessert:   Efferescent grape mousse with greek yogurt posset, carbonated grapes and lychee sorbet.
Unique!
Never seen anything like it on any menu & pretty darn amazing.
Didn't think I would like it but wanted to try it because it's so different.
What a perfect combo of balance... especially with the lychee sorbet.
Apple fritters with root beer panna cotta, apple cider sorbet with sassafras ice cream.
This is supposed to replicate what you would get at the fair, but with a sophisticated twist.
The edible paper was so cool.
Definitely a lot of intricate details involved in crafting this piece of art.
UNIQUE & EXCELLENT in every way!
Talk about creative.
Must try the grape mousse.
I was a bit nervous but the pastry chef knows what she is doing.
Complex, creative & delicious.
Better move quick though because the options change with the season.
At the end of our meal we were given warm sage milk.
How fitting and perfect to help cleanse the pallet.

We stayed at the Aria, so we decided to eat at Sage.
We had reservations for two at 5:30 pm.
The hostess told us she couldn't seat us yet because the main hostess wasn't there...
Couple minutes passed and the hostess told us our table was ready.
We were ushered into the restaurant.
There were couple people at the bar drinking, but the restaurant looked pretty empty at 5:30 pm.
We were seated at the front part of the restaurant by the bar.
I thought it was weird that when we were seated, the hostess never gave us our menus.
Couple more minutes passes.
No water or menu.
We tried to get couple waiters attention, but we were ignored like 3x.
When the waiter finally came to our table, he was nice, but seemed to lack details of the restaurant.
I think he was new.
Once we placed our orders, our food came out fast.
Everything we ordered was delicious.

This is a tough review for me.
Food was a 4.5-5, but service was a 2.
Let me give some examples: * We arrived and our friends were at the bar, so the hostess directed us there.
No problem... until she never came back to take us to our table.
At least check?
20 mins later, we went back to her and she did take us to our table, but not AFTER...  * The bartender said he preferred for us to pay for our drinks at the bar AND no one offered to carry our drinks to our table.
Does this make me a priss expecting this?
This says to me that the management is a bit off on how they manage the team and likely tips.
* Once we sat, it was 15 mins until we were given menus.
The waiter dropped them off and then disappeared without any explanation.
Now, it would be different if they were packed, but they weren't.
* One final example (but not the last remaining "really?
" moment of the night), somm came over to pour our bottle of wine and barely engaged with me when I asked him about the wine.
It was as if he had better things to do than talk to someone about wine.
But he's the somm?!
OK, but let me talk about the food because despite the service, I actually did (and do) recommend Sage.
My friends and husband had three courses, but being the food champ I am, I had four!
:-D My favorite course was my husband's chestnut soup.
It was wonderfully delicate and flavorful.
The beet salad and my slow-poached egg received big thumbs up too.
I had the veal cheeks for dinner and they were great.
Loved the corn and hominy accompaniments.
The table favorite was the lamb though.
We had three desserts for the table.
I don't remember all three, but do remember a coffee chocolate dessert that was great!
Wine list was good.
Great diversity and good price range, while not being overwhelming.

Ok, this is a legitimate 5 Star Restaurant.
Located in the beautiful and elegant Aria Resort, Sage is everything I heard it would be and more.
The decoration has been described as sexy and that's a pretty good assessment.
It's gorgeous.
Serene and relaxing.
A great environment to eat amazing food.
Our server was kind, knowledgeable, and attentive.
We started off with a delicious arancini (fried rice ball) from the kitchen.
My wife ordered the chestnut soup with pork belly.
I tried it... phenomenal.
I started with a poached farm egg with black truffle and toasted bread.
Simple and yet mindblowing.
For dinner, my wife had the gnocchi with braised rabbit and black truffle.
It was great.
I had the scallops which were cooked perfectly in a salted caramel sauce... not too sweet but enough to bring out the flavor of the scallop.
Outstanding.
For dessert, my wife had the liquid pumpkin pie... fantastic flavor.
I ordered the nut tart that came with espresso ice cream, crunchy glazed peanuts, caramel, coffee crispies, and mandarin orange.
No bite tasted the same but all were blissful.
I really commend the chef for allowing the sauces to accent the food without over taking the flavor of the proteins and starches.
I really can't recommend Sage highly enough.
This is the type of restaurant in which you want to take your time.
You will really want the experience to last forever.

I love Vegas.
No, I mean it!
Love.
Vegas.
Not for the gambling, or public drunkenness, or random gold painted men lounging on the side walk.
I love Vegas because, in a 1 mile stretch of boulevard, you get some of the best restaurants in the world.
Sage is far and away one of my top 10- Maybe even a top 5.
The service was amazing, first of all.
I was seated immediately, and immediately got water and my drink order taken.
Just a few minutes later, my server greeted me with a menu and some explanations of how things work around there.
The server was attentive without hovering, had suggestions but was not upset when I ordered something else, was extremely knowledgeable about the menu and wine list, and was just generally a nice guy.
Not the "stick up their ass" that you may expect to find at similarly priced establishments.
My meal consisted of the artichoke confit salad, which was lovely.
Light, flavorful, and had a lovely combination of textures.
It was really a delightful start to the menu.
My main course was the shelton farms organic chicken, roasted, with buckwheat spatzel and a sweet potato puree.
This was a real treat.
The skin was lightly crispy, the buckwheat spatzel was the perfect texture with a nice brown butter accompaniment, and the sweet potato puree with nuts was a really nice contrast of textures.
My dessert was the Milk chocolate cremeaux.
This was sweet, but not overly so, and not too rich.
Very playful taste and textures, with pomegranate seeds that provided a nice tart burst, which also helped to lighten the texture of the dessert.
I rarely give 5 stars, but Sage deserves it.
It was a great dining experience.

Great food and décor.
Really should be 4.5 stars.
Best scallop I have ever had.
The only reason I can't give five stars is that I reserve those ratings, based on comparable restaurants, for the ones that knocked my socks off from start to finish.
Sage is barely one level below Mix, but Sage is still an exceptional restaurant that you should definitely try.
The first time I went to Sage I had the tasting menu, which was good, but nothing to rave about.
However, the second time I went there, it was great (especially the scallops - Michelin level good - I would go back again and again for the scallops).
Overall, the service was great (somewhat of a reserved eye roll when they can't upsell you, but it's fair based on the level of dining).
You won't be rolling your eyes at the end of the meal thinking that you just wasted money (that was L'Atelier - although it was exceptional the first time I ate there, second time around was not memorable and disappointing).

A delightful experience.
The service was awesome and the food was great.
The server was quite helpful in recommending the scallops.
They were prepared perfectly.
I also had the octopus and oysters as an appetizer,  both were delicious.
The dessert was the deconstructed apple crisp, not only was it original in presentation, it was tasty too!

5*.
Outstanding.
Great service, excellent wine list with some relative bargains.
Just remember it's vegas.
Had the soft boiled egg with black truffle and the veal cheeks.
Dinner companion had lamb saddle.
All delicious.
Would eat them everyday if my cholesterol could handle it.
Service excellent.
A lot of young hipsters and dressed up folks.
Would return tomorrow if I could.

I went to sage resturant at aria for second time I had great food and great service  my favorite Mediterranean resturant at aria resort

Amazing meal!
Great ambiance!
Lovely service.

Restaurants like Sage are the reasons my husband and I keep coming back to Vegas over and over again.
This is what it's about!
Good food, good company, great service, great atmosphere!
This place was outstanding!
Our server and sommelier were so friendly and helpful.
It always makes a restaurant experience when you get top notch service.
Our sommelier was able to help us pick out an amazing wine that we would've had trouble pairing with our food otherwise.
Get a cocktail, they are well mixed and delicious.
We did the chef's tasting menu.
Course after course of goodness.
The whole dinner seemed to have a playful autumn and smokey theme to it.
Some highlights:  -Sourdough and bacon bread with flaky salt---mmmm!
I wish there were more of it.
Not the epic bread carts of some other restaurant, but tasty portions to get your salivary glands pumping.
-oyster shooter amuse bouche--plus tequila.
Yum!
-Shaved foie gras on a walnut gelatin concoction.
-Day boat scallop was sweet buttery goodness.
-My husband had the egg yolk with a smokey foam---probably the best dish on the menu (from the vegetarian side of things)  -Ribeye was quite possibly the most delicious piece of beef I have ever tasted.
Succulent, perfectly cooked, crispy sear.
Oh my goodness!
-Pear custard with root beer bubbles.
A nice palette cleanser.
-Petite sundae--like a fruity pebble dance in your mouth!
Wow, what a great night!
We left fat and happy.
Would come here again to try a different menu.

Having come from London, with its plethora of fine dining restaurants, I had big expectations for Sage but it disappointed.
Food wise, it would get 3 out of 5 in my book, as the execution was good, although there was nothing extremely exciting or creative.
Just standard dishes executed well.
Wagyu beef tartare was nice, but standard tasting for a tartare at a top restaurant.
Scallops from the 4 course tasting menu was the highlight, while the iberico pork course came in such small portions that I felt it was half a dish.
Desserts were presented exquisitely, but nothing special.
No wow food here.
Service, from the waiter, was 3 out of 5.
Professional, discreet, and did the job as expected of a fine dining waiter.
No wow service here.
Where Sage falls over is the rest of the service.
We were there on a Wednesday night.
The strip was quiet, but this place failed to handle the small crowd it had.
It took us 10+ minutes to be seated from arrival.
Another 5-10 minutes to even get the wine and food menus.
Our entire dinner took close to 3 hours because of the long waits between courses.
I complained at the end and all the manager could offer was another free dessert, when clearly we wanted to just get out of there as soon as possible.
Very disappointing for a fine dining restaurant, and one that charges what it does for food.

Came on a Friday early evening.
Wouldn't seat us until the entire party was there, not a good way to start, but the bar staff was good and they did seat us promptly.
On a one aside shame on the aria concierge for saying they had vegan options.there weren't.
Anyways may I recommend the foie gras custard as a must order.
As for the main course I went for a fish dish that was executed very well.
The waiter was great and helped accommodate our vegan friends.
Definitely a place to go to

4.5 Stars!
When I'm out on vacations or mini vacations I always have to treat myself to at least one expensive dinner to top it all of and I'm glad that we chose Sage at Aria for our fancy dinner night.
The setting is intimate and decor of rich plums and forest greens are all around.
For starters we got the Wagyu Beef Tartare - delicious except for a strange crispy chocolate that came with it that I didn't really care for.
We continued with a wonderful Grilled Santa Rosa Plums salad, with wonderful guanciale and pork belly.
I did wish that the salad was cut a little more, since it was a bit hard to down.
Yukon Gold Potato Gnocchi was on the money!
Definitely a good amount of black truffle in there and yummy lamb to boot.
This is HEAVY and will fill you up although its appearance may seem small... yummy and rich.
Maine Day Boat Scallops, favorite of my server and definitely my favorite of the night.
The scallops are huge and bury a beautiful braised oxtail on the bottom.
The oxtail melts in your mouth and is truly a treasure.
Worth the visit!
It was easy for us to make a reservation and it was a great spot tucked away in our favorite casino hotel.

Made a reservation at 8pm.
They said to wait by the bar and will get us once a table is ready.
30 mins passed and finally I asked what is going on.
They finally seated us at a table and apologized with next round drinks on the house which was great.
The menu had a lot of interesting items on it, like foie gras creme brûlée and white truffle gnocchi.
Overall, the food was amazing and the decor was perfect (not too dark but dim enough to see everything).
The only complaint was that the service was kind of slow.
It took probably 10 mins between us finishing the appetizers to getting the entrees and another 10 mins of receiving the bill once we finished our plates.

Sage was good but just okay, and pricey for the food quality and portion sizes offered.
The scallops with oxtail sauce was very good.
The iberico pork was disappointing and not nearly as special as it sounds from the menu.
The black bass was just average.
The best and most unique part was the absinthe drink cart; we had absinthe eggnog and it was tasty!
Overall, the main selling point of this place is that the ambience is nice and romantic.
On the flip side, the lighting is too dark for a non-romantic dinner.
There are several other restaurants on the Strip with more inventive food at the same or lower price point.

Will definitely come back!!
Scallops were amazing, beet salad was tasty, oysters were delish!
The ambiance was lovely.
And lastly, the service was wonderful!

Sage was one of the best dining experiences i've had to date.
A nice little trick we like to use, is to each order completely opposite tasting menus.
We then share, and get to sample a massive amount of the offerings.
The highlights on this occasion, being the outstanding Waygu Beef Tartare, and the Rabbit backstrap.
Additionally, the desert featured a block of olive oil chocolate, surrounded by pomegranate seeds, and various insane magical elements(See pic!).
The wine selection can easily be described as Expansive, however, with the prices ratcheting up to over $10,000/bottle, it could easily be confused with Expensive.
To be fair; you can find a bottle of red for a little as $50, if you try hard enough ; )  If you find yourself in Vegas, make a reservation at Sage.
You will be glad that you did.
It does not disappoint.

This is a sincere request to all of you in Vegas:  Please.
Eat Here.
Your taste buds will thank me and your palette will be prodigious.
The first time I came here, I immediately ordered the tasting menu (the more expensive Chef's tasting menu of $150 because, well, it's Vegas.
Go big or go home as they say).
Yes, it may be expensive but you are getting a good range and feel for what Sage is.
Also, you are paying for art and we all know how expensive that can be !
The portions are small as this is the tasting menu but you will be exposed to so many different, exotic items.
The things that stood out to me the mo st (and will be returning for) were the day boat scallops, the chilled sweet melon soup (with the surprise of violet),braised beef shank and Peach tart (which was found on the $89 menu.
I substituted it for the Opera cake).
After your meal, don't be afraid to try their Absinthe drink.
It's strong, but they add lemon/lime flavor to moderate the taste of alcohol.
On top of everything, they have a very friendly, knowledgeable staff who tell you what's in the dish as well as the name of the dish and can impressively pronounce all the words I never knew existed.

Simply outstanding.
We ordered off the menu and let me say the menu descriptions don't do justice to the food.
We had party of six and everything we ordered was not only good, but fantastic.
I highly recommend the fish, the salads.
And the bread, oh boy.
We took clients with us, great for a business dinner, round tables available.
Atmosphere very urban and service was outstanding as well.
A little pricey, but we got away with just over $100 per person.

The Chilean sea bass was amazing.
The atmosphere was great and so was the service.

I recently had the pleasure of dining at Sage and boy was I impressed!
After learning one of our business dinners was to be held at Sage, I decided to check out the menu; due diligence is my thing.
Being a vegetarian, I was a bit weary when I saw so many carnivorous options.
Naturally, I assumed I would just have to suck it up and go for the ol' standby of soup and salad.
Boy was I mistaken!
After informing the waiter of my "dietary restrictions" he informed me that the chef was happy to accommodate.
He proceeded to let me know that many of the dishes could be altered to suit my needs.
My needs!
In my experience, most (gourmet) chefs are not happy to do such a thing.
That's one star.
Second star was the amuse-bouche that was *a hem* vegetarian!
Third star was the delicious Sancerre and incredible wine selection.
OMG.
Fourth star was the slow poached egg with shaved truffles.
To die for.
Fifth star - and this is what did it for me - was the shaved  brussel sprout and persimmon salad with the most delightful nut butter and  BACON FREE dressing.
This was literally one of the most delicious plates I've ever had!
Thank you, Sage.
You totally lived up to your reviews.
Bravo.
Well deserved!

Really should be 4.5 stars.
My husband wanted to treat me to a splurge night out while in Vegas and this certainly for the bill.
The prices are high but you get what you pay for...it was one of the best meals I ever had.
My husband and I just kept saying wow after each course.
Very creative flavor combinations and cooked to perfection.
The only complaint was the sparkling water and martinis were on the warm side.
Also the desert was underwhelming.
Would definitely go back the next time I am in Vegas.

Disappointed.
I made my reservation six weeks in advance for a table for two and we were seated in the bar instead of the restaurant.
I asked nicely for a different table and was told the wait would be 40 minutes after already having a reservation.
After waiting in the bar for 40 minutes we were seated in the restaurant at the table closest to the bathroom and serving station by the entrance.
Very disappointed with the 2nd table provided.
I should have requested another table since the maître d' obviously was sticking it to me for asking for a table change from the bar area.
We were dressed to the nines and a very cute wealthy couple.
The positive:  The food was fantastic.
I had the beet salad and black bass.
Our waiter was great.

Came here as part of my birthday dinner.
Located within Aria, Sage is one of the higher end restaurants in the plethora of fine dining establishments in Las Vegas.
The decor of this restaurant creates a more intimate, private, dining environment where lights are dimmed and the decor is very Vegas-esque in that it is grand, and clean.
The Sage menu is well-balanced with a selection of meat dishes, appetizers, and fish.
If you are coming from CA like me, there are some foie gras dishes you may partake in ordering.
As we had a long night ahead of us, and loved the selections on the 4 course meal, we both settled for that.
Course #1: Beef tartare: This was the BEST beef tartare I've ever had.
Hands down, delicious including the warm, crunchy, bread it was served with.
If you enjoy a good beef tartare, this is a must.
I also tried some of my girlfriend's foie gras creme brulee, which in my opinion was too sweet and funny tasting for my liking.
Course #2: Maine Scallops: The scallops weren't the best I've had but the overall dish was good.
All-in-all, a decent dish.
Course #3: Australian Wagyu Sirloin: A fancy name for a dish that basically boils down to just being sirloin cuts serves with a fioe gras with creamy potatoes.
The beef itself had great flavor and tenderness to it (cooked just how I asked), however I was a little put off by the foie gras.
It mixed in with my potatoes and didn't taste like a great combo.
I tried the 48-hour beef belly which although flavorful, felt a bit dry (overcooked).
Course #4: We finished off our meal with the Milk Chocolate Cremeux.
Normally, I don't enjoy sweets but this one was delicious.
The Milk chocolate was extremely rich and came with a small scoop of ice cream to help blend the taste.
We also had a Nut cake with caramel shavings which, when eaten together, had great flavors but wasn't all there texture wise.
Service here was good, but I felt it could have definitely been better.
The pace of the meal though we both went with the 4 course meal was slow, and we were sitting in between each course.
Admittedly, the service and pace account for the lost star.
The meal all in all was pretty expensive and given its price and the different caliber of restaurants I've eaten at for that price, it probably wasn't worth it, but then again it is Vegas and I still enjoyed my birthday.

This was the 2nd time dining here.
The first time was exceptional.
This 2nd time, well, a mixed review.
We were seated right away, which was nice.
Drinks and dinner were very good, but somehow, not as good as the first time I was here.
I think the short ribs were a bit "fatty" and the scallops a bit "sandy".
But overall, the meal was good.
I think where things really dropped-off was towards the end of the meal, when it came time to either order desert or the tab, and our waiter, who had been with us from the moment we first were seated, was no where to be found.
Instead, without any "hand-off" or anything, we had a different server.
This was just somehow "unnerving".
So, we asked for the bill, paid our tab and unceremoniously, left the restaurant without as much as a "thank you".
Again, less then a "feel good", when spending some $300+ on dinner.
All in all, seemed as if things were just a bit "off".
Not a good thing when there are SO many dining choices in Vegas!

We were there for dinner with a large party, and the service was attentive without being overbearing.
Knowledgeable and friendly staff.
All our dishes were flavorful and well prepared.
Of note, the veal cheeks and duck breast were perfectly prepared.
On the dessert side, the salt caramel nut tart was not only very tasty, but was also presented in a highly interesting manner.
Really nice high-end restaurant without being stuffy.
I will be back.

This is a rating purely on the food, and not the price.
Because let's face it.. if you come to Vegas, you will get comped!
Just like the rest of the Vegas restaurants, this place is overpriced.
However, if you are getting those comp dollars then please use them here!
This place a delicious menu and I had a chance to taste a bit of everything!
-Kushi Oysters- What's not to love about freshly shucked, small oysters that pack a lot of flavor?!
Served with a tobacco sorbet, it was quite refreshing!
-Wagyu tartare- Again, see comment above.. What's not to love about tartare, especially when it's WAGYU!
Really great texture, flavorful, and perfect size.
-Heirloom tomatoes-  Simple, refreshing, and good.
Nothing great, but nothing bad... just tomatoes!
-Foie Gras Brulee- WOW!
this is something different, for sure!
New spin on foie gras, delicious flavor, and the most popular dish at our table, for sure!
Loved the smokey flavors without it being too salty, as foie gras can get that way sometimes!
-Australian Wagyu sirloin- YUM!
Melt in my mouth tender, juicy, and perfectly cooked!
- Iberico Pork Loin- very tender, but I do recall a bit on the greasy side.
-Chocolate Olive Oil dessert- this was quite the creation mixing both sweet and savory!
I was a fan, because the olive oil was really brought out and showcased in this dish!
Overall, come here if you're not paying..
Overpriced, but if you have some casino comps, or you're feeling like you want to splurge, this place will give you a great dining experience!

Friday night, last minute birthday dinner reservation for a group of 9?
In San Francisco, that would be a near impossible task to accomplish, but Sage was happy to accommodate us!
#winning  To start: We were briefly introduced to the bar before getting seated.
After ordering a round of waters (too hungry to consume alcohol!
) and getting acquainted with the menu, our dining experience began with a selection of sourdough bread and bacon bread with herb butter and sea salt.
I love bread and I simply couldn't get enough of these.
Although the bacon bread was a little on the oily side for me and the sourdough was a less sour than the SF variety, I had few complaints once I paired everything with the herb butter and salt.
The server even came around for a second time to offer additional rolls right before our food arrived!
+1 star for sure.
Next, we received a complementary amuse-bouche and that was an absolute delight.
The server was soft spoken when introducing the appetizer, however, so I cannot recall exactly what we had.
The flavors were subtle and worked well with the cream and sweet fruits.
Main courses: Chef Shawn McClain's masterful menu includes a number of rich, indulgent, high value items.
Think oysters, sweetbreads, steaks, truffles, scallops, bone marrow...if any of these items make your mouth water, head on over.
Unfortunately, if you're vegetarian, the selection is far less accessible, although items can be modified (and prices adjusted) to accommodate dietary needs.
It was difficult to settle on just one dish, but I could never resist a good duck dish.
:)  I ordered the duck breast with persimmon puree, spiced rillette, and roasted cauliflower.
The duck is sourced from Grimaud farms, and the meat is noticeably leaner than other duck varieties that I've had.
i appreciated the slightly crispy skin and the sweet-salty contrast of the persimmon-duck.
Excellent flavor, hearty portion, and beautifully prepared!
A few other notables: the gnocchi was the dish of the night (4 of us ordered it) and it stands out as a well-executed dish.
The braised wagyu short rib was solid too -- excellent job on the braising.
Overall - Everyone was pleased and satiated with the quality of their meal.
- The food is rich and you will leave feeling full.
- Aside from the soft spoken servers, service was pretty solid and the dining experience was efficient and well paced, allowing us to move on to our evening activities quickly.
- Dessert options were primarily cream or ice cream based (and no birthday specials).
Again, too rich!

We can here to drop cash and enjoy a super fancy dinner and by the reviews we were super excited.
Unfortunately we were highly disappointed...and left tons of money ($150/person with only 2 drinks).
The reason for our disappointment (and the opinion was unanimous between 6 people who all ordered different things) is the food lacked any sort of wow factor or creativity.
Here's what we had: Appetizers: - Beef tartare: this was delicious - Veal Sweetbreads: first time I've had these and they were cooked pretty well.
- Beet salad: pretty good but nothing extraordinary - Sashimi: pretty good - Octopus: this specifically was my dish and left much to be desired.
Entrees: - Ribeye for two: the meat was cooked well but once again, this was nothing special for a place that is considered one of the top in Vegas.
- Veal Cheeks: these were delicious - Scallop: too salty and nothing special about the technique or flavors.
Needs to be elevated in some way.
- Gnocchi w/ veal: this again was my dish and I was really looking forward to it.
It was pretty good but the gnocchi were a really weird, mashed-potato, texture (this was the immediate reaction of anyone tasting them).
So while the food is prepared well there is nothing special, elevated, or unique about this place.
Too much salt and not enough creativity.
Meh.
The service is really good though.

Wonderful restaurant!!!
Awesome decor, loved the purple murals.
Great service as well.
Tried their prix fixe menu.
Oysters, scallops, wagyu sirloin, milk chocolate cremeux.
All really good.
One of the best in vegas.
Certainly the best restaurant in Aria.

Decor & atmosphere: Sage is a beautiful restaurant.
Of course, it is huge with high ceilings and extravagant decor--Vegas style.
There were large tables in the middle of the room for bigger parties and smaller tables along the sides of the room that could seat groups of 2-5.
Our reservations were at 5PM, so the restaurant wasn't busy at all.
However, the room was so large with so much space between tables that I imagine the dining experience at their peak hours would seem just as intimate.
Service:  The service was great.
Our waiter was very nice and remembered to ask us if we had any time limits due to seeing a show after our dinner.
We told him we had tickets for Zardana at 7PM and he made sure our food came out quick enough for us to feel relaxed but gave us enough time to get to our show.
Food: To be honest, I don't really know what to say about the food.
None of the dishes were "bad", and most of them were really delicious.
However, almost all of them were way too rich.
One of my friends ordered veal cheeks, and they were probably the best dish I tried at Sage.
However, combined with the richness of all the other dishes we ordered afterwards, it was just too much to have in one sitting.
I understand that this is the kind of luxury restaurant where the portions are small, but the dish supposed to be filling because of its richness.
I honestly started feeling a bit sick towards the end of the meal and was about to pass up dessert--and I love my dessert!
With such great reviews for this restaurant, I had high expectations.
I was probably most disappointed with the yellowtail sashimi I ordered.
This dish was not rich (thank god), but was not what I was expecting.
There were literally three thin slices of yellowtail on the plate on top of a jumble of cauliflower, mandarin oranges, and a strange jelly ribbon..
I mean to be fair I guess I shouldn't have expected Japanese style sashimi but meh, I did.
Overall, we did not have a bad experience here, and to be fair the service was great.
However, with such high expectations for this restaurant we were definitely disappointed.
The next time we're in Vegas, I don't think we will be coming back.

Ok so I have to say, you want to impress a boy or girl, take them to Sage!
This is the best date place in Vegas( expect to pay a LOT)!
So be sure the person you are taking will appreciate the locally sourced amazingly fresh foods that are lovingly prepared to perfection.
The large space makes for an elegant evening.
Oh how I wish I could eat here once a week!

We came with a group of 8 people.
The restaurant itself is beautiful, and the staff is beyond friendly and accommodating.
The food, while not necessarily overly creative, is delicious, and both well prepared and well executed.
We sampled several of the starters, including the oysters, beef tartare, veal sweetbreads, and foie gras custard brulee, and our group got a variety of entrees.
The two stand out entrees were the Bacon-Wrapped Iberico Pork Loin and the Yukon Gold Potato Gnocchi.
Both were fantastic!

Apparently I've been here 10 times and never wrote a review.
I am so bad.
This place is one of the best restaurants in Vegas I've been to.
Sage is impressive from start to finish.
From your walk in where you find the bar and lounge, to your table in the dining room, to the amuse bouche, to actual meal, and the chef courtesy sweet drink at the end, you will never feel short changed or unattended to.
Ten times I've come, and ten times I've left, full, satisfied, and wishing I had room for more excellent food.
The service is top notch, and the decor is perfect for keeping your dining experience with how it was intended by the restaurant.
I've partaken both tasting menu experiences (seasonal so they changes regularly), and if you are able to part with the money, you will not be disappointed.
You also won't be disappointed with the a la carte menu either.
You really can do no wrong.
A must try is the beef tartare.
I know the idea for some is a bit off, but they do a great job with it and the use of chocolate is an excellent addition.
I will admit, I was a bit sad when their lamb crudo was cycled off the menu due to seasonality on my last visit, but there will always replace items with new selections that just cannot make you miss something for very long.
All in all, I intend to continue to come back every chance I get.
I just can't get enough.

I have eaten here 6 times and every time they continue to impress me.
The décor and atmosphere is fantastic.
They have excellent appetizers including the foie gras custard brulee.
My favorite entrée is the Kobe skirt steak which is one of the best steaks I have ever eaten.
They have fabulous deserts and you can end your dining experience with the absinthe cart.
This is one of the best restaurants in Vegas.

Over the top menu and service.
Ate here for a business dinner with 10 friends.
Darn glad I didn't have to pay the bill as it's an expensive place to eat.
With that said, EAT HERE!!!
I tried the Fois gras brûlée it's sounds crazy but it's fantastic.
My steak was perfect and the wine list is deep, deep, deep.
Sage is a great LV hot spot if your a foodie it's worth the stop.

I came here with a group of 9 for a friend's birthday weekend, and somehow, we were able to get last minute reservations.
For a restaurant as popular at Sage,  it was amazing!
We started off with a selection of bread.
I tried both the sourdough and the bacon bread.
You'd think that bacon bread is great, but it was a bit salty and not as good as I would've expected.
It was still very interesting.
The bread also came with some herb butter and salt, which was especially nice with the sourdough.
Following the bread, we received a starter (an amuse-bouche ,which was definitely a fancy touch).
I can't quite recall what was in it, but it was also very interesting in its combination of tastes.
For the main course, I ordered the braised wagyu short rib, which was delicious.
It was sweet and well-braised, and came with some veggies on top.
I believe its was pieces of sliced potatoes and/or radish.
While it didn't look very big, it was deceivingly filling.
I'd definitely recommend this one.
I also tried some of my friends' dishes.
The duck breast was very tasty.
Also, I had a bit of the gnocchi, which was very rich.
I can imagine that my friends who had ordered  that one were very full.
One thing that I was disappointed with was that they charge you for sparkling water!
Not OK!
With a restaurant as nice as this, the "flat or sparkling water?
" question should yield complementary waters with either choice.
Anyway, over that!
Overall, I was impressed with the restaurant and the food.
The ambiance is pretty nice although most of the clientele seems to be of the older crowd.
We were probably the youngest ones in the restaurant.
Would like to come back!

Located in the "front" of the casino by the Hotel Lobby by other restaurants, it sits in the corner between restaurants like BarMASA and Julian Serrano.
With a party of 2, with my friend and myself, our reservation was set for 6:30pm on a Wednesday night, during the week of the largest convention in town (CES).
Not only did they quickly find the reservation, they directed us to be seated, even though we were a bit early !
(maybe 10-15 minutes)   By the entrance, they have glass enclosed racks of various wines (available to order) displayed.
From what it seems, there are 3 "rooms" to the restaurant.
First room, will have a fully stocked, wide and long bar, along with some longer tables along the length of the bar for large parties as well as smaller tables along the wall.
The second and third room are the main dining areas.
As with a lot of high end restaurants, the ambiances and lighting is dim but each table is accented with a light as well as some walls are accented with a purple light.
wonderful atmosphere !
Aside from the regular menu, is a separate smaller menu, which features their signature tasting menu for i believe $89/person, and their chef's tasting menu for i believe $150/person.
We had ordered the Wagyu Beef Tartare as a starter (to be shared), Grimaud Farms Duck Breast (hers), and Snake River Farms New York Strip (mine).
We were told by the waiter, we will be brought bread, when it is ready.
i was like "ooooh freshly baked bread!
:  After ordering, we were brought a small plate with a metal spoon, a standard special of the day amuse bouche (single-bite hors d'œuvre).
Today's amuse bouche was a piece of big eye tuna with a pistachio puree on the side.
Tuna was very fresh and matched well with the puree.
Though personally, the puree tasted more towards the peanut flavor than pistachio.
Along with the amuse bouche, we were given a plate with 2 things on it.
One was a small dish to what seemed like a house blended butter with herb and the other was course pink sea salt (less salty but slight hint of sweetness) .
As mentioned before, bread was brought out when ready.
One was a french baguette, the other i didnt catch the name of.
My friend got the french baguette, and i got the other one.
Indeed, the bread was warm (score!
) and the waiter said we can get more if we wanted to later (woo !
no i didnt ask for more hahaah).
As usual with my friend, if we get different things, we share =P i got to try her baguette and to my surprise, not only was it well made, it was stopped with sea salt !
nice surprise and touch !
my bread was nice too but wish i remembered to ask what it was.
The starter, Wagyu Beef Tartare arrived pretty quick, set in the middle of the table, for sharing.
Mixed in the tartare is a crushed caper aioli, topped with a slow-poached egg, with a drizzle on the side of pickled mustard seeds and accented with crispy chocolate, and a side of PERFECTLY toasted bread.
To my surprise, i thought the egg yolk was supposed to be raw, like a raw quail egg.
I forgot it was slow-poached.
The server suggested to just mix everything together and eat it on the toast.
As recommended, thats what was done.
The beef was super tender, though with some small chewy spots that somehow always found its way into between my teeth.
GRR lol..
I didnt really taste the capers but did find some while eating, and was able to taste if ate separately.
The crispy chocolate thing was a little weird?
more like a chocolate flavored chip to me.
Both my friend and I liked this dish  Now the main entrees.
The Grimaud Farms Duck Breast arrived sliced with a persimmon (fuyu persimmon for those familiar.. the soft type) diced and puree, spiced rillette (pretty much a seasoned and slow cooked pork shredded) and roasted cauliflower.
The duck breast was seasoned well and pan seared skin was crispy.
Perfect cook !
seasoned pretty well.
Though the spiced rillette to me, seemed a little off from the main dish.
The Snack River Farms New York Strip was topped with a beef marrow, a la ratte (fingerling) potato puree on the side, and glazed Maitake mushrooms.
The steak was ordered to be cooked to a medium rare, and indeed, it was a perfect medium rare (past experiences at other restaurants has gotten me extremely scared nowadays).
Nice seasoned and tender steak.
Glazed maitake mushrooms had a nice unique (sour-ish?
) flavor.
With our entree's we were given a side of mashed potatoes.
Upon first tasting, what was going through my head "oh my god its so buttery and smooth".
I'm not sure how they got it so smooth but oh my god they put a lot of butter.
Still pretty good though.
To finish off the meal, we were given a white chocolate almond soup in a small glass.
Nice almond flavor but sweet.
Overall experience was great.
Waiter refilled the waters really often (never went passed half)... +1 from me for their effort.
Overall a great place for a nice dinner.
Prices aren't that bad either.
Total for our dinner was a little over $100

We ate at the bar and couldn't have been more pleased.
The bartender was excellent, and the food was delish!
We finished our meal with Absinthe Russian Style, if you have never had it this way, it is something to behold.
From the flaming liquor being poured to inhaling the alcohol vapors out of the glass, it was an experience.

After a less-than-stellar week, we really were looking forward to our weekend in Vegas, and since we were alone in Vegas on Friday night, I looked for a place that had an interesting tasting menu to go try.
I'm really glad I found Sage.
We had a 7:15 reservation, and it wasn't really very busy when we were there, but it could have been that Vegas itself isn't insanely busy the weekend after New Year, as lots of other restaurants didn't seem that busy over the weekend either.
But that didn't matter, because we had stellar service the whole night.
So we went for the eight-course tasting menu with wine pairings.
They gave us an oyster as an amuse bouche, and it was absolutely delicious so we knew we were in for a great menu.
They offer two types of bread: sourdough and a bacon roll.
We tried both, but just moved on to the bacon roll when they returned because they were insanely good.
Of the courses, I think the first course of crab and yellowtail was probably the best one, but the next course of citrus poached foie gras was brilliant.
Just the right amount of citrus.
The wine pairings were pretty stellar as well.
Desserts were top notch as well, and even though they opera cake dessert didn't at all resemble an opera cake (which was a shame to be honest, I get the concept of deconstruction, but there's more showmanship in an assembled opera cake that I was looking forward to), it was incredibly rich and awesome.
We also opted for the absinthe cart which was a treat.
I've never seen it made, and it was a nice show.
For me though, even though absinthe is traditionally one part absinthe to four parts water, I would have preferred a bit less water to give the flavor profile more of a punch.
But I enjoyed it completely.
The only dip in service for the whole night was when the rabbit dish arrived and we had no wine, but they made up for it by giving us quite a bit extra of that wine given there was sediment and the wine arrived late.
So, they made up for that completely.
Sage is amazing.
If you want top-notch fine dining in Vegas come here.
And enjoy yourself.
Get the tasting menu.

Simply amazing.
From the bread (try the bacon bread) the foie brulee is divine.
Veal cheeks amazingly tender.
Outstanding service.
Half off bottles of wine on Sundays for locals.
Ask your server.

We had the four course Chef's menu, and were certainly not disappointed.
I went with the wagyu tartare to start (one of the best things I have ever eaten), followed by the Octopus (very good, but not the best I have ever had.
We ate at Carne Vino, and their Octopus was better in texture and flavor), next up I had the Iberico pork which was as amazing as I thought it would be, and finally the panna cotta for desert (also quite tasty).
The staff was attentive, and made our experience an enjoyable one.

Wow.
Unexpected, incredible surprise.
Food was amazing, every course absolutely perfect with diverse tastes and vibrant flavors.
I have a spoiled palette and I will have trouble going anywhere else in Las Vegas.
Foodies, try Sage, stat!
Also, our waiter, Bond, Julian Bond was awesome and very fun.
If you are lucky enough to get him, let him order for you.
We were blown away.

Really amazing food.
One of the best restaurants we went to in Vegas.
We had the Kobe steak and it was t odie for.

I am a foodie and this place is mecca.
Working backwards, my meal ended with a glass of Absinthe (okay, two of them) - but each served differently.
One was served flaming and the other from a special pipe from the Czech Republic.
The somolier was uber-knowledgable and made the experience fun and interesting.
That said, the meal was as good as anything in LA or NYC.
There are dishes for the gourmet and options for the not-so-adventurous.
That's a good thing because I am the former and my wife is the latter.
Fois Gras brulee with brioche is not to be missed!
I also had veal cheeks.
Awesome steaks, chicken, fish are also on the menu.
Desserts are individual works of art.

Customer Service was absolutely outstanding here.
Midway through the dinner my phone died, and I had a show to go to next, so no time to go charge it.
The server asked his staff for a charger and took my phone to the host stand and plugged it in.
Anytime I got a text he came to let me know who it was (it's locked so you can't see the message itself).
After dinner I just swung by the host stand and grabbed my phone.
As for the actual dinner itself, I was very impressed.
I got the truffle potato gnocchi.
Wow.
It rocked.
Wasn't too heavy or thick.
The truffles were sliced paper thin.
Both of the other people at the table kept picking at my plate.
I can't even remember what they had.
After dinner, the server brought us a complimentary "hot chocolate soup," which tasted remarkably just like hot chocolate.
Either way, it was good.
Short and sweet review.
I love this place, and I plan to go back anytime I visit the Aria.

Awful experience.
Server was rude.
Food was average.
Ordered the short rib, it was more fat than meat.
Sent it back and got another piece even more fatty.
Disappointing experience.

lovely restaurant with impeccable service.
we kept a light meal with the portions just right.
the 3 of us had the beef tartare, octopus, skirt steak, duck and scallops.
we'd order those again in a heartbeat.
next time we'll save room for dessert.
and of course the drink menu was full on.
what's dinner without a little old pulteney?

Conflicted on my review because this restaurant is really good but it is shockingly expensive.
Like a trip to Mastro's expensive and the food isn't on that level.
They are also rocking a 3 to 4 times mark up on wine.
The service and ambience are pretty great though, so check it out, but bring your high limit credit card for sure.

I love the bar area very sexy..wagyu beef tartare was amazing.
.belgian ale braised short rib was great..carrot cake with ice cream was so good

Sage was the scene for our "rehearsal" dinner with family and friends who'd journeyed out to Las Vegas for Carol W and my wedding.
A month prior to our arrival, I'd called Sage to make reservations for a large party of 15-16 people.
I was very surprised when the person I spoke with at Sage was so nonchalant (in a good way) about my request, not asking for a credit card number to hold the reservation, just saying, "We'll see you on Jan 10th.
"  The only contact I received from the restaurant was a confirmation call made to me the day of a few hours before our reservation time.
Sage was picked for this momentous occasion because we'd both eaten and had drinks there on a couple of previous trips to LV and had been suitably impressed by its contemporary American cuisine and killer cocktails.
More importantly, our party consisted of diners of varying levels of sophistication and adventurousness, but we knew that Sage had accessible food that virtually anyone could find something they would eat and enjoy.
This time was no different and, in fact, was its best showing to date.
Our party of 15 arrived a few minutes prior to our 7:30pm reservations.
We were seated at a long table at the back of the restaurant partially sectioned off from the main dining room.
I don't know if Sage has private dining rooms, but our table worked perfectly for us as the noise level from the full house of diners never rose above average to intrude on our meal.
Given the diverse tastes of our party and our planned budget, we opted for the Signature Tasting Menu (http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/sage-las-vegas-2?select=iYda89NQBM3fTPcNBQzBeg#iYda89NQBM3fTPcNBQzBeg) Without getting into specifics for each course as every item on the tasting menu was ordered by someone at our table, everyone pushed back from the table satisfied and pleased with what they had received.
However, the Foie Gras Brulee, the Grilled Spanish Octopus, 48 Hour Beef Belly, and both dessert selections seemed to receive the highest praise.
Our lead server, Lauren, did an amazing job synchronizing her team in keeping everyone's order straight; delivering our food simultaneously; keeping the water, wine, and cocktails flowing; and even coordinating with the kitchen to accommodate two of our party's special requests to substitute items on menu.
It was an exemplary performance by the kitchen, service staff, and sommelier.
Sage delivered everything we had hoped for and more in a special occasion meal!
I recommend Sage 100 percent for your special occasion, especially if you're celebrating it with a large group.

This was our second visit to Sage.
The first was about 9 months ago, and I reviewed it 5 stars across.
It was truly one of, if not they best Vegas restaurant, and fully deserving of the Zagat rating is enjoys.
I am sorry say that based on this last visit, it has gone downhill.
The decor and atmosphere was of course still wonderful.
Also, the food was very good, not top notch, but certainly very good.
I would have recommended it based on these factors.
The problem came with the service.
Our server, while very nice, was simply absent.
She was at least okay when we first sat, until we ordered.
After, she was virtually non existent.
We wanted fresh drinks, and the glasses sat empty forever, until we had a busboy finally track her down.
It also took her forever to ask us about dessert, and when she finally did, she never bothered to ask if anyone wanted coffee or anything to drink - she left too quickly.
We had to flag her down after, and by the time one cup of tea came, we were ready to cancel.
Not sure if she was having an off night, or if the service has taken a turn for the worse, but either way the service was very sub par, and made for a not so pleasant evening.

First-rate dining experience from top-to-bottom.
My wife and I both tried the four course tasting menu with wine pairings -- every course was spectacular and the wine pairings matched perfectly.
Even the bread (bacon rolls and baguettes) was awesome.
Highlights of the meal: -- Heirloom baby beets -- the whipped Harbison cheese was to die for.
-- Grilled spanish octopus -- I'm not one to normally like octopus, but the combo with the charred pumpkin and whatever other spices they had rocking  made me forget I was eating one of the sea's strangest looking creatures.
-- Beef belly braised for 48 hours -- the meat was fatty and very, very tender (almost melted in your mouth).
A price of $89 pp for the four courses and $44 for the wine pairings was definitely a steal by Vegas standards for the quality of food and wine we enjoyed.
The wait staff was great.
The timing of the whole meal was spot-on -- we never felt rushed (in contrast to other nice Vegas restaurants, it would seem) but didn't have to wait long between courses, either.
Our waiter was great about answering any questions and took some extra time to talk about each of the wines as there were a few we had never had before or really heard of.
Overall, this was the best dinner we had during our Vegas trip.
We'll definitely be back.

The best birthday dinner ever!
The service was perfection as well as the ambiance and food.
The foie gras brûlée was to die for.
It is a must have.

After reading reviews I booked a table for myself and seven friends for my 30th birthday.
The setting was great and the tasting menu on paper seemed too good to be true.
Unfortunately it was.
The food was good but not great.
The service was less than great.
For $200 a person with an auto gratuity we sat waiting at our table for 10-15min before the waitstaff stopped to ask what kind of water we wanted.
The tasting menu was not provided and we had to request it.
At the end we wanted to split the bill which was no issue but the waiter motioned to his watch and referenced timing when we asked that he run two credit cards and take the balance in cash.
Not a great experience to say the least.
The highlight for me was the scallops and desert.
Maybe we had a bad waiter and I ordered the wrong items at each course...regardless I left feeling full yet unsatisfied with the experience.

this place is a must go if you're staying at the aria or just in las vegas in general.
delicious food, perfect portions & yeah, the price is a little crazy high if you're not used to spending that much on food, but it's worth it.
trust me, it's somewhere worth the $500 bill~ hah my favorite was the kobe steak, the yellowtail & the tartare.

Addicted to this place...
I've been 4-5 times can't remember a bad item.

Come business casual and make reservations if your staying at the aria and it won't be as hard to get one, if not a few days before.
It's lightly lit and amazing at the table we have the chefs tasting menu and adding the wine tasting.
Wine came with each course and each bite was mouth watering (pictures below).
The waiter knew that I didn't like the oyster that came out with my order and quickly asked for another substitute.
I ended up with a salad which was amazing.
I'll post pictures course by course cause each was just amazing as the next and prior.
If you don't know what to order when you go there, get the chef course + wine sampler and you can't go wrong.
On top of it all they had absinthe!

The service - 5 stars.
The food - 2.
I love me some fatty red meat, but the short rib was over-the-top fatty.
I couldn't eat half of it.
My friend's gnocchi was way too garlicky.
The only thing that saved this meal was the service which, as stated at the start, was impeccable.
Don't think I'll be returning, though.

For the money not even close to worth it.
The wait staff, though many, was horrible.
It was during the second corse that I had to "ask"for a cocktail.
Steak was not cooked to order, and portions were knoll... Not worth to cost for sure...
Funny.... $21 for a glass of Rodney Strong Chardonnay... Really... Been there done thAt and will not return..

If Las Vegas has one unfair advantage over Los Angeles, it's the inclusion of foie gras on their menus.
Ever since it was banned in CA, we've had to cross over to NV to get our foie fix, and Sage was an excellent choice for doing so.
My wife and I decided to divide and conquer Chef McClain's Signature tasting menu for $89.
Without going through every dish, I'll say these were the standouts; the Foie Gras Brûlée (easily worth the $10 supplement and bordering on heavenly), Wagyu Beef Tartare, Grilled Spanish Octopus, Australian Wagyu Sirloin (an additional $15, but again, comes with foie) and for dessert, the Sweet Potato Pie with Angostura Bitters ice cream (someone needs to mass produce this ASAP, as it is awesome).
Our server was excellent and I'd definitely consider returning.

One of the best meal I had in a very long time!
I highly recommend Sage!
It was my second visit there!
Fantastic food.
The prize fix menu was wonderful.
Good service.
Great wine list.
The best steak tartar ever....
Try it!

Best.
Meal.
Ever.
Not just the best meal ever in Vegas, but the best meal of any place I've ever been - Paris, L.A., Dallas, Madrid....you get the point.
I was able to sample from all the plates that our party of 4 ordered.
Highlights:  Appetizers: Sweetbreads.
Trust me on this one even if you're not a sweetbread fan.
They serve them roasted with mushrooms, pork belly, greens, and a creamy polenta sauce that is absolutely delicious.
I've had sweetbreads in lots of places.
These were amazing.
Dinner: New York Strip.
The steak was cooked perfectly and the sweet onion puree that it was served on was perfect.
Dessert: I was too full to order, but I did try the apple fritters a girl at our table ordered.
Once again...spectacular.
Drinks: If you are a fan of Belgian beers, Sage has a great selection.
I wish I could remember the Belgian they had on tap that came at the recommendation of our bad-ass waiter, but it escapes me.
Eat here.

For a birthday in Las Vegas, we decided to try out something new, the Sage restaurant in Aria Hotel.
We're glad we did!
First, Sage is a beautiful space filled with beautiful people.
Mostly 20-somethings and 30-somethings in the bar, which was hopping by 8:00pm.
The restaurant is all dark and elegant.
The food is mostly deserving of its Zagat rating and local praise.
The highlights were: braised beef short rib, which had a marvelous demi glace and garnished with roasted parsnips and carrots.
Delicious!
The scallops were enormous and wonderful.
Less successful was the duck breast, which was chewy.
And the fish of the night was unspectacular.
You do better with meats here.
Desserts are good, but get ready for tiny portions.
Apple fritters were very small fritter bits scattered with a small amount of apple.
The purple sweet potatoe pie with charred marshmallow was delicious, but again, the tiny wedge of pie could fit in a toddler's hand.
For $12-15, you'd think you were getting desserts that are sharable!
As others have mentioned, service was erratic.
Our waiter was professional enough, but he seemed to have too many tables, even some very far away -- why not delegate sections for waiters?
Even with different assistant waiters and water boys, we still had to wait quite a bit.
We ordered absinthe with our desserts, and it was completely forgotten.
Then we had to ask to have it removed from the bill.
Little things like that take away from the experience.

The Positive - Nice Ambiance!
Major Disappointment -  On one of my flights back from Europe saw a documentary about Master SOMM - http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UUunwFZFqZo  There are apx 205 Master SOMM in the world and one was working at Sage!
How excited I was being a passionate wine lover and having had the rare chance to visit some of the finest and exclusive wineries in Boudreaux &Napa.
My knowledge of wine is far limited as compared to that of a Master SOMM.
When I can save up a few shillings I take the opportunity to indulge my senses (with the family) and get pampered in the culinary arms of world renowned (Michelin) chefs where the service is usually bar none and with it put the local SOMM to the test.
There are hidden treasures and with this is the opportunity for me to get a chance to experience through the help of a SOMM (local usually as there are only 205 Master SOMM in the world) and give them a reasonable price range to choose a wine after describing the flavors and style of wine I am in search of.
99.9% of the time the SOMM comes back with a bottle I have never heard of and causes a frenzy in my search for more!
Well, guess what this Master SOMM came back with- Chateauneuf Du Pape - (Similar to one I can pick up at one of the local Costco) -  To add to the insult, we ordered the tasting menu and when the runners brought the dishes their passion to explain each dish runs off like a bullet train at 1000 mph only to leave you guessing about the dish you are about to sink your fork into.
While the flavors of the food were actually decent this place treats you like a Vegas hop on hop off bus, just another number Baby!

Simply, WOW!!!
Had reservations for a Monday night, place was fairly empty, so we were seated immediately.
Waitstaff was knowledgable and attentive... Our table ordered from the dinner menu, decided against the tasting menu, but will probably give it a shot on our next trip... Our entrees were, the scallops, the duck, and the pork.
After trying a little of everyone's dishes, we were all very satisfied with our personal selections, but couldn't wait to return to devour one of the other selections!!
Finished the night off with absinthe...
When in Rome... First time tasting, very pleased and will be sampling different types in the future...   Will I be returning?
We ate at sage on day one of our trip, I tried finding a way to go back before we left town..
Cannot wait to return!

Great meal.
Although portions are quite small, it is kind of perfect so you can really eat and not get uncomfortably full.
Wagyu Beef Tartare is what we started with for our early valentines day meal.
Very good starter, served with crispy sourdough toast.
Finished the plate clean.
Butter they serve with their bread course was to die for.
Whipped to perfection and served with sea salt on the side.
The taste was that of a light french onion dip on bread.
Entree's we had were American Kobe Skirt Steak and Bacon-Wrapped Pork Loin.
Steak cooked perfectly (as recommended by our server John F.) and Pork Loin was amazingly tender.
My favorite thing on the Pork Loin dish was the Smoked Apple Puree.
Definitely a must with every single bite.
Dessert was small in size but huge in flavor.
Purple Sweet Potato Pie, on top of a burnt marshmallow with what seamed like rice krispies and angostura bitters ice cream.
By far the best thing of the night.
Perfect for that person who "doesn't do dessert" but wants something sweet after a meal.
Service was what you expect from a fine dining place.
A million different people clearing your plates and serving your water.
Our server John F.  was very informative when we asked our questions.
It was a slow night so kind of expected a little faster service, but overall a great experience and a great meal.

Went on a Friday night - last minute reservation.
We were seated immediately and met by our waiter who was enthusiastic, friendly, witty and made us feel comfortable.
That is as good as the night got.
We ordered the Kushi oysters.
I have had them before and they are sweet and delicate.
For some reason there was way too much Siriacha sauce on them and completely overpowered the oyster.
We had to scrape off the hot sauce to salvage them.
Next up was the scallop ditch for my wife and I had the Snake River Farms NY Strip.
Both dishes were so salty that we couldn't finish the meals.
The medium rare steak was exceptionally poor quality with ribbons of silver ribbon that made the steak inedible as I couldn't cut through let alone chew the meat.
The steak also was finished with salt and there was so much on the top that it was crunchy.
The waiter tried his best to rectify by bringing another portion of La Ratted Potatoes which were actually very good, but the bowl only has about 2 millimeters of potatoes and didn't save the day.
Unbelievable small portion size.
The waiter sold us that he was disappointed in the quality of the food as well and that he would call his manager.
We didn't ask for anything or want any food replaced, just wanted out.
The manager was not very empathetic and tried to comp a desert or something else which we politely declined.
He didn't have much else to say and went back to the bar to continue his conversation with two lady customers sitting there.
What a manager.
They did take our cocktails off the final bill.
The waiter deserves 5 stars, but the chef actually 1 star for the potatoes.
Ambiance is nice, but would never recommend.

LAS VEGAS: Absolutely epic meal.
I dine all over the country, and this is one of my top five picks anywhere, which is saying something for being on the strip.
Some people have mixed experience, but here is mine:  The poached egg with truffle shavings was marvelous, the highlight of my night.
Perfectly cooked egg, crostini spears, and an appropriate and generous portion of truffle shavings on top.
WONDERFUL, complex, flavorful and rich.
Next was the Foie gras, best I have had, because it was paired with this chewy, spongy, delicately toasted, thick, buttery Texas toast bread that was to die for.
That-with the smooth richness of the Foie gras-was superb.
I followed it up with scallops that were perfect.
They didn't have any surprises, but were simply perfectly executed scallops, which is a feat of its own.
I am so eager to return.

Birthday Dinner for 12 was executed well!
Foie and sweetbread was a must to start (the ban here at home had most of us with foie on the forefront of our minds)  Highlights: Veal cheeks paired with an excellent Cotes du Rhone, gnocchi dish and the scallops.

We did the four course meal option Sage offers for $89 a person, and it not only was one of the best meals I've had in Vegas, it was one of the top two meals I've ever eaten.
Everything was prepared excellently, the service was impeccable and the atmosphere was perfect.
The only meal that tops this was my personally cooked omikase from James Beard award winner Nobuo in Scottsdale.
That should tell you how great this meal was.
Highly, highly recommend.

Wow!
This restaurant is a feast for your senses.
The restaurant is very hip and well decorated.
Couches are some of the seating options.
Beautiful murals are on some of the walls lit by colored lights.
The music was perfect.
As for the food...The Foi Gras Creme Brûlée was delicious.
Maine Scallops were the best I've ever had.
Seared and seasoned perfectly.
Very tender.
The Australian Wagu Sirloin was tender and flavorful.
The reduction made it the perfect steak.
Dessert was just as divine.
The sweet potato pie was unexpectedly beautiful and delicious.
I just wish I'd had more room in my stomach to eat more.
The milk chocolate panna cotta was amazing.
Our service was the best we've had on this trip to Las Vegas.

This place varies between a 3 and 4.
The space is very eye pleasing and it's located well just of the front lobby in Aria.
We had a larger group but the service was bit spotty at the start.
Some confusion over allergies but they recovered well.
As for the food, the wagyu beef tartare was well constructed and balanced.
Beautiful seared boat scallops but the wagyu short ribs were inconsistent, some cuts had too much fat.
Overall, a decent meal at the price point for fine dining in Las Vegas.
Wouldn't be rushing to book a second trip but could come back if the location made sense.

Nothing was BAD, but nothing was particularly GOOD.
Not the kind of thoughts that you want to have after spending over $350 on a meal.
The massive dining room created a woefully impersonal ambiance that the quite excellent waitress could not remedy with her well-timed conversation tidbits and attentive service.
An entirely forgettable experience.

Very disappointing.
Great food but absolutely glacial service and microscopic portions.
My waiter would disappear for 15 min at a time on at least four occasions.
Dinner took twice as long as it should have.
I had to go eat a real dinner after this disaster because I was still so hungry.
But what little they did serve me was excellent.
So this is another case of the front of house failing the back of house.
Management needs to apologize to the chefs.
When I let the matre d know how disappointed I was he said he was sorry.
Not as sorry as I was picking this dog for my last dinner In town (second to last because I had to go get food after this starvathon)

We had such a spectacular experience dining (twice) at Sage this week!
Although we decided to eat at the bar, our bartender/server (Richard) gave us his undivided attention all evening, provided thorough knowledge of the menu, and even put on a fire show for us when he poured our Absinthe after dinner cocktail!!
Robert was a perfectly attentive and enjoyable server- with serious mixology skills and liquor knowledge.
Thanks again Robert!
The specialty craft cocktails (especially the Old Fashioned) were some of the best we have ever tasted.
We had the wagyu beef tartare, roasted sweetbread, wagyu short ribs, and gnocchi side...which all were out of this world!
WE HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS PLACE!

Our annual trip to Sage and again a 5 star experience.
We had a fun drink at the bar with Erin serving us (he must be the best bartender in Vegas).
Our group ordered the beet salad, octopus, NY strip, and arctic char.
They were all terrific.
I ordered my usual wagyu beef tartare to start and it was so good as always.
For my main, I ordered the potato gnocchi for the first time.
I am so happy I did.
It is prepared with braised lamb and pistachio's which meld together so well.
By far the best gnocchi I have ever had.
It was so filling I could not order dessert but so worth it.
It's a seasonal dish but if you are lucky enough to see it on Sage's menu-ORDER IT!
Bottom line: Food and service here are exceptional and have been that way since they opened.
Sage's GM, Robert, runs a first class operation and that's what keeps us coming back year after year.
If you have a special occasion or just want to have a dinner to remember in Vegas-make a reservation at Sage.
You will remember it all year long.

There is simply one word that can describe this restaurant...WOW!!!!!
My husband and I joined our friends for an amazing experience here.
The restaurant is beautifully decorated and the service is impeccable.
Their wine list and sommelier were great.
Now for the food...wow all around!!!
We were with a big group so almost everything on the menu was ordered.
Everything was cooked to perfection and the flavors of every bite came alive in your mouth!!!
One negative was that their dessert menu was short but still good!!!
Can't wait for another Vegas trip so I can go back  Make sure to call ahead and make reservations!

I've always love this place from the day they open, what keeps me coming back!?
There menu change all the time which is great.... Food doesn't get boring.

I organized a dinner at Sage for my husband's 50th birthday.
The service was impeccable, friendly and they didn't take themselves too seriously (a huge plus in my book).
The food was divine without exception.
This is a lovely place for a special dinner out on the Strip, expensive but not outrageous for the quality.
Well done!

We had to move our reservation since our event ran longer than expected.
We got pushed back almost 2 hours later since that's all they had available - when we got here, they weren't even busy.
We were so tired and hungry that we finished our French rolls and bacon bread with chive butter and pink sea salt.
You walk through a wine chiller and pass by the bar to get to the main dining area.
It's a nice and cozy place.
Foie Gras Custard Brulee: Fig, toasted cocoa nibs served with salted brioche.
I enjoy foie gras so this was a must.
Creamy custard, sweet torched sugar on top.
The brioche was nice and buttery.
I finished this all by myself.
5/5  Amuse Bouche: This changes constantly.
What we had for the evening was tuna with mousse and it was fresh and delicious.
4/5  36-Hour Braised Wagyu Short Rib: Short rib with horseradish-smoked potato pave, roasted parsnip and, red onion jam.
The short rib was so tender and full of flavor.
The potato was crispy but tender inside.
4/5  Bacon-Wrapped Iberico Pork Loin: Crispy braised pork shoulder wrapped in bacon on top of veggies and moked apple purée.
Pork has the tendency to get dry but this wasn't.
The acidity from the apple purée balances the fatty pork/bacon.
4/5  Milk Chocolate and Earl Grey Panna Cotta: Panna cotta, chocolate brushed on the plate, cream, blackberries, chocolate crumbs and madeleines.
Beautifully presented.
The variety on a plate made for interesting flavor and texture combinations.4/5  Hot White Chocolate Infused with Sage: For somebody who dislikes white chocolate, this was pretty good.
Hot, sweet and the sage helped in changing the otherwise boring flavor of white chocolate.
3/5  The service and ambiance were both excellent.
But don't expect to get full just by ordering one dish.
You're here for an experience.

I organized a bachelorette party dinner for 24 girls at Sage.
The restaurant could not have been more accommodating to our large group and rushed scheduled!
The sexy, modern ambiance and huge wine/cocktail list couldn't have made for a better start to our night!
Love it: - Bacon rolls to start are divine!
The usually carb conscious group could not stop eating them!
- The sommelier made amazing recommendations for champagne, red, and white wines for the table.
We enjoyed all three!
- I loved my scallops!
The preparation was simple, but they were cooked to absolute perfection.
- Other girls loved the gnocchi and short rib!
I would love to come back to try more of the menu!
Thank you for a great celebratory dinner, Sage!

An extremely pretentious restaurant; my experience here was horrid.
My girlfriend and I were in Las Vegas for a friend's wedding when I decided to take her to Sage to celebrate her upcoming birthday.
We entered the restaurant and were seated in an uncomfortable booth that contained several pillows.
My girlfriend has a bad back, so we requested to move to a table.
The restaurant was more than half empty, but the server still rudely and condescendingly scoffed at us, refusing to accommodate our request because the tables were "for four-tops".
I thought he was kidding at first; when I realized he was serious, we got up and exited the restaurant.
The staff noticed us leaving and requested we stay.
No, thank you!

Visited Vegas last weekend and had to introduce my friends to the great ambiance & service of Sage.
Sage is located feet away from the Aria reception area.
It has a somehwat small front, but don't let that fool you, the dining area has a grand high ceiling dining room with gentle ambient lighting and spacious dining tables.
We made a reservation previous day, when we arrived, we were taken promptly to the dining area.
We had a large circuluar table and very comfotable seating.
We already had some cocktails from the Sage bar area ( $15  crafted cocktails).
Our waitress Virgina did a great job explaining the menu and some options for a 4 course meal.
Scanning the menu we decided to have grilled spanish octopus to start & I ordered the snake river NY strip steak coupled with a Merlot to enhance the taste.
When the appitizer arrived, they brought in two seperate plates as they knew we were sharing, The Spanish Octopus was very tasty, had a nice ting to it, I would have it again!
Our friends ordered Wagyu Beef Tartare & they did not like it & returned it, we were not charged for it later.
My snake river NY strip arrived and I must say is was very good, Beef Marrow,  Potatoes, and glazed maitake mushrooms.
Was it tastey?
Yes, Was it worth $54?
No.
And last but not least, desert, and this was the big grand finale since Absinth was recently legalized.
This is an experince worth daring to do since you are in Vegas & I did not post photos of any who decided to try it.
The choice was Butterfly Switzerland, which is a 130 proof A Absinth.
You dont drink it, you inhale the fumes..and again, yes, it is legal.
The effect apparently, is like getting somewhat high ~~~~~^^^^^^^^ 8-D..  We spent a good 2 hours there and we had a good time.
The service was excellent but the prices were a tad high and thats why I am giving it a 4 star.
My recommendation, skip dinner and go for the $35 Butterfly Switzerland Absinth!

Too many options on the strip but Sage came highly recommended.
Drink:  I had the 'Elusive Spring' which is a nice, light & refreshing cocktail made with Buffalo Trace bourbon.
Eat:  The American Red Snapper (excuse the blurry pic) on a bed of peas and gnocci...I finished every morsel on my plate!
So delicious & not at all heavy.
They also start you off with some fennel amuse bouche thingy - I can't tell you what it was but it was a nice bite.
Sweet:  None for me but the mezcal float and extensive absinthe menu caught my eye  Staff:  Nice and non-intrusive service  Ambience:  Low key, sophisticated but not stuffy & good music (deep house?

The chef's signature menu is incredible.
We added a few things to it, and were almost uncomfortably full, so don't do that.
Just do the chef's signature menu.
Also, request Jason Bond as your waiter, because he is just the greatest thing that has ever happened ever.
Attentive, adorable, and great at making suggestions should you require them.
I have a giant crush on him.
But anyways:  we added the foie gras creme brulee, because our amazing waiter told us to, and it was delightful.
I'm not sure why it comes with giant pieces of buttered, baked bread though.
The foie gras is so delicate, that putting it on a giant piece of texas toast feels a bit sacreligious.
We also added a raw dish, which Jason warned us was small, but we didn't listen...and we should have.
It was delicious, but split for ways, it was just a tiny bite.
On to the signature menu!
The wagyu beef tartar is sinfully delicious.
It comes with a slow poached egg that is rich and runny and perfect, as well as crispy chocolate, which - not gonna lie - you can't really taste, but it adds a nice texture contrast.
The dayboat scallops were among the most perfectly cooked that I've ever had, with a salted carmel reduction that was a fantastic flavor balance.
I was already getting full by the time the wagyu sirloin showed up, but when I saw that marbling, I basically swooned under the table, then got up, and cleaned my plate.
Incredible.
We shared the desserts, a chocolate confection, and a fun take on a lemon pie.
They were both served rather deconstructed, so we had a lot of fun tasting different components and savoring each flavor.
Such a good experience.

Ambiance is impressive and chic.
While the menu is creative (lots of egg and truffle used) the dishes - all of them - are extremely salty.
Not a terrible place, but not the best and probably not worth the price.

It started out a little disappointing as we had to wait 20 minutes for our table prior even though we had a reservation.
The restaurant decor is very elegant and interesting.
We started with oysters and scallops.
Both were phenomenal.
Probably best seared scallops I have ever had.
Both are signature items for the chef.
For dinner we had the NY Strip and the short ribs.
Both were excellent choices.
Very nice wine selections.
The service was also very impressive.
I don't think it's any more pricey than other fine dining restaurants and I would highly suggest a visit.

Absolutely enjoyed the dinner I had here.
Service was excellent and I have some very good memories from the dinner here.
A true pleasure and enjoyable experience.
Highly recommended.

I live in Vegas and this is probably one of my favorite restaurants.
The food is top notch, but so is the decor, the ambiance and the staff.
The beef tartare is a must have.
Hard to describe, you just have to experience it.
The sweetbreads are really, really rich and as an appetizer, the portion could probably be cut in half.
My favorite entrees are the scallops and the skirt steak.
Both are probably unlike anything you've tasted before.
The scallops are cooked to pure perfection with a beautiful sear on the outside, and the sauce....to die for.
I eat tartare, so I like a rare steak and it came out the perfect temp.
Nothing  worse than an overcooked steak.
I'm not a big dessert person so can't really comment there, but I promise you one thing.
Sage will give you an over the top dining experience!

We made reservations for 6 pm on a Saturday night.
It was not too busy but we were seated in very close proximity to two other couples, right in the middle, providing us very little privacy.
In fact, next table to us butted in a few times in our conversation.
Ironic given the restaurant was empty.
Now to our food, we ordered the grilled octopus appetizer, and for our main entree we ordered the scallops and the halibut.
All these dishes were highly recommended.
Grilled octopus came out on a salad with sauce that drenched it.
It was done right but the flavor was lost with the salt overkill.
Our main courses unfortunately was very similar, salt overkill.
Do not eat here if you have high blood pressure or are sensitive to swelling.
The service was great, and We were very well attended to.

I went here for the Iberico pork and absinthe.
I got to mark those two things off my culinary bucket.
Here's how the rest of the meal went.
I really wanted the prix fix menu, but everyone at the table has to participate.
At $89 each, it seemed like a deal, actually.
But the Hubs had his eye on the short ribs from the dinner menu, so we just chose our own entrees.
The waiter brought us a basket of bread with two kinds of bread in it.
I don't remember what the second kind was because all I heard him say was "bacon bread.
" It was amazing.
The bacon was so finely chopped up you could barely see it in the bread.
It was like bacon dust throughout the bread.
And it was crispy on the outside and soft inside.
Amazing.
To start, we got the Wagyu steak tartare, which probably the best I've ever had (who knows if it was really wagyu or not, but it was very very good).
Here's were things began to get weird.
When it came time to place our order, I ordered the Iberico pork loin, but I said "Iberico ham, I mean, loin.
" I think they thought I said "lamb loin," which is also on the menu.
Another person in our party also ordered the Iberico pork.
But when the food came out, they only brought one, and gave me a lamb loin.
When I said, that's not what I ordered, they looked at me really funny and took it away.
It was kinda noisy and I guess it was technically my fault, but we didn't even get an apology or anything.
It was bizarre that something like that would happen at a restaurant like this, and that they wouldn't apologize.
The mix up really didn't spoil our meal or experience, though.
We laughed about it later.
The Hub's short ribs were to die for.
He actually makes a very good recipe for short ribs himself, and when he orders short ribs at a restaurant, he always says his are better.
But not this time.
I tasted them, and they were just the right ratio of fatty and meaty.
The lamb loin did look good, and someone else at our table ordered it and said it was very good.
It came with morels, and she ordered it mostly because of that.
We have them every spring in WV, but none of us had ever ordered them from a restaurant.
Once the Iberico pork did come out, it was exceptional.
But It wasn't like the holy grail of pork like I thought it would be.
Think pasture raise pork prepared really well.
Is it better than regular pork loin?
Exponentially.
It was darker meat (like the color of ham instead of the usual pale pink or white of pork loin).
There was another kind of pork on the plate with it.
It's not listed on the menu on their website, but it was like pulled pork.
Except it reminded me of salt cod; very salty, dry and flaky.
It was WAY over salted--and maybe it was supposed to be, but I think they could have left this off the plate.
It really only took away from the lovely Iberico pork loin.
Sage has an absinthe menu, and it's quite a presentation.
I'd never tried it before, but I've wanted to since it recently was legalized in the U.S.
Since I didn't know anything about the different kinds of absinthe, I asked the waiter about the differences.
He was very knowledgeable about them.
There were offerings from Pennsylvania, Wisconsin, France, Switzerland and a few others.
The Wisconsin one is actually owned partly by Marilyn Manson, and it's called Mansonithe or something like that.
Very kitchy.
I went with the Swiss absinthe because the waiter told me it was a recipe from 1902 (hello, upsale).
The drinks run anywhere from $25 to $35.
The absinthe is poured in a brandy glass.
A sugar cube is placed on a slotted absinthe spoon and lit on fire.
After most of the sugar melts, distilled water is poured on it from this big silver dispenser that looked a little like a hookah.
The presentation was exquisite, but the taste... meh.
If you don't like Jagermeister, you won't like absinthe.
But if you really just want the wow factor of the presentation and to say you tried it once (and maybe won some money in Vegas that you want to blow), this is the place to do it.

So this is my favorite restaurant in Las Vegas.
My boyfriend's brother works here so that's why we decided to give a try.
It's contemporary American and let's just say Sean McClain is a beast lol.
Everything I've tried here has been soo amazing, I've thought many times "wow I can't believe food can taste like this!
" Lol.
My favorites are the wagyu tartate (every other tartare I've tried is nothing compared to sage), grilled octopus, braised veal cheeks, wagyy shortrib, and arancini dolce.
I would eat here everyday if I could lol.
The atmosphere is more of a casual high end restaurant.
I love their two person tables, it's intimate and cozy with pillows and sheer curtains.
Their drink selection is also very impressive.
This place is just amazing, give it a try and you'll see what I mean :)

Legitimate gripes.
Took my wife here for her birthday.
We were excited and wanted to love this place.
The hostesses were almost oblivious to guests standing in front of them.
The tables.
Spaced nicely apart .
However the giant pedestal under the table leaves you nowhere to put your feet.
Photos of you and your guest?
Moments after being sat, we were asked if we would like our photo taken.
Unbelievable at a well priced dining establishment.
Took the romance right out of the restaurant.
The sommelier the star of the night .
Five stars.
We ordered fois and tartare apps.
Scallops and short ribs for entrees.
Fois good, weird but good.
Apps came flying out.
The tartare tasted excellent except for the gelled egg yoke.
Overcooked.
How did no one notice in the kitchen.
I ate it anyway.
No sooner were apps removed before the entrees came flying out as well.
My worst pet peeve in a restaurant.
I thought we were at mcdonalds.
Scallops no real complaints.
Short rib, same.
Biggest complaint here, the bus staff is not trained to not take plates until all guests are finished.
How many times will they try to take your plates.
Buy a book on dining etiquette and train it to your staff.
About an hour into our rushed meal, we had had enough.
Pass on desserts.
Even though I wrote in my open table reservation that it was my wife's birthday we were celebrating, this was never acknowledged.
We paid our bill and left a fifteen percent tip.
Our usual is twenty percent.
Ten would have been deserved.
Sage.
Thanks for ruining dinner.
We were so bummed after eating there, we cancelled our reservation at Gordon Ramsay steak.
Tired of paying for less then stellar experiences.
We both work for our money.

ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!!!
i searched through yelp reviews for a long time trying to decide where to take my mom for her 60th birthday dinner in Las Vegas and i am SO GLAD that i stuck with Sage even after reading some negative reviews (and lots of awesome reviews too, but i tend to second guess my reservation choice after reading some negative ones...) the Foie Gras Creme Brûlée appetizer was out of this world!!
as was the Wagyu Beef Tartare.
I had the Scallops which were AMAZING.
my mom loved her halibut, and my other girl friend raved about her steak.
The service was absolutely EXCELLENT.
our server Jason (said to call him Smith) was great-super conversational and funny.
the service was fast but not rushed- we enjoyed plenty of drinks and sat for a while and never felt rushed or like we were being pushed out or anything.
The ambiance was perfect, it was a little expensive but well worth it!
the portions were perfect size and we were all full when we were done.
The food was all amazing so i truly feel that it was fairly priced.
I honestly cannot say enough good things about this place- definitely check out Sage when you're in Vegas.

(bar/appetizer review only).
Shady rolled in to begin an epic 1 night/4 restaurant exploration of all that is Aria.
Shady and VERY lucky guest began the quest at the star of Aria's dining options-Sage.
Starting with the barkeep reco'd coffee infused bison and onto the snap peas with salumi, Sage is a great upscale dining option in Vegas.
The bison was tender and tasty, and the snap peas and salumi a pefecr bar appetizer.
Shady and Co had a few cocktails, Shady opting for the classic Hank Larson and making nice with the staff.
Shady was rewarded when the kitchen had an extra egg truffle and potato to go-more food than Shady bargained for for a first stop on his 3 hour tour-but WOW, was that good!
Decadent and delicious, cannot reco' highly enough .
Shady and Co. stumbled out of Sage satiated and looking forward to the next stop -Serrano.
Shady would love to come back to Sage for a full on dining experience.
It's that nice.

I was there with my friend on 5/23 for dinner and both had the tasting menu.
I also had the wine paring.
If I could give a negative star rating, I would.
We paid $350 in total with multiple supplements.
I got tin foil in one of my dishes.
I got apologies and a new plate, but no offer to discount the bill.
For this expensive a place, I was appalled, but didn't want to make a scene.
I shouldn't have had to ask to have them do something to make up for it.
I have frequented many a Michelin star restaurant and most of the fine dining restaurants in San Francisco and Napa Valley.
In addition, we both felt the food was underwhelming.
This lack of customer service is shocking and insulting.
This was supposed to be our nice meal of the trip and I couldn't have been more upset at the experience.

Our dinner at Sage was absolutely heavenly.
Hands down one of my favorite meals ever.
The décor is chic.
and parts of the walls were lined with blown-up images of what reminded me of French Impressionist paintings.
For starters, I highly recommend the fois gras crème brulee, and sweetbread.
I'm not a big fois gras connoisseur, but I loved it in its crème brulee reincarnation.
It is served with toasted brioche, which our waiter brought a second round since we devoured our first batch so quickly.
The sweetbread dish had probably the best melt-in-my-mouth pork belly I've ever had.
Perfect if you love strong savory flavors.
For my main course I had the braised beef, and it was flawless.
Tender tender.
I did not want this meal to end.
Naturally, I tried to drag this meal out as long as I could, so I got dessert.
I had the deconstructed carrot "cake.
" Very tasty but having a sweet tooth like mine, I thought it was a bit small.
My boyfriend ended his meal with absinthe prepared the traditional way, complete with flaming sugar cube and all.
Our waitress was very attentive, knowledgeable, and spot on with her recommendations.
Great service overall.
Sage is not to be missed when in Vegas.

Nice atmosphere.
Good service.
A bit slow.
Tables to close.
There are a few restaurants set up this way.
I don't like it.
Food was tasty.
Tiny portions.

Few buddies and I were together for a few days in Vegas looking willing to splurge for a great meal ...
But not just hitting the typical steak house.
Found Sage on Yelp and thought we would give it a try.
Pretty impressive menu and wine list... We opted for the full tasting menu including the wine pairings.
I would give the overall food a 10 out of 10, the wine pairings a 9 out if 10, the wine quality for such a great experience a 7 out if 10.
Favorites of the night by all three of us were crab / yellowtail crudo, foie grois, quail, strip loin, and raspberry mousse.
We were split on pork terrine and crispy tail, mini terrarium and all three were less than impressed with salmon belly.
Posted pics of each course.
Great night out, took about 2.5 hours ... Would do it again but maybe order a good bottle!
Highly rate!

Enjoyed the "Signature Tasting Menu" with wine pairing.
All wine was 92 points or better, and brilliantly paired.
The Foie appetizer is so different, but if you really want to experience insanity and guilt, the Foie candy bar as a dessert is mind blowing.
Everything that came out was fantastic.
Jason, our waiter was tremendous.
An all time great meal was had by all.
Back dining room is quiet and bathed in dark fabrics, front of house more sensory minded, with music and lighting.

This was hands down the highlight of our night in Vegas.
We were disappointed in the foie gras appetizer though...
Even though it's the most popular on the menu.
We both love our foie gras pan seared, and this was more of a pate foie gras.... Not our favorite.
:( BUT...
The scallops I had were absolutely delicious... And my husbands halibut was outstanding.
You can't go wrong if you choose either of these entrees.
The dessert was a foie gras 'snicker bar'...
It was nice, not outstanding.
The presentation of it was beautiful!
:-)

Came here for dinner with a friend and wow were we impressed!
Service from our waiter and all other employees was amazing and unlike most restaurants, they folded my napkin whenever I left the table to use the restroom and helped me up from my seat.
Recommendations and food were impeccable and cooked to perfection.
Definitely suggest the tartare.

Everything was fantastic.
We did the signature menu and were very impressed.
As good as the food was, our server Marcus was the star of the show.
Probably one of the best servers I've ever had the pleasure of dining with.
Sage is extremely lucky to have you Marcus, thank you for your superior service, it meant a lot to us.

One of my idiosyncrasies is checking out how a restaurant is decorated.
I love how Sage is decorated.
It's dark but the colors of golds and purple jump out.
The service is always pretty good.
The food is good but I have to admit the ambiance is what I appreciate more.
I've had a full tasting menu here.
Honestly, I can't remember how it was, other than the fact that it was pretty good.
Nothing jumped out too much.
I also had the NY steak, which was VERY good, and at one time ordered a rib eye years ago, although I didn't see it on the menu on a recent visit.
I've also had a risotto dish years ago (perhaps this was part of the tasting dish?
) and it was decent but wouldn't order it again.
There's a cool absinth bar here which they push out in a little cart and drizzle it over some ice in what looks like a bong from afar.
I also tasted a cucumber /gin cocktail, which was very refreshing.
Overall, I think it serves a good steak.
However, next time I would probably opt to sit at the bar and have a drink or two.

Very disappointing.
After reading the reviews, we selected this place for a special dinner.
The server was not helpful, we we asked him for a recommendation, he suggested the "chef's surprise", so that is what we ordered not knowing it was $150.00 per plate.
Each course (8) was about two bites, not paired with wine, and there was NOTHING any of us liked.
The server knew as he took back each uneaten plate.
The wine was very good, we had a Word Pinot Noir but that was all we enjoyed.
When we received the bill it was $967.00!!!!
We left there hungry and went somewhere else to eat.
The next day I asked to talk to the manager about our experience.
He basically told me too bad for you but you can try it again.
NO THANKS!
Poor service recovery skills.
I don't mind paying high prices for an excellent meal, but to pay this much and have to go find another place to eat dinner.....

Amazing!
Love the decor, the chef was so sweet and came and talked to us for like 20 minutes.
We got Foie gras and beef tartare for apps, I got the chicken, and my fiancé got the lamb.
Everything was delicious!
Loved this place

This was the best meal I've had in Vegas, and we've eaten at some of the top restaurants here.
We ordered the Chef's menu, and it was outstanding.
Each dish was interesting, delicious and I was full by the end!!
We did not get the wine pairing because we were already tired from a full day.
The service was amazing.
The servers were excited about the dishes and very knowledgable about the food.
We LOVED it!

We went for a pre-show dinner.
Wagyu Beef tartar... Wagyu Beef tartar... WAGYU BEEF TARTAR!!!
Everything was really good and really expensive (but its Vegas).
The fish was awesome, the scallops were crazy good, the veal cheeks were perfect.
But get the steak tartar.
No joke.
Glass of wine, wagyu beef tartar, walk out the door, feel like a winner.

